WHAT THEN MUST WE DO? 
By Leo Tolstoy 


Translated by Aylmer Maude 



Leo Tolstoy 


2 


What Then Must We Do? 


‘What Then Must We Do?’ was first published in 1886. In ‘The World’s Classics’ 
Aylmer Maude’s translation as first published in 1925, revised in 1935 and reprinted in 
1942. 



What Then Must We Do? 


3 


Leo Tolstoy 


CONTENTS 

Editors Note 
CHAPTER I 
CHAPTER II 
CHAPTER III 
CHAPTER IV 
CHAPTER V 
CHAPTER VI 
CHAPTER VII 
CHAPTER VIII 
CHAPTER IX 
CHAPTER X 
CHAPTER XI 
CHAPTER XII 
CHAPTER XIII 
CHAPTER XIV 
CHAPTER XV 
CHAPTER XVI 
CHAPTER XVII 
CHAPTER XVIII 
CHAPTER XIX 
CHAPTER XX 
CHAPTER XXI 
CHAPTER XXII 
CHAPTER XXIII 
CHAPTER XXIV 
CHAPTER XXV 
CHAPTER XXVI 
CHAPTER XXVII 
CHAPTER XXVIII 
CHAPTER XXIX 
CHAPTER XXX 


5 

12 

14 

17 

20 

22 

25 

27 

29 

32 

34 

37 

39 

41 

45 

49 

53 

55 

60 

67 

70 

77 

83 

86 

88 

95 

101 

105 

110 

113 

116 



Leo Tolstoy 


4 


What Then Must We Do? 


CHAPTER XXXI - 122 

CHAPTER XXXII - 126 

CHAPTER XXXIII - 128 

CHAPTER XXXIV - 130 

CHAPTER XXXV - 136 

CHAPTER XXXVI - 137 

CHAPTER XXXVII - 142 

CHAPTER XXXVIII - 146 

CHAPTER XXXIX - 157 

CHAPTER XL - 167 



What Then Must We Do? 


5 


Leo Tolstoy 


EDITOR'S NOTE 


THE republication of this book in a translation which has been carefully revised affords 
me particular pleasure. 

It was the first of Tolstoy's works to grip my attention, and it caused me to seek his 
acquaintance, which in turn led to the work I have now been engaged on for many years, 
namely, the preparation of the 'World's Classics' series and the Centenary Edition of his 
works. 

The economics of this book are largely those of the Tula peasantry through whose eye 
Tolstoy looked at society. The province of Tula, where Yasnaya is situated, lies just north 
of the black-earth region. Its soil is poor, and constant toil barely enabled the peasant to 
wring a precarious subsistence from it. But the typical Tula peasant was no fool, and his 
views on life are well worth our careful consideration. As expressed by Tolstoy they go 
to the root of things and with unerring accuracy touch the sorest spots of the world's 
conscience. Our life can be neither satisfactory nor secure if we neglect them. 

During the half-century that has passed since the book was written many political 
questions that then seemed highly important have passed into the dull recesses of history; 
but Tolstoy's impressive warning that the pursuit and worship of money does not bring 
satisfaction and that the possession of talents and privileged position, far from justifying 
self-indulgence, are a call to serve those less fortunately placed, remains as valid as when 
he wrote it. 

Social conditions have changed. Instead of the acute shortage of grain then existing in 
Russia, the Western world is to-day troubled by overproduction. Instead of being crushed 
by toil, workers are often hungry for work. Yet the fundamental problem remains. As 
Tolstoy says: 'Being poor does not deprive men of reason. They never have admitted and 
never will admit that it is right for some to have a continual holiday while others must 
always fast and work. . . . Where there is a man not working because he is able to compel 
others to work for him- there slavery exists.... The ideal of an industrious life has been 
replaced by the ideal of a magic and inexhaustible purse.' 

These sayings indicate the root of the class-war that threatens society and that Tolstoy 
wished to avert. The warning he uttered was disregarded, and the class-war became a 
consuming fire in Russia. In England it has not flamed up in that way owing partly to our 
various unemployment schemes, but wherever those who are prosperous cut themselves 
off from personal association with those who are depressed and unfortunate, the reproach 
and menace of class enmity smoulders and causes the 'kind of unhappiness that banknotes 
cannot cure' of which Tolstoy speaks. 

Some attempt to bridge the gulf and supply mental sustenance where it is badly needed 
may be found in our village Women's Institutes, as well as in various amateur dramatic 
groups up and down the country and in the Citizen House movement at Bath. Among 
plays performed by them is Michael , Miles Malleson's adaptation of Tolstoy's story, 
What Men Live By. Another reminder of his influence among us is given by this 'World's 
Classics' series of cheap books, which arose in an indirect way from a conversation W. T. 
Stead once had with Tolstoy when he visited him at Yasnaya Polyana. This series is 



Leo Tolstoy 


6 


What Then Must We Do? 


gradually completing the set of Tolstoy's own works. It does not give such a collection of 
the world's literary masterpieces as Tolstoy aimed at, but should by no means be 
despised, for as he often said: 'The distance you have gone is less important than the 
direction in which you are going.' 

Such shrewd blows as Tolstoy struck at the self-complacency of the privileged classes 
were bound to evoke a retort, and those whose consciences he troubled soon realized that 
it was better tactics to cast doubts on his personal sincerity than to attempt to discuss his 
main propositions, which they wished to burk. Merezhkovsky was the first to start the 
game of detraction and insinuation, though after making Tolstoy's acquaintance and 
realizing his honesty he expressed regret for what he had written about him. But so 
unpleasant was it that so popular a writer as Tolstoy should point out that religion ought 
to have a practical effect on men's lives, that under the auspices of the Holy Synod a very 
libellous pamphlet was issued and hawked about the streets of Moscow denouncing 
Tolstoy in a way of which we have recently been reminded by eloquent, though belated, 
echoes in this country. 

What is curious is that his detractors always appear fully confident of their own mental 
and moral superiority to the man they attack though such superiority is not at all apparent 
to others. 

Tolstoy himself realized that 'to change another man's outlook on life one must oneself 
have a better one and live in accord with it', and it was precisely to that question-whether 
he lived in accord with his principles-that criticism was chiefly directed. 

When he finished this book he intended to hand his estate over to the peasants and to 
support himself by manual labour. Readers who remember the mowing scenes in Anna 
Karenina (written some eight years previously) can readily believe that he could have 
done so. But everyone must start from the spot where he stands, and Tolstoy had to 
encounter the demands of his wife, who was prepared to appeal to the Tsar to have her 
husband declared incapable of disposing of his property. Even apart from that, he wished 
to be considerate to his wife and not provoke her to anger; so it was arranged that his 
property should be dealt with as though he were dead. It was divided up equally between 
his wife and their nine living children, each of whom received property to the value of 
about £5,000. 

The question of book-rights remained to be dealt with, and he gave his wife an 
authorization to publish everything he had written before 1881, and he also issued an 
announcement that for the future he would neither accept money for what he wrote, nor 
claim any copyright in it. Anyone was to be free to publish and republish it as they 
pleased. 

By this arrangement he hoped to avoid all strife about property, but in this he was dis- 
appointed. Even apart from copyright, there was considerable advantage to be gamed by 
having the first publication of what he wrote. His wife had undertaken the publication of 
the works placed at her disposal and was very anxious to secure the first publication of 
whatever else he wrote and the censor permitted to be published. This desire of hers 
clashed with Tolstoy's own intention of allowing the publication of his works to help the 
causes he had at heart, such as the supply and circulation of cheap and good literature 
among peasants and workmen. Recurring strife with his wife over this matter rendered 



What Then Must We Do? 


7 


Leo Tolstoy 


life at Yasnaya Polyana a torment to them both, and the Countess worried herself over it 
to such an extent that she became deranged. From the time he wrote What Then Must We 
Do? Tolstoy always wished to get away from Yasnaya Polyana, but every time he 
attempted to do so his wife demanded that he should remain, and threatened to commit 
suicide if he left her. This state of things grew worse and worse till at last, at the age of 
eighty-two, he escaped secretly one night without even having decided where to go. He 
fell ill on the train, and died at the wayside station of Astapovo. 

Before her death his wife expressed deep regret for her conduct, saying, 'I really think I 
was insane .... I know I was the cause of his death ....' Let us, however, accept the plea 
she makes in her Diary: 'Let no one raise a hand against me, for I have suffered terribly,' 
and let us sincerely pity the woman who thought the money her husband was rejecting 
was worth the sufferings her efforts to secure it inflicted both on him and on herself. 

What Then Must We Do? is so powerful and obviously sincere that many readers 
assumed that Tolstoy himself lived by manual labour, and the reaction when they learnt 
that he was not doing so, gave rise to suspicions that his abandonment of property was a 
pretence and that he was living a self-indulgent life at his wife's expense. 

Though in fact he remained under her roof he was simplifying his life drastically and 
using hardly any money. He gave up wine and the use of alcohol in any form, abandoned 
smoking (a sacrifice that cost him a hard struggle), became a strict vegetarian, wore 
cheap and coarse clothes of peasant fashion, did much field-work among the peasants as 
long as his strength lasted, and leamt boot-making as a handicraft and a winter 
occupation. 

His belief, expressed in On Life , was very real that no true or lasting satisfaction is 
obtainable by the pursuit of wealth or personal enjoyments, and that true life lies only in 
obeying our reasonable consciousness (the voice within) - that son of man which shows 
that we are sons of God. Not the increase of his personal welfare, but the betterment of 
life generally, was the object of his activity from then onward. The distribution of cheap 
literature of first-rate quality, yet suitable for the common people, was a chief interest, 
and in that attempt he enlisted the co-operation of a number of Russian writers and artists. 
His Twenty-Three Tales , as well as other short stories and plays, are examples of his own 
contribution to that movement, and he was active in choosing suitable matter from 
foreign literature and encouraging its translation. He even made several such translations 
himself. During 1891-3 he engaged strenuously on famine relief work which fully 
absorbed him till the famine was over, by which time he had worn himself out to the 
verge of collapse. 

Temperance was another movement in which he took a great interest, and he was ever 
ready to spend time and trouble in pleading the cause of various persecuted peasant 
sectarians. Incidentally he succeeded in rescuing two Uniate Bishops from incarceration 
in a monastery prison where they had been confined for thirty years and had been 
forgotten by the Ecclesiastical and Civil authorities. He was always extremely popular 
with children, and classes for them were another occupation in which he engaged. 

The keen interest he took in these activities furnished the chief interest and enjoyment of 
his later life, affording him great satisfaction and often rendering him happy despite his 
domestic misfortunes. 



Leo Tolstoy 


What Then Must We Do? 


It is truly remarkable that amid all these occupations he found time and energy during the 
last twenty-five years of his life to produce a series of works-novels, stories, plays, 
essays, and philippics-which would have placed him in the front rank of European writers 
had he not already been the most famous writer of his time. They included The Death of 
Ivan Ilich, The Kreutzer Sonata, The Power of Darkness, The Fruits of Enlightenment, 
The Live Corpse, The Kingdom of God is Within You, Hadji Murad, and his splendid 
Introduction to the works of Guy de Maupassant, as well as What is Art? and a series of 
essays on various subject. Curiously enough, those were the years during which the 
critics adopted the silly habit of saying that he had 'abandoned art'! 

One must not forget to mention his work for peace. Just as it took long to arouse a clear 
perception of the wrongfulness of slavery but until that had been done the abolition of 
slavery was impossible - so Tolstoy realized that to arouse a general perception of the 
wrongfulness of war is a necessary preliminary to the world's emancipation from that 
gigantic evil, and the work he did in that direction is perhaps as great as any of his 
achievements. 

I was able to co-operate with him myself both in work on behalf of the sectarians and by 
translating letters, articles, and books for him, so that I had ample opportunity to 
convince myself of the utter groundlessness of the insinuations directed against his 
sincerity and frankness. If there was a point on which he was not quite frank, it was the 
way m which he tried to screen his wife from blame. More than once he wrote letters for 
her to publish, the express object of which was to shield he: reputation; and when his Life 
was being written by me in English and by Birukov in Russian, we were both of us fully 
aware of his desire that the Countess should be spoken of as favourably as possible. It 
was not till later that we realized the extent to which she was tormenting him, and that 
she had set herself to 'cast him down from his pinnacle', as she wrote in her Diary. 

His attitude was in striking contrast to hers. After his death one of their sons continued 
the attacks on his father's memory, but he is the one on whose testimony those who know 
the family would be least disposed to place reliance, and many of his statements are in 
fact demonstrably untrue. . 

By What Then Must We Do? Tolstoy pricks the conscience of many who resent what he 
says of the futility of the society to which they belong. They do not like to be reminded 
that a social life that despises those whose labour makes their own luxurious lives 
possible, must be unsatisfactory. To disparage Tolstoy affords a natural relief to their 
feelings. So the example set by the Holy Synod which excommunicated and libelled him 
is still being repeated both in this country and elsewhere by writers reckless as to the facts 
of his life, but all the more eager to reveal to us the innermost workings of his soul. His 
words, however, cut deep, and apart from the extreme readability of the autobiographical 
part of this book, it affords both stimulus and encouragement to all who feel that the 
privileges they enjoy involve an obligation to serve those less fortunate than themselves. 

Almost the last article by the late Miss Jane Addams, of Hull House, Chicago, was her 
admirable Introduction to What Then Must We Do? in the Centenary Edition of Tolstoy's 
works. In it she says: 

'Some books are to us not so much books as they are vital experiences. This depends not 
only upon the book itself, but also upon the sum of influences and of social trends under 



What Then Must We Do? 


9 


Leo Tolstoy 


which it is read. A young person reading today Tolstoy's What Then Must We Do? might 
find it difficult to conceive the profound impression which it made upon sensitive people 
when it first appeared. In the late 'eighties there was a widespread moral malaise in regard 
to existing social conditions, ranging from a mere unformulated sense of uneasiness to an 
acute consciousness of unredressed wrongs. The abuses connected with the beginnings of 
machine production had by the end of the nineteenth century been somewhat lessened in 
England and the United States, but the evil slum conditions in our rapidly growing cities, 
with all the inevitable results on health and morals, were pressing on men's minds. Social 
and moral questioning, stimulated by some of the greatest leaders of English thought, had 
driven deep furrows in the smooth surface of nineteenth century satisfaction with the 
belief that progress was inevitable. 

'An astonishing number of writers either formulated this uneasiness or described the 
conditions from which it arose. Although a few of these writers have taken a permanent 
place in English literature, as had their forerunners, Carlyle, Ruskin, and Arnold, many of 
them who have since proved ephemeral, gave at the moment a poignant challenge to the 
English-reading public. The Bitter Cry of Outcast London, Darkest England and the Way 
Out, Charles Booth's monumental study, Life and Labour of the People, Beatrice Webb's 
first-hand story of her voluntary experiences in sweatshop and factory, and the brilliant 
Fabian Essays, containing the early work of Shaw, Sidney Webb, and Olivier, found an 
echo in the United States, where a lesser literature of the same sort was beginning to 
appear, although it did not reach its zenith until a decade later. 

'Into a surcharged atmosphere such as this came the trenchant challenge of Tolstoy's book 
written with the overwhelming sincerity and simplicity which distinguishes the works of 
genius. It illustrated once more that "A new simplicity is the most baffling of all human 
achievements and the most perdurable". It is also fair to state in defence of the multitude 
of other writers that none of them was faced with a situation so direct and simple in itself 
as that presented in Russia. The vague questionings and indictments of long established 
customs were much more difficult to reduce to underlying principles in the midst of our 
own complicated social order than they were in the simple conditions prevailing in 
Russia. For instance, in What Then Must We Do? Tolstoy had poignantly drawn the 
contrast between the toiling underfed peasants in the fields and the life led by himself and 
his friends at the nearby manor house, whither the idlers had come from Moscow to enjoy 
the pleasures of country life in summer. They were carelessly absorbing the services of 
peasants whose help was urgently needed to secure the crops of hay and grain during the 
brief and overburdened days of harvest and in certain instances, as when the ram 
threatened to fall upon the drying hay, their luxurious living imperilled the crop itself. 
The statement of Tolstoy's scruples under these conditions was curiously like that 
formulated by Abraham Lincoln, years before, when driven by the existence of slavery to 
a long meditation on the basic relations between man and man, he had carefully written 
down, "As labor is the common burden of our race, so the effort of some to shift their 
shares of burden onto the shoulders of others is the great durable curse of the race." 

*** 

'The widespread misery in Russia was brought home to everyone who could read a 
newspaper by the long series of famines to which Russia had always been subject, and we 
were destined to be torn once again by Tolstoy's own description of the famine of 1891 of 



Leo Tolstoy 


10 


What Then Must We Do? 


which he writes in The Kingdom of God is Within You. Yet after making every allowance 
for primitive conditions in Russia, Tolstoy's presentation of the contrast between the 
overworked and the underfed poor on the one hand, and the idle and wasteful rich on the 
other, was felt as raising unanswerable questions in every country where the book, was 
read. We told ourselves in vain that the situation was over-simplified and that he had 
made it more logical than life warrants. 

'There was also in the minds of many of us at that moment a touch of impatience over the 
overwhelming concern of Tolstoy for personal righteousness. There was something 
almost talmudic in his passionate desire to fulfil the law literally, and to be clean, in the 
very decades when the leaders of Christian thought were emphasizing the social message 
of Christianity. But was not Tolstoy himself part of this very movement when he 
reiterated his conviction that the only method to better external conditions and to lessen 
the bitter and degrading sufferings of poverty was for each man to turn straight around in 
his path and to share quite simply and directly in the tasks of common labour? We know 
now only too well how inadequate such a method must be and yet we also know that in 
one sense there is no other way to make clear the possession of fresh moral insight and to 
formulate it for others who are unable to formulate it for themselves. 

'For many reasons, therefore, the indictment brought in What Then Must We Do? was 
almost unbearable to thousands of young people who read it in the late 'eighties and early 
'nineties. This was true, although we even then allowed for the inadequacy of Tolstoy's 
economic analysis and saw that rural conditions in Russia had become as obsolete in 
western society as had the cradle which the peasants were using to harvest their wheat. 

'Realizing also as we grow older that life can never be logical and consistent, it still 
remains the fact that Tolstoy makes complacency as impossible now as when What Then 
Must We Do? first appeared. 

*** 

'Respect for hard, simple labour was reinforced if not glorified by Tolstoy's feeling in 
regard to it, and at the least, the desire remained to simplify one's personal living and to 
lessen one's selfish absorption of other people's labour. 

'How many of his readers found the sense of joyful release in labour that Tolstoy himself 
describes at the close of the book one cannot know, but this joy is one of the elements 
which remain distinctly in one's mind. The passage describing the release which Tolstoy 
finds in the wheat-field is one of the finest passages ever written even by that great 
master of literature. Tormented as he had been for years by the intolerable irritant of inner 
unrest, he tells how he found himself happier, kinder, and more serene, and how the 
problems that had beset him resolved themselves after he made his great decision and 
began his labouring days. This was, of course, in some degree a passing phase. The 
contradictory demands of his new way of life and those of his family, which his reason as 
well as his affection admitted as legitimate - and perhaps also his own complexities of 
temperament and experience - made it impossible for him to work out a permanent, self- 
consistent, and satisfactory scheme of life. He never appeared as a triumphant man, and 



What Then Must We Do? 


11 


Leo Tolstoy 


the problems described in this book were never successfully solved, but beset him to the 
very end. The fact that this was so is due to the greatness of the man at least as much as to 
his weaknesses. He would not pretend and, above all, he would not deceive himself, nor 
his readers. 

'It may be no clearer to us than it was to him that a righteous life cannot be lived in a 
society that is not righteous. It was clearer to him than it has been to any others, save to a 
small handful of shining souls, that the true man can attempt nothing less and that society 
can be made righteous in no other way.' 

Under the stress of his intense feeling that none of the other demands of life mattered in 
comparison with the duty of enabling the common man to have enough bread to eat, 
Tolstoy in this book speaks disparagingly even of artistic activity, which was almost the 
chief interest of his own life. But it should not be forgotten that after another fifteen 
years' reflection on the great problem of the connection between life and art, he entirely 
re- stated his mature opinion of that matter, and showed that art is 'a spiritual organ of 
human life that cannot be destroyed ... and an organ co-equally important with science for 
the life and progress of mankind'. 

The letter to Engelhardt which forms the concluding portion of this volume was written 
about the time that Tolstoy began to write What Then Must We Do? - which occupied 
him for some four years. The opposition he was to encounter in his own home was then a 
new experience, and there is something extremely moving in the cry of distress wrung 
from him in the last pages of that letter. 

His martyrdom was less dramatic than that of Socrates and others who laid down their 
lives rather than sacrifice their beliefs, but the prolonged pressure to which he was 
exposed - not only at home but also by the literary circle of his contemporaries, by the 
Church, by the Government whose censor watched him as a cat does a mouse, and by the 
police who kept him under supervision, threatening him, and banishing his secretary and 
his friends-was a not less exacting test of his steadfast sincerity than a swifter and more 
public execution would have been. 

AYLMER MAUDE. 


June 1935 



Leo Tolstoy 


12 


What Then Must We Do? 


CHAPTER I 


I HAD spent my life in the country, and when in 1881 I came to live in Moscow the sight 
of town poverty surprised me. I knew country poverty, but town poverty was new and in- 
comprehensible to me. In Moscow one cannot pass a street without meeting beggars, and 
beggars who are not like those in the country. They do not 'carry a bag and beg in Christ's 
name', as country beggars say of themselves; they go without a bag and do not beg. When 
you meet or pass them they generally only try to catch your eye; and according to your 
look they either ask or do not ask. I know one such beggar from among the gentry. The 
old man walks slowly, stooping at each step. When he meets you he stoops on one leg 
and seems to be making you a bow. If you stop he takes off his cockaded cap, bows 
again, and begs; but if you do not stop he makes as though this were merely his way of 
walking, and goes on, bowing in the same way on the other leg. He is a typical educated 
Moscow beggar. At first I did not know why they do not ask plainly. Afterwards I learnt 
this but still did not understand their position. 

Once, passing through the Afanasev side-street, I saw a policeman putting a ragged 
peasant who was swollen with dropsy, into an open cab. I asked: 'What is this for?' The 
policeman replied: 'For begging.' 'Is that forbidden?' 'It seems it's forbidden!' replied the 
policeman. 

The man with dropsy was taken away in the cab. I got into another cab and followed 
them. I wanted to find out whether it was really forbidden to ask alms and in what way it 
was repressed. I could not at all understand that it should be possible to forbid a man s 
asking another man for anything; and also I could not believe that asking alms was 
forbidden, for Moscow was full of beggars. I entered the police station to which the 
beggar was taken. There a man who had a sword and a pistol was sitting at a table. I 
asked: 'What has that peasant been arrested for?' The man with the sword and pistol 
looked at me sternly and said: 'What business is it of yours?' Feeling however that he 
ought to explain something to me, he added: 'The authorities order such people to be 
arrested, so it has to be done.' I went out. The policeman who had brought the beggar in 
was sitting o~ a windowsill in the entrance-hall looking dejectedly at a note-book. I asked 
him: 'Is it true that beggars are forbidden to ask in Christ's name for alms?' The 
policeman roused himself, looked up at me, and then did not exactly frown but seemed to 
drowse off again, and sitting on the window-. sill said: 'The authorities order it, so that 
means it's necessary'; and he occupied himself again with his note-book. I went out into 
the porch to the cabman. 

'Well, what's happened? Have they arrested him?' asked the cabman. He, too, was 
evidently interested in this affair. 

'They have,' I replied. The cabman shook his head disapprovingly. 

How is it that it is forbidden, in this Moscow of yours, to ask alms in Christ's name?' I in- 
quired. 

'Who knows?' said the cabman. 

How is it?' I said. 'The destitute are Christ's folk, yet they take this man to a police- 
station.' 'Nowadays that is the law. Begging is not allowed.' 



What Then Must We Do? 


13 


Leo Tolstoy 


After that I several times saw how the police took beggars to a police-station and 
afterwards to the Usupov workhouse. Once, on the Myasnitski street, I met a crowd of 
these beggars, some thirty of them. In front and behind went policemen. I asked: 'What is 
it for?' 'For asking alms.' 

It turned out that in Moscow, by law, all the beggars (of whom one meets several in every 
street, and rows of whom stand outside every church when service is on, and who 
regularly attend every funeral) are forbidden to beg. 

But why some are caught and shut up and others not, I was never able to understand. 
Either there are among them some legal and some illegal beggars, or there are so many 
that they cannot all be caught, or else as quickly as some are captured others appear. 

There are in Moscow beggars of all sorts. 

There are some who live by it, and there are genuine beggars who have come to Moscow 
for some reason or other and are really destitute. 

Among these latter there are many simple peasants, both men and women, wearing 
peasant clothes. I often meet them. Some of them have fallen ill here and have come out 
of hospital and can neither support themselves nor get away from Moscow. Some of them 
have also taken to drink (as no doubt had the man who was ill with dropsy); some are not 
ill but have lost their all in a fire, or are old, or-are women with children; while some are 
quite healthy and capable of working. These quite healthy peasants, asking alms, 
interested me particularly; for since I came to Moscow I had for the sake of exercise 
formed the habit of going to work at the Sparrow Hills with two peasants who sawed 
wood there. These two men were just like those I met in the streets. One was Peter, a 
soldier from Kaluga; the other was Semen, a peasant from Vladimir. They owned nothing 
but the clothes on their backs and their own hands. With those hands by working very 
hard they earned 40 to 45 kopeks (lOd. to lid.) a day, of which they both put something 
by: Peter, to buy a sheepskin coat, and Semen, for the journey back to his village. For this 
reason I was particularly interested in such people when I met them in the streets. 

Why do these work and those beg? 

On meeting such a peasant I generally asked how he came to be in such a state. I once 
met a healthy peasant whose beard was beginning to go grey. He begged. I asked who he 
was and where he was from. He said he had come from Kaluga to find work. At first he 
had found some work cutting up old timber for firewood. He and his mate cut up all the 
wood at one place. Then he looked for another job but found none. His mate left him, and 
now he had been knocking about for a fortnight having eaten all he possessed, and he had 
nothing with which to buy either a saw or an axe. I gave him money for a saw and told 
him where he could come and work. (I had arranged beforehand with Peter and Semen to 
take on another man and to find him a mate.) 

'Well then, be sure and come. There is plenty of work there,' said I. 

'I'll come of course I'll come. Does one l ik e to go begging?' said he. 'I can work.' 

He swore he would come, and it seemed to me he was in earnest and meant to. 

Next day I joined my acquaintances the peasants and asked if the man had turned up. He 
had not. And several others deceived me in the same way. I was also cheated by men who 



Leo Tolstoy 


14 


What Then Must We Do? 


said they only needed money to buy a railway ticket home, but whom I met on the street 
again a week later. Many such I recognized and they recognized me; but sometimes, 
having forgotten me, they told me the same story again. Some of them turned away on 
seeing me. So I learned that among this class too there are many cheats; but I was very 
sorry for these cheats; they were a half-clad, poor, thin, sickly folk: the kind of people 
who really freeze to death or hang themselves, as we learn from the papers. 


CHAPTER II 

WHEN I spoke to Moscovites of this destitution in the city I was always told, 'Oh, what 
you have seen is nothing! Go to Khitrov market and see the dosshouses there. That's 
where you'll see the real "Golden Company"!' 

One jester told me it was no longer a 'Company', but had become a 'Golden Regiment'- 
there are now so many of them. The jester was right; but he would have been still more 
so had he said that in Moscow these people are now neither a company nor a regiment 
but a whole army numbering, I suppose, about 50,000. Old inhabitants when telling me of 
town poverty always spoke of it with a kind of pleasure-as if proud of knowing about it. I 
remember also that when I was in London, people there spoke boastfully of London 
pauperism: 'Just look what it is like here!' 

I wanted to see this destitution about which I had been told, and several times I set out to- 
wards Khitrov market, but each time I felt uncomfortable and ashamed. 'Why go to look 
at the sufferings of people I cannot help?' said one voice within me: 'If you live here and 
see all the allurements of town-life, go and see that also,' said another voice; and so one 
frosty windy day in December 1881, I went to the heart of the town destitution-Khitrov 
market. It was a week-day, towards four o'clock. In Solyanka Street I already noticed 
more and more people wearing strange clothes not made for them, and yet stranger foot- 
gear; people with a peculiar, unhealthy complexion, and especially with an air, common 
to them all, of indifference to everything around them. A man went along, quite at his 
ease dressed in most strange, impossible clothes and evidently quite regardless of what he 
looked like to others. All these people were going in one direction. Without asking the 
way (which I did not know) I went with them, and came to Khitrov market. There were 
women of a similar type, in all sorts of capes, cloaks, jackets, boots and goloshes, equally 
at ease in spite of the hideousness of their garb; old and young they sat trading in goods 
of some sort, walking about, scolding and swearing. There were few people in the mar- 
ket. It was evidently over, and most of the people were ascending the hill, going through 
and past the market all in one direction. I followed them. The farther I went the more 
people of that sort there seemed to be, all going one way. Passing the market and going 
up the street I overtook two women: one old, the other young. Both wore tattered, drab 
clothes. They went along talking about some affair. 

After each necessary word one or two unnecessary and most indecent words were uttered. 
Neither of them was drunk, they were preoccupied with something, and the men who met 
them and those who were behind and in front of them paid no attention to their way of 
speaking which seemed to me so strange. It was evident that here people always talked 
like that. To the left were private dosshouses, and some turned into them while others 
went farther. Ascending the hill we came to a large corner house. Most of those among 



What Then Must We Do? 


15 


Leo Tolstoy 


whom I had been walking stopped there. All along the pavement and on the snow in the 
street people of the same type stood and sat. To the right of the entrance door were the 
women, to the left the men. I passed both the women and the men (there were some 
hundreds of them), and stopped where the line ended. The house outside which they were 
waiting was the Lyapin Free Night-Lodging-House. The crowd were lodgers awaiting 
admission. At 5 p.m. the doors open and people are let in. Nearly all those I had 
overtaken were on their way here. 

I stopped where the line of men ended. Those nearest began to look at me and drew me to 
them by their glances. The tatters covering their bodies were very various, but the 
expression in all the eyes directed towards me was just the same. They all seemed to ask: 
'Why have you, a man from a different world, stopped near us? Who are you? A self- 
satisfied rich man who wishes to enjoy our misery to relieve his dullness and to torture us 
or are you what does not and cannot exist-a man who pities us?' This question was on 
every face. They joked, caught my eye, and turned away. I wanted to speak to some one 
of them, but could not make up my mind to do so for a long time. But while we were yet 
silent our glances already drew us together. Widely as life had divided us, after our 
glances had met twice or thrice, we felt that we were akin and we ceased to tear one 
another. Nearest to me stood a peasant with a swollen face and a red beard, in a torn coat 
and with worn-out galoshes on his bare feet. There were eight degrees Reaumur 1 of frost. 
I met his glance three or four times, and felt so near to him that instead of being ashamed 
to speak to him I should have been ashamed not to say something. I asked where he came 
from. He answered readily and began talking, while others drew near. He was from 
Smolensk, and had come to seek work, hoping to be able to buy grain and pay his taxes. 
'There is no work to be got,' said he. 'The soldiers 2 have taken all the work. So I am 
knocking about, and God knows I have not eaten for two days!' He spoke timidly, with an 
attempt at a smile. A seller of hot drinks, 3 an old soldier, was standing near and I called 
him. He poured out a glass. The peasant took it in his hands and, trying not to lose any of 
the heat, warmed them with it before drinking. While doing so he told me his adventures 
(the adventures, or the stories of them told by these men, were almost all alike). He had 
had a little work but it came to an end; and then his purse with his passport and what 
money he had had been stolen here in the Night-Lodging-House. Now he could not get 
away from Moscow. He said that during the day he warmed himself in the drink-shops 
and ate scraps of bread which were sometimes given to him; but sometimes they drove 
him out. He got his night's lodging free in Lyapin House. He was now only waiting for a 
police-search, when he would be put in prison for having no passport, and sent by etape 4 
to his native place. 'They say there will be a police search on Thursday,' added he. (Prison 
and the etape were to him like the Promised Land.) 

While he was telling me this two or three others among the crowd confirmed his words 
and said they were in the same plight. A lean youth, pale, long-nosed, with nothing over 
his shirt (which was tom at the shoulder) and with a peakless cap, pushed his way 


1 Fourteen degrees above zero Fahrenheit. -A. M. 

2 Soldiers were often hired out to work at cheap rates.- A. M. 

3 sbiten, made with honey and spices.-A. M. 

4 On foot, with others, under escort. -A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


16 


What Then Must We Do? 


sidelong to me through the crowd. He was shivering violently all the time, but tried to 
smile contemptuously at the peasant's speech, thinking thereby to adapt himself to my 
tone, and he looked me in the face. I offered him, too, some sbiten. On taking the glass he 
also warmed his hands on it, but he had only begun to speak when he was shoved aside 
by a big, black, aquiline-nosed fellow in a print shirt and a waistcoat but no cap. The 
aquiline-nosed man asked for some sbiten. Then followed a tall, drunken old man with a 
pointed beard, in an overcoat tied round the waist with a cord, and wearing bast-shoes. 
Then came a little fellow with a swollen face and watery eyes, in a brown nankeen pea- 
jacket, with bare knees showing through the holes in his summer trousers and knocking 
together from cold. He shivered so that he could not hold the glass but spilled it over 
himself. The others began to abuse him, but he only smiled pitifully and shivered. Then 
came a crooked, deformed man in tatters, and with strips of linen tied round his bare feet; 
then something that looked like an officer, then something that looked like a cleric, then 
something strange and noseless: all, hungry, cold, importunate and submissive, crowded 
round me and pressed near the sbiten till it was all finished. One man asked for money 
and I gave him some. Another asked, and a third, and then the crowd besieged me. 
Disorder and a crush ensued. A porter from the next house shouted to them to get off the 
pavement in front of his house and they submissively obeyed his command. Organizers 
appeared among the crowd, who took me under their protection. They wished to extricate 
me from the crush; but the crowd that had at first stretched along the pavement had now 
become disorganized and gathered round me. They all looked at me and begged; and 
each face was more pitiful, more jaded, and more degraded than, the last. I gave away all 
I had with me, which was not much, only some twenty rubles (£2), and following the 
crowd I entered the Night-Lodging-House. It was an immense building consisting of four 
departments. On the top stories were the men's lodgings and on the lower stories the 
women's. First I entered the latter: a large room all filled with bunks like the berths in 
third-class Russian railway cars. They were arranged in two tiers, above and below. 
Women old and young strange, tattered, with no outdoor garments entered and took 
possession of their bunks: some below and some above. Some of the older ones crossed 
themselves and prayed for the founder of this refuge. Others laughed and swore. I went 
upstairs. There the men were taking their places. Among them I saw one of those to 
whom I had given money. On seeing him I suddenly felt dreadfully ashamed and hurried 
away. Arid feeling as if I had committed a crime, I left the house and went home. There, 
ascending the carpeted steps to the cloth-carpeted hall and taking off my fur coat, I sat 
down to a five-course dinner, served by two lackeys in dress clothes with white ties and 
white gloves. 

Thirty years ago in Paris I once saw how, in the presence of thousands of spectators, they 
cut a man's head off with a guillotine. I knew that the man was a dreadful criminal; I 
knew all the arguments that have been written in defence of that kind of action, and I 
knew it was done deliberately and intentionally, but at the moment the head and body 
separated and fell into the box I gasped, and realized not with my mind nor with my heart 
but with my whole being, that all the arguments in defence of capital punishment are 
wicked nonsense, and that however many people may combine to commit murder-the 
worst of all crimes - and whatever they may call themselves, murder remains murder, and 
that this crime had been committed before my eyes, and I by my presence and non- 
intervention had approved and shared in it. In the same way now, at the sight of the 



What Then Must We Do? 


17 


Leo Tolstoy 


hunger, cold, and degradation of thousands of people, I understood not with my mind or 
my heart but with my whole being; that the existence of tens of thousands of such people 
in Moscow-while I and thousands of others over-eat ourselves with beef-steaks and 
sturgeon and cover our horses and floors with cloth or carpets-no matter what all the 
learned men in the world may say about its necessity - is a crime, not committed once but 
constantly; and that I with my luxury not merely tolerate it but share in it. For me the 
difference between these two impressions was only-that there all I could have done 
would have been to cry out to the murderers, who stood around the guillotine arranging 
the murder, that they were doing wrong, and to have tried by all means to hinder it. Even: 
then I should have known in advance that my action would not prevent the murder. But 
here I could have given not sbiten alone and the trifling sum of money I had with me, but 
the overcoat I wore and all I had at home. But I had not done it, and I therefore felt and 
feel and shall not cease to feel that as long as I have any superfluous food and someone 
else has none, and I have two coats and someone else has none, I share in a constantly 
repeated crime. 


CHAPTER III 

THAT same evening after returning from Lyapin House I told my impressions to a 
friend. He, a town dweller, began to explain with some satisfaction that it was the most 
natural thing in a city, and that it was merely my provincialism that caused me to see 
anything particular in it. Things had always been so and would and must always be so; it 
is an inevitable condition of civilization. In London it is still worse ... so there is nothing 
bad in it and one ought not to be dissatisfied with it. I began to answer my friend; but I 
did it so warmly and irritably that my wife ran in from an adjoining room to ask what had 
happened. It seems that, without noticing it, I had cried out with tears in my voice and 
had waved my arms at my friend, exclaiming: 'One cannot live so; one cannot; one can- 
not!' They put me to shame for my unnecessary ardour, and told me that I cannot talk 
quietly about anything but become unpleasantly excited, and in particular they proved to 
me that the existence of such unfortunate people cannot justify my spoiling the lives of 
those about me. 

I felt that this was quite just, and I was silenced; but in the depth of my heart I felt that I 
too was right, and I could not feel at ease. 

Town life, which had seemed strange and foreign to me before, now became so repulsive 
that all the pleasures of the luxurious life I formerly enjoyed became a torment to me. 
And try as I would to find in my soul some justification for our way of living, I could not 
without irritation behold either my own or any other drawing room, or any clean, 
elegantly laid table, or a carriage with well-fed coachmen and horses, or the shops, 
theatres, and assemblies. I could not help seeing beside them the hungry, cold, down- 
trodden inhabitants of Lyapin House. I could not escape the thought that these two things 
were connected and the one resulted from the other. I remember that the consciousness of 
guilt which I experienced from the first moment remained with me, but another feeling 
was soon added to it, obscuring it. 

When I spoke of my impressions of Lyapin House to intimate friends and acquaintances, 
they all replied as the first one (at whom I shouted) had done, but they also expressed 



Leo Tolstoy 


18 


What Then Must We Do? 


approval of my kind-heartedness and susceptibility and gave me to understand that the 
sight had acted so strongly on me merely because I Leo Tolstoy-am a very kind and good 
man. I willingly believed them. And before I had time to look round there came to me, 
instead of the feeling of shame and repentance I had first experienced, a feeling of 
satisfaction at my own beneficence, and a desire to exhibit it. 

'Really,' said I to myself, 'the fault probably lies not in my luxury but in the inevitable 
conditions of life. An alteration in my life cannot cure the evils I have seen. By altering 
my life I shall only make myself and those near me unhappy, while the destitute will 
remain as badly off as ever. 

'Therefore the task for me is not to change my own life, as I thought at first, but as far as I 
can to aid in improving the position of those unfortunates who have evoked my 
sympathy. The fact of the matter is that I am a very good, kind man, and wish to benefit 
my neighbours.' So I began to devise a plan of philanthropic activity in which I could 
exhibit my goodness. I should mention, however, that when devising this philanthropic 
activity I felt all the time in the depth of my soul that it was not the right thing, but, as 
often happens, reasoning and imagination stifled the voice of conscience. It happened that 
preparations were being made at that time for the Census. This seemed a good 
opportunity for starting the charity in which I wished to exhibit my goodness. I knew of 
many philanthropic organizations and societies in Moscow, but all their activities seemed 
to me falsely directed and insignificant in comparison with what I aimed at. So I planned 
the following: to arouse sympathy for town poverty among the rich; to collect money, 
enrol people willing to help in the affair, and with the Census-takers to visit all the dens 
of destitution and, besides compiling the Census, get into touch with the unfortunates and 
investigate their needs, helping them with money and work or by getting them back to 
their villages, as well as by putting their children to school and the old folk into refuges 
and almshouses. More than that, I thought that from among those engaged in this work a 
permanent society could be formed which, dividing the districts of Moscow among its 
members, would see that poverty and destitution should not be allowed to breed, but 
would constantly nip them in the bud and perform the duty not so much of curing town 
poverty as of preventing it. I already imagined that, not to speak of the totally destitute, 
there would be none left in want in the town, and that I should have accomplished all this; 
and that we, the rich, could afterwards sit at ease in our drawing-rooms, eat five-course 
dinners and drive in carriages to theatres and assemblies, untroubled by such sights as I 
had witnessed at Lyapin House. 

Having formed this plan I wrote an article about it, and before sending it for publication I 
went about among my acquaintances from whom I hoped to receive help. To all whom I 
saw that day (I specially addressed myself to the rich) I said the same thing - almost 
exactly what I said in the article. I proposed to take advantage of the Census to become 
acquainted with the Moscow destitute and to come to their aid with work and money, and 
to take, such action as would abolish destitution in Moscow; and then we, the rich, could 
with quiet consciences enjoy the good things to which we are accustomed. They all 
listened to me attentively and seriously, but with all of them without exception the same 
thing occurred. As soon as they understood what it was about, they became ill at ease and 
rather shamefaced. It was as though they were ashamed chiefly on my account - that I 
should talk nonsense, but a kind of nonsense which it was impossible plainly to call 



What Then Must We Do? 


19 


Leo Tolstoy 


nonsense. It was as though some external cause obliged them to be indulgent to this 
nonsense of mine. 

'Ah! yes, of course! It would be a very good idea,' said they. 'Of course one can't help 
sympathizing with it. Yes, your idea is excellent. I had a similar idea myself, but... our 
people are so indifferent that one mustn't expect much success... For my part, however, I 
shall of course be ready to help.' 

They all said something like that. They all agreed, but as it seemed to me not because 
they were convinced nor from any wish of their own, but from some external cause which 
prevented their not agreeing. I noticed this also from the fact that not one of those who 
promised to help with money fixed the sum he or she intended to give; so that I had to fix 
it by asking, 'Then I may count on you for three hundred, or two hundred, or one 
hundred, or twenty-five rubles?' and not one of them handed me the money. I mention 
this because when people give money for what they want, they generally give it 
promptly. For a box at the theatre to see Sarah Bernhardt they hand, over the money at 
once, to clinch the matter. But here of those who had agreed to give money and had 
expressed their sympathy not one offered the money at once, but they only tacitly 
consented to the sums I named. At the last house I went to that day in the evening, I 
happened to find a large gathering. The hostess of that house has for some years been 
engaged in philanthropy. Several carriages stood at the entrance and several footmen in 
expensive liveries were sitting in the hall. In the large drawing-room, round two tables on 
which stood lamps, sat married and unmarried ladies in expensive clothes with expensive 
ornaments, dressing little dolls. Several young men were there also, near the ladies. The 
dolls these ladies were making were to be disposed of at a lottery for the poor. 

The sight of this drawing-room and of the people collected in it impressed me very un- 
pleasantly. Not to mention that the fortunes of the people there assembled amounted to 
some millions of rubles, or that the interest on the cost of their dresses, lace, bronzes, 
jewellery, carriages, horses, liveries, and footmen, would a hundred times exceed the 
value of their work, the cost of this one gathering alone: the gloves, clean linen, and 
conveyances, with the candles, tea, sugar and biscuits provided, must have exceeded a 
hundred times the value of the things produced. I saw all this and could therefore 
understand that here at any rate I should find no sympathy for my plan, but I had come to 
make the proposal, and, difficult as I felt it, I said my say (almost the same as was said in 
my article). 

Of those present, one lady said she was too sensitive to go among the poor herself but she 
would give money. How much, and when she would send it, she did not say. Another 
lady and a young man offered their services to go among the poor, but I did not avail 
myself of their offer. The chief person to whom I addressed myself told me it would not 
be possible to do much, for lack of means. Means would be lacking because the rich in 
Moscow were all well known and what could be got out of them had already been got. 
All the philanthropists had already received rank, medals and other honours, and for a 
monetary success' it would be essential to secure a fresh grant of honours from the 
Government, and this - the only thing that is really effective - is very difficult to obtain. 

After returning home that day I lay down to sleep not merely with a foreboding that my 
plan would come to nothing, but with a sense of shame and a consciousness that I had 



Leo Tolstoy 


20 


What Then Must We Do? 


been doing something very nasty and shameful all day. But I did not abandon the attempt. 
In the first place, it had been started and false shame kept me to it; secondly, the mere 
fact of being occupied with it enabled me to continue to live in the conditions habitual to 
me, while its failure would oblige me to abandon these and seek new ways of life - a 
thing I unconsciously dreaded. So I did not trust my inward voice, and continued what I 
had begun. 

Having given my article 1 to be printed, I read it in proof at the Town Duma. While 
reading it, I felt so uncomfortable that I hesitated and blushed to tears. I noticed that 
everybody present was also uncomfortable. On my asking, at the end of the reading, 
whether the Census organizers accepted my proposal that they should remain at their 
posts to act as intermediaries between society and the necessitous poor, an awkward 
silence ensued. Then two members made speeches. These, as it were, corrected the 
awkwardness of my proposal. Sympathy was expressed with my idea, but the 
impracticability of my thought (of which every one approved) was pointed out. After that 
all felt more at ease. But when subsequently, still wishing to carry my point, I asked the 
organizers separately whether they agreed to investigate the needs of the poor during the 
Census and to remain at their posts to serve as intermediaries between the poor and the 
rich, they all again appeared uncomfortable. Their looks seemed to say, 'There now, we 
smoothed over your folly out of respect for you, but you are again obtruding it!' That was 
what their looks said. But verbally they consented and two of them separately, as though 
by arrangement, remarked in the self-same words 'We consider ourselves morally bound 
to do it.' 

When I said to the students engaged to take the Census, that besides the usual aims of the. 
Census the aim of philanthropy needed also to be kept in view, my communication 
produced a similar effect on them. I noticed that when we talked about it they were 
ashamed to look me in the face, as one is ashamed to look a kindly man in the face when 
he talks nonsense. My article had the same effect on the newspaper editor to whom I gave 
it, and also on my son, and on my wife, and on the most diverse people. All, for some 
reason, felt uncomfortable, but all considered it necessary to approve of my idea, and all 
after expressing approval at once began to express doubts of its success; and all without 
exception began also to condemn the indifference and coldness of society and of 
everybody, except (evidently) themselves. 

In the depth of my soul I continued to feel that all this was not the right thing, and that 
nothing would come of it; but the article was printed and I undertook to take part in the 
Census. First I had started the affair and now it dragged me along. 


CHAPTER IV 

AT my request they allotted me for the Census the district in the Khamovniki ward near 
the Smolensk market, along Protochny side-street between Riverside Passage and 
Nikolski side- street, in which are situated the houses generally called Rzhanov house or 
Rzhanov fortress. These houses formerly belonged to a merchant named Rzhanov, but 


1 About the Census in Moscow, 1882.-A. M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


21 


Leo Tolstoy 


now belong to the Zimins. I had long heard of it as a den of most terrible poverty and vice 
and had therefore asked the organizers to let me take that district. 

After receiving instructions from the Town Duma, I went - a few days before the Census 
to inspect my district, and easily found Rzhanov house by the plan they gave me... 

I entered the adjoining Nikolski side-street. This ends on the left with a gloomy house 
which has no exit on that side, and by its appearance I guessed that this was the Rzhanov 
fortress. 

Descending the slope of the Nikolski street I overtook some boys of ten to fourteen years 
old, in jackets or thin coats, sliding down the slope or going on one skate along the frozen 
pavement by that house. The boys were ragged and l ik e town boys in general they were 
alert and impudent. I stopped to look at them. From round the corner appeared a ragged 
old woman with sallow flabby cheeks. She was going towards the Smolensk market- 
place and wheezing like a broken-winded horse at each step she took. On coming up to 
me she paused, breathing hoarsely. Anywhere else this old woman would have asked me 
for money, but here she only began talking. 'See,' she said, pointing to the skating boys, 
'all they do is to get into mischief. They will be just such Rzhanovites as their fathers.' 
One of the boys, in an overcoat and a cap that had lost its peak, heard what she said and 
stopped. 'What are you rowing at us for?' he shouted at the old woman. 'You are a 
Rzhanov bitch yourself!' 'And do you live here?' I asked the boy. 'Yes, and she lives here. 
She stole the leg of a boot!' shouted the boy and, putting a foot out in front of him, skated 
away. The old woman broke out into a stream of abuse interrupted by coughs. Just then 
an old man all in rags, with quite white hair, came along the middle of the road descend- 
ing the slope and swinging his hands, in one of which was a string of bread-stuff and 
cracknell rings. The old man had the appearance of one who had just fortified himself 
with a glass of vodka. He had evidently heard the old woman's scoldings, and he took her 
part. 'I'll give it you, little devils, uh!' shouted he at the boys, pretending to make for 
them; and having reached me, he came onto the pavement. On the Arbat 1 this old man 
would strike one by his age, his weakness, and his destitution. Here he was a merry 
workman returning from his day's work. 

I followed the old man. He turned the corner to the left into the Protochny side-street, and 
having gone the whole length of the house and its gates he disappeared into a tavern. 

Two gates and several doors open onto the Protochny side-street; there are taverns, gin 
shops, some provision shops and others. This is the Rzhanov fortress itself. Everything 
here is grey, dirty, and stinking-the building, the lodgings, the yard, and the people. Most 
of those I met here were ragged and half-dressed. Some walked and some ran from one 
door to another. Two were bargaining about some rag or other. I went round the whole 
building from the Protochny side-street and the Riverside passage, and on returning I 
stopped at one of the gates. I wanted to enter to see what was going on inside, but felt 
timid about it; what was I to say if asked what I wanted? After some hesitation, however, 
I entered the gate. As soon as I did so I noticed an abominable stench. The yard was 
horribly filthy. I turned a corner and at that moment, upstairs to the left, heard the clatter 
of feet running on the wooden gallery, first along the boards of the balcony and then 


1 One of the main streets of Moscow. -A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


22 


What Then Must We Do? 


down the steps of the staircase . 1 A lean woman in a faded pink dress, with turned-up 
sleeves and with boots on her stockingless feet, ran out first. Following her came a shock- 
headed man in a red shirt and very wide trousers that looked like a petticoat, and with 
goloshes on his feet. At the bottom of the stairs the man seized the woman: 'You won't 
get away!' said he, laughing. 'Listen to the squint-eyed devil!' began the woman, 
evidently flattered by his pursuit, but she caught sight of me and shouted angrily: 'What 
do you want?' As I did not want anybody I grew confused and went away. There was 
nothing remarkable about all this; but this incident, after what I had seen outside in the 
street: the scolding old woman, the merry old man, and. the sliding boys, suddenly 
showed me quite a new side of the affair I was engaged on. I had set out to benefit these 
people by the help of the rich, and here for the first time I realized that all these 
unfortunates whom I wished to benefit, besides the hours they spend suffering from 
hunger and cold and waiting for a night's lodging, have also time to devote to something 
else. There is the rest of the twenty four hours every day, and there is a whole life about 
which I had never thought. Here for the first time I understood that all these people, 
besides needing food and shelter, must also pass twenty-four hours each day which they, 
like the rest of us, have to live. I understood that they must be angry, and dull, and must 
pluck up courage, and mourn, and make merry. Strange to say, I now for the first time 
understood clearly that the business I had undertaken could not consist merely in feeding 
and clothing a thousand people as one feeds and drives under shelter a thousand sheep; 
but that it must consist in doing them good. And when I understood that each of these 
thousand people was a human being with a past; and with passions, temptations, and 
errors, and thoughts and questions, like my own, and was such a man as myself-then the 
thing I had undertaken suddenly appeared so difficult that I realized my impotence. But it 
had been started, and I went on with, it. 


CHAPTER V 

ON the first appointed day the student Census takers began work in the morning, but I, 
the philanthropist, did not join them till towards noon. I could not get there sooner 
because I only got up at ten, and then drank coffee and had to smoke to help my 
digestion. I reached the gates of the Rzhanov house at twelve o'clock. A policeman 
showed me the tavern on the Riverside passage, to which the Census-takers had said 
anyone should be shown who asked for them. I went into the tavern. It was very dark, 
smelly, and dirty. Straight before me was a bar, on the left a small room with tables 
covered with dirty table-cloths, on the right a large room with columns and similar tables 
at the window and by the walls. At some of the tables men, tattered or decently dressed, 
probably workmen or small shopkeepers, and some women, sat having tea. The tavern 
was very dirty but one saw at once that business was good. The look of the man at the bar 
was business-like and the waiters were prompt and attentive: I had hardly entered before 
an attendant was ready to help me off with my overcoat and to take any order I might 
give. It was evident that habits of prompt and attentive work had been established. I 
inquired about the Census-takers. 'Vanya!' cried a small man, dressed German-fashion, 
who was arranging something in a cupboard behind the bar; this was the owner of the 


1 


The courtyard was enclosed by the house, which had a balcony all round it looking onto the yard. -A. M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


23 


Leo Tolstoy 


tavern, Ivan Fedotych ?' Kaluga peasant who leased half the lodgings in Zimin's houses, 
sub-letting them to lodgers. An attendant ran up, a lad of eighteen, thin, hook-nosed, and 
with a yellow complexion. Take the gentleman to the Census-takers' they are in the big 
building above the well-get along.' 

The lad laid down his napkin and put on an overcoat over his white shirt and white 
trousers, 1 as well as a cap with a large peak, and rapidly moving his white legs he led me 
through a back door that closed by a counter-weight. In the lobby of a greasy smelly 
kitchen we met an old woman who was carefully carrying some very malodorous tripe in 
a rag. From the lobby we descended into the sloping yard all covered by a wooden 
building, with the lower story of brick. The stench in this, yard was very strong. The 
centre of this stench was the privy, around which always, every time I passed, people 
were crowding. The privy itself was not the place where people relieved themselves, but 
it served to indicate the place around which it had become customary to relieve oneself. 
Passing through the yard it was impossible not to notice that place; it always felt stifling 
when one entered the acrid atmosphere of the smell that came from it. 

The lad, careful of his white trousers, cautiously led me past that place over the frozen 
filth, and made his way to one of the buildings. The people passing through the yard and 
along the galleries all stopped to look at me. Evidently a cleanly dressed man was a 
prodigy in these parts. 

The lad asked a woman whether she had not seen where the Census-takers were, and 
three or more men immediately answered his question; some said they were above the 
well, but others said that they had been there but had left and had gone to Nikita 
Ivanovich. An old man with nothing over his shirt, who was adjusting his clothes near the 
privy, said they were in No. 30. The boy decided that this information was the most 
probable, and led me to No. 30 under the penthouse of the basement story, into darkness 
and stench different from that of the yard. We descended into the lower story and went 
along the earth floor of a dark corridor. While we were passing along the corridor one of 
the doors opened abruptly and from it emerged a drunken old man with nothing over his 
shirt, who was apparently not a peasant. A washerwoman with bared and soapy arms was 
driving and pushing this man out with shrill screams. Vanya, my conductor, pushed the 
drunken man aside and reproved him. 'It won't do to make such scenes,' said he, 'and you 
an officer too!' 

We came to the door of No. 30. Vanya pulled at it. The door came unstuck with a 
smacking sound, opened, and we became aware of an odour of soapy steam and an acrid 
smell of bad food and tobacco. We entered into complete darkness. The windows were on 
the other side; but here were boarded corridors to right and left, with small doors at 
various angles leading into rooms roughly constructed of thin whitewashed boards. In a 
dark room to our left a woman was seen washing clothes at a trough. From a small door 
on the right an old woman looked out. Through another open door a hairy red-faced, 
peasant in bast-shoes was seen sitting on a board fixed to the wall, which did duty for a 
bed: he had his hands on his knees, swung his feet in his bast-shoes, and looked at them 
gloomily. 


1 In the class of tavern referred to (a traktir) the waiters always wore white cotton blouses and trousers, 
Russian style. 



Leo Tolstoy 


24 


What Then Must We Do? 


At the end of the corridor was a little door leading into the room where the Census-takers 
were. This was the room of the landlady of the whole of No. 30; she rented the whole of 
it from Ivan Fedotych and let it out to the tenants and night-lodgers. In that tiny room of 
hers, under a tinfoil icon, sat a student Census-taker with his cards, and like an 
investigating magistrate questioned a peasant in a shirt and waistcoat. This, was a friend 
of the landlady, who was answering the questions on her behalf. There also was the 
landlady - an old woman - and two inquisitive lodgers. When I had entered, the room was 
quite crowded. I squeezed up to the table. The student and I exchanged greetings, and he 
continued his questions. But I began to observe and to interrogate the lodgers who were 
living there, for my own purpose. 

It turned out that in this first lodging I did not find a single person on whom to expend 
my benevolence. The landlady, in spite of the poverty, smallness, and dirt of her lodging, 
which struck me after the mansions in which I live, had a sufficiency even in comparison 
with the poor of the town; and in comparison with village poverty, which I knew well, 
she was living in luxury. She had a feather bed, a quilted coverlet, a samovar, a warm 
coat, and a cupboard with crockery. Her friend had a similarly comfortable appearance. 
He even had a watch and chain. The lodgers were poor, but not one of them was in 
immediate need of assistance. Help was asked by the woman' washing clothes at the wash 
trough, who had been left by her husband with children on her hands; by an old widow- 
woman who said she had nothing to live on; and by the peasant in bast-shoes who told 
me he had not eaten that day. But on inquiry it appeared that none of these people was 
particularly in need and that in order to aid them one would have to get to know them 
well. 

When I offered to place her children in a children's home, the woman abandoned by her 
husband grew confused, considered a bit, thanked me very much, but evidently did not 
want that: she would have preferred a gift of money. The eldest girl helped her with the 
washing and the middle one took care of the little boy. The old woman begged hard to be 
put in an alms-house, but when I looked at the corner she lived in I saw that she was not 
destitute. She had a small trunk with goods in it, a teapot with a tin spout, two cups, and 
boxes that had held sweets and now had tea and sugar in them. She knitted socks and 
gloves and had a monthly allowance from a benefactress. What the peasant for his part 
evidently wanted was not something to eat but something to drink, and all that might be 
given him would go to the gin-shop. So that in that lodging there were none of those with 
whom, as I fancied, the house overflowed-people whom I could make happy by a gift of 
money. They were, It seemed to me, poor people of a dubious kind. I noted down the old 
woman, the woman with children, and the peasant, and decided that they would have to 
be attended to, but only after I had attended to those specially unfortunate ones whom I 
expected to find in that house. I decided that in the help we were going to distribute there 
must be a sequence: first would come the most unfortunate, and afterwards these people. 
But in the next and the next lodging it was the same thing. All the people were of the 
same kind, cases one would have to look into more carefully before helping them. I did 
not find any unfortunates who could be made fortunate by a mere gift of money. 
Ashamed as lam to admit it, I began to feel disappointed at not seeing in these houses 
anything like what I had expected. I thought I should find people of an exceptional kind, 
but when I had been to all the lodgings I became convinced that the inhabitants of these 
houses are not at all exceptional, but are just such people as those among whom I live. 



What Then Must We Do? 


25 


Leo Tolstoy 


Among them, as among us, there were some more or less good and more or less bad, 
more or less happy and more or less miserable; and the unhappy were just such as exist 
among ourselves; people whose unhappiness depends not on external conditions but on 
themselves - a kind of unhappiness bank-notes cannot cure. 


CHAPTER VI 

THE dwellers in these houses form the lowest layer of the town population, of whom 
there are in Moscow probably more than a hundred thousand. Here in this house were 
representatives of all sections of this population: small employers and artisans, boot 
makers, brush makers, carpenters, joiners, cobblers, tailors, and smiths, and here too were 
cabmen and men trading on their own account, also women who kept stalls, 
washerwomen, dealers in old clothes, petty money-lenders, day-labourers, and people 
with no fixed occupation, as well as beggars and dissolute women. 

Many of the very people I had seen at the entrance to Lyapin House were here, but here 
they were distributed among many workers. And moreover, whereas I had then seen them 
at their most wretched time when they had eaten and drunk all they possessed: and when, 
cold, naked, and driven from the taverns, they were waiting, as for heavenly manna, for 
admission into the free Night-Lodging-House to be taken thence to the promised land of 
prison and sent under police escort back to their villages-here I saw them scattered among 
a large number of workers and at a time when one way or other they had obtained three 
or five kopeks 1 to pay for a night's lodging, or perhaps even had some rubles to spend on 
food and drink. 

Strange as it may seem to say so, I did not here experience anything like the feeling I. had 
at Lyapin House. On the contrary, during the first round both I and the students had an 
almost pleasant feeling. Why do I say, 'almost pleasant'? That is untrue - the feeling 
produced by intercourse with these people, strange as it seems to say so, was simply a 
very pleasant one. 

The first impression was that the majority of those who lived here were working people, 
and very good-natured ones. 

We found most of them at work: washerwomen at their troughs, carpenters at their 
benches, boot makers on their stools. The narrow lodgings were full of people, and brisk, 
cheery work was going on. The place smelt of workmen's perspiration, and at the boot 
maker’s of leather, and at the carpenter's of shavings. One often heard singing, or saw 
sinewy bare arms quickly and skillfully performing accustomed movements. Everywhere 
we were greeted cheerily and kindly: almost everywhere our intrusion into the daily life 
of these people was far from evoking the pretension or desire to show off and reply curtly 
which was evoked by the Census-takers' call at the houses of most of the wealthy 
families, but on the contrary these people replied to all our questions properly, without 
attaching any special importance to them. Our questions merely gave them occasion to 
make merry and joke about how the return should be filled in, who ought to count as two, 
and which two as one, and so forth. 


1 A kopek was about a farthing. 



Leo Tolstoy 


26 


What Then Must We Do? 


We found many of them at dinner or tea, and every time in reply to our greeting: 'Bread 
and salt' or 'Tea and sugar', 1 they replied 'Please to join us', and even moved up to make 
room for us. Instead of the haunt of constantly changing inhabitants we thought we 
should find here, it turned out that in this house there were many lodgings in which 
people had lived a long time. One carpenter with his workmen, and a boot maker with his 
assistants, had been there for ten years. At the boot maker’s it was very dirty and 
crowded, but all the people at work were very cheerful I tried to talk with one of the 
workmen, wishing to hear from him of the misery of his position and of his being in debt 
to his master, but the workman did not understand me and spoke very well of his master 
and of his own life. 

In one lodging an old man lived with his old wife. They sold apples. Their room was 
warm, clean, and full of goods. The floor was spread with straw sacking which they got 
at the wholesale apple-dealers. There were trunks, cupboards, a samovar, and crockery. 
In the comer were many icons, with two little lamps burning before them; on the walls 
hung warm overcoats covered up with sheets. The old woman, who had star-shaped 
wrinkles, was affable, talkative, and apparently pleased at her own quiet well ordered life. 

Ivan Fedotych, the landlord of the tavern and the lodgings, came from the tavern and 
went along with us. He jested good-humouredly with many of the lodgers, calling them 
all by their Christian names and patronymics, " and gave us brief sketches of them. They 
were all people of ordinary types, Martin Semenoviches, Peter Petroviches, Mary 
Ivanovnas - people who did not consider themselves unfortunate, but considered 
themselves, and really were, like anyone else. 

We came prepared to see nothing but horrors; and instead of horrors we were shown 
something good that involuntarily evoked our respect. There were so many of these good 
people that the tattered, fallen, idle ones, scattered here and there among them, did not 
destroy the general impression. 

The students were not so much struck by this as I was. They had come simply to do 
something they considered to be of scientific value, and were incidentally making casual 
observations; but I was a philanthropist and came to help the unfortunate, perishing, 
depraved people I expected to find here. And instead of unfortunate, perishing, depraved 
people, I saw a majority of tranquil, contented, cheerful, kindly and very good working 
people. 

I felt this most vividly when in these lodgings I really came on some cases of crying need 
such as I was prepared to help. 

When I discovered such need I always found that it had already been met, and that the 
help I wished to render had already been given: given before I came, and by whom? By 
those same un-fortunate depraved creatures I was prepared to save; and given in a better 
way than I could have done. 

In one cellar lay a lonely old man, ill of typhus. He had no connexions. A widow with a 
little daughter - a stranger to him but his neighbour (occupying another comer of the 


Customary Russian folk-greetings to people having a meal. 

2 This is a usual Russian practice, but indicates some amount of familiarity with the lodgers on the part of 
the landlord. -A. M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


27 


Leo Tolstoy 


room he lived in) was looking after him. She gave him tea, and bought medicine for him 
out of her own money. In another room lay a woman suffering from puerperal fever. A 
woman of the town was rocking the baby, had made it some pap wrapped in a rag to 
suck, and for two days had not gone out to ply her trade. A little girl who had been left an 
orphan had been taken into the family of a tailor who had three children of his own. So 
there remained only those unfortunate idle people: officials, copyists, footmen out of 
places, beggars, drunkards, prostitutes, and children, whom it was impossible to help at 
once with money, but whom it would be necessary to get to know well, to think about, 
and to find places for. I looked for people unfortunate merely from poverty and whom we 
could help by sharing our superfluity with them; and by some peculiar mischance (as it 
seemed to me) I did not find any such, but found only unfortunates of a kind to whom it 
would be necessary to devote much time and care. 


CHAPTER VII 

THE unfortunates I had noted down seemed to me to fall naturally into three classes: 
first, those who had lost advantageous positions and were awaiting a return to them (there 
were such both from the lower and higher ranks); then dissolute women, of whom there 
were very many in these houses; and thirdly, children. Most of all I found and noted 
people of the first class, who had lost their former advantageous position and wished to 
return to it. People of that kind, especially from among the gentry and officials, were very 
numerous. In almost all the tenements to which we went with the landlord, Ivan 
Fedotych, he told us: 'Here there will be no need for you to fill in the list of lodgers 
yourselves. There is a man here who can do all that, if only he is not drunk to-day.' 

And Ivan Fedotych would call the man out by name, and he was always one of those who 
had fallen from a better position. At Fedotych's call there would creep out from some 
dark comer a once rich gentleman or official, usually drunk and always half-undressed. If 
not drunk he always readily undertook the task offered him: nodding with an air of 
importance, knitting his brows, and introducing learned terminology into his remarks, and 
holding with careful tenderness the clean, printed, red card in his trembling, dirty hands, 
he would look round on his fellow lodgers with pride and contempt as if triumphing now, 
by his superior education, over those who had so often humiliated him. He was evidently 
glad to come into touch with the world in which red cards are printed - the world to 
which he once belonged. Almost always in reply to my inquiries about his life the man 
would begin, not only readily but with enthusiasm; to tell the story, fixed in his mind like 
a prayer, of the misfortunes he had endured and especially of that former position which 
by his education he felt ought to be his. 

There are very many such people scattered in various corners of Rzhanov House. One 
tenement was entirely taken up by them - men and women. When we approached it Ivan 
Fedotych told us: 'Now here are the gentry.' The lodging was quite full: they were almost 
all (some forty persons) at home. In the whole house there were none more degraded and 
unhappy than these: the old shrivelled, and the young pale and haggard. I talked with 
some of them. The story was almost always the same, differing only in degree of 
development. Each of them had been rich, or had a father, brother, or uncle who had been 
or still was rich, or his father or he himself had had an excellent place. Then a misfortune 



Leo Tolstoy 


28 


What Then Must We Do? 


occurred, caused either by some envious people or by his own imprudent good-nature, or 
by some accident, and now he had lost everything and had to perish in these unsuitable, 
hateful surroundings - lousy and tattered, amid drunken and debauched people, feeding 
on bullock's liver and bread, and holding out his hand for alms. All the thoughts, wishes, 
and memories of these people were turned solely to the past. The present appeared to 
them unnatural, abhorrent, and unworthy of attention. None of them had a present. They 
had only recollections of the past and expectations of a future, which might at any 
moment be realized and for the realization of which very little was needed, but that little 
was always just beyond their reach, so their life was wasting in vain. One had been in this 
plight for a year, another for five, and a third for thirty years. One of them need only be 
decently dressed to go to see a well-known person favourably disposed towards him; 
another need only be dressed, pay some debts, and get to the town of Orel; a third need 
only redeem his things from pawn and find a little money to continue a lawsuit he is 
bound to win, and then all would again be well. They all say they only need some 
external thing in order to resume the position they consider natural and happy for them- 
selves. 

Had I not been befogged by my pride as benefactor, I need only have looked a little into 
their faces - young and old - generally weak and sensual but good-natured, to understand 
that their misfortune could not be repaired by external means and that unless their views 
of life were changed they could not be happy in any position; and that they were not 
peculiar people in specially unfortunate circumstances, but were just such people as 
surround us and as we are ourselves. I remember that I found intercourse with this kind of 
unfortunates particularly trying, and I now understand why. In them I saw myself as in a 
looking-glass. Had I thought of my own life and that of the people of our circle, I should 
have seen that between us and these people there was no essential difference. 

If those now about me do not live in Rzhanov House, but in large apartments or houses of 
their own in the best streets, and if they eat and drink dainty food instead of only bread 
with bullock's liver or herrings, this does not prevent their being similarly unfortunate. 
They too are dissatisfied with their position, regret the past and want something better; 
and the better positions they desire are just like those the dwellers in Rzhanov House 
want: namely, positions in which they can do less work and make others do more for 
them. The difference is merely in degree. Had I then reflected, I should have understood 
this; however, I did not reflect, but only questioned these people and noted them down, 
intending, after learning the details of their various circumstances and needs, to help them 
later on. I did not then understand that such men can only be helped by changing their 
outlook on life; and to change another man's outlook one must oneself have a better one 
and live in accord with it; and I was myself living according to the view of life that had to 
be altered before these people could cease to be unhappy. 

I did not see that, metaphorically speaking, they were unhappy not because they lacked 
nourishing food but because their digestions were spoilt, and that they were demanding 
not what was nourishing but what excited their appetites. I did not see that the help they 
needed was not food, but a cure for their spoilt digestions. Though I anticipate, I will here 
remark that of all the people I noted down I really helped none, though what they asked - 
and what seemed as though it would set them on their feet - was done for some of them. 



What Then Must We Do? 


29 


Leo Tolstoy 


Of these I know three particularly well. All three, after being repeatedly set on their feet, 
are now again just in the same position as they were three years ago. 


CHAPTER VIII 

THE second category of unfortunates whom I also hoped to help later on were the loose 
women, of whom there were very many of all sorts in Rzhanov House-from young ones 
who looked like women, to terrible and horrible old ones who had lost human semblance. 
The hope of being able to help these women, whom at first I had not had in view, came to 
me from the following incident. 

It was in the midst of our round. We had already formed a systematic plan for doing our 
business. 

On entering each new tenement we at once inquired for its master. One of us then sat 
down and cleared a place to write at, while another went round from corner to comer and 
questioned each person in the lodgings separately, bringing the information to the one 
who wrote. 

On entering one basement-lodging a student went to find the master, while I began to 
question those in the lodging. The lodging was arranged thus: in the middle of a square 
fourteen-foot room was a brick stove. From it ran four partitions star- wise, forming four 
separate lodgings or cubicles. In the first of these, a passage partition which contained 
four bunks, were two people-an old man and a woman. Straight through this was a long 
cubicle occupied by the landlord of the tenement, a very pale young man dressed 
respectably in a drab cloth coat. To the left of the first cubicle was another in which was a 
sleeping man (probably drunk) and a woman in a pink blouse loose in front and tight 
behind. The fourth cubicle was beyond a partition; the entrance to it was through the 
landlord's cubicle. 

The student went into the landlord's cubicle while I remained in the first one questioning 
the old man and the woman. The man was a working printer, now without means of 
livelihood. The woman was a cook's wife. I went into the third cubicle and asked the 
woman in the blouse about the sleeping man. She said he was a visitor. I asked her who 
she was. She said she was a Moscow peas ant- woman. 'What is your occupation?' She 
laughed and did not reply. 'How do you get your living?' I repeated, thinking she had not. 
understood my question. 'I sit in the tavern,' said she. I did not understand her and again 
asked, 'What do you live on?' She did not reply, but laughed. From the fourth cubicle 
which we had not yet entered, there also came the sound of women's laughter. The 
landlord came out of his cubicle and joined us. He had evidently heard my questions and 
the woman's replies. He looked severely at her and addressing me said: 'She's a 
prostitute,' evidently pleased that he knew this word used by the officials, and could 
pronounce it correctly . 1 Having said this to me with a scarcely perceptible smile of 
respectful satisfaction, he turned to the woman. As soon as he spoke to her his whole face 
changed; and with a peculiar, contemptuously rapid utterance such as people use to a dog, 
he said without looking at her: 


1 'Prostitute' is a hard, foreign word, little used by common people in Russia. -A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


30 


What Then Must We Do? 


'Why talk nonsense? "I sit in a tavern," indeed! If you sit there, then speak plainly and say 
you're a prostitute.' Again he used that word and added, 'She doesn't know what to call 
herself.' 

His tone exasperated me. 'It is not for us to shame her,' said I; 'if we all lived godly lives 
there would not be any such as she.' 

'Yes, that's the way of it,' said the landlord with an unnatural smile. 

'Then it is not for us to reproach them but to pity them. Is it their fault?' 

I don't remember exactly what I said; but I know that the contemptuous tone of this 
young landlord of a lodging full of women he called prostitutes, revolted me; and I felt 
sorry for the woman, and expressed both feelings. And hardly had I spoken, before in the 
room from which the laughter had come, the boards of the bunks creaked and above the 
partition (which did not reach to the ceiling) appeared the dishevelled curly hair and 
small swollen eyes of a woman with a shiny red face, and then a second, and a third. 
They had evidently got up on their bunks and were all three stretching their necks with 
bated breath and strained attention, silently looking at us. 

An awkward silence ensued. The student who had been smiling became serious; the 
landlord lowered his eyes abashed; and the women, not drawing a breath, looked at me 
and waited. I was more abashed than any of them. I had not at all expected that a word 
casually dropped would produce such an effect. It was as when Ezekiel's field of death 
strewn with bones quivered at the touch of the spirit and the dead bones moved. I had 
spoken a chance word of love and pity, and it had acted on all as though they had only 
been waiting for that word to cease to be corpses and to become alive. They all looked at 
me and waited for what would follow. They waited for me to speak the words and do the 
deeds that would cause the bones to come together and be covered with flesh and come to 
life again. But I felt I had no words or deeds with which to continue what I had begun. In 
the depth of my soul I felt that I had lied: that I was myself like them and that I had 
nothing more to say; and I began to write on the card the names and occupations of all the 
people in the lodging. This incident led me into a fresh error: that of supposing that it 
would be possible to help these unfortunates also. It seemed to me then, in my self- 
deception, that this would be quite easy. I said to myself: Let us note down these women 
also, and afterwards, when we have noted everybody down, we (who these 'we' were, I 
did not stop to consider) will attend to them. I imagined that we (those very people who 
have for several generations led, and are still leading, these women into that condition) 
could one fine day take it into our heads suddenly to rectify it all. Yet had I but 
remembered my talk with the loose woman who was rocking the child whose mother was 
ill, I might have understood how insensate such an undertaking was. 

When we saw that woman with the child we thought it was her own. In reply to the 
question, Who are you? she said simply that she was a wench. She did not say, 'A 
prostitute'. Only the landlord of the lodging used that terrible word. The supposition that 
she had a child of her own suggested to me the thought of extricating her from her 
position. So I asked: 

'Is that your child?' 

'No, it's this woman's.' 



What Then Must We Do? 


31 


Leo Tolstoy 


'How is it you are rocking it?' 

'She asked me to. She is dying.' 

Though my supposition had proved erroneous, I continued to speak to her in the same 
sense. I began to ask her who she was and how she came to be in such a position. She 
told me her story willingly and very simply. She was of Moscow birth, the daughter of a 
factory workman. She had been left an orphan, and an aunt (now dead) had taken charge 
of her. From her aunt's she began to frequent the taverns. When I asked whether she 
would not like to change her way of life, my question evidently did not even interest her. 
How can the suggestion of anything quite impossible interest anybody? She giggled and 
said: 'Who would take me with a yellow ticket?' 1 

'Well, but suppose we found you a place as cook somewhere?' said I. 

That idea suggested itself to me because she was a strong, flaxen-haired woman with a 
kindly, round face. There are cooks like that. My words obviously did not please her. She 
said: 

'A cook! But I can't bake bread!' and she laughed. She said she could not, but I saw by the 
expression of her face that she did not wish to be a cook and despised that position and 
calling. 

This woman, who like the widow in the Gospels had quite simply sacrificed her all for a 
sick neighbour, considered, as her companions did, that the position of a worker was 
degrading, and she despised it. She had been brought up to live without working and in 
the way that was considered natural by those around her. Therein lay her misfortune: this 
misfortune had led her into her present position and kept her there. That was what led her 
to sit in taverns. And which of us - man or woman - can cure her of that false view of 
life? Where among us are people who are convinced that an industrious life is always 
more to be respected than an idle one-people convinced of this and who live accordingly: 
valuing and respecting others on the basis of that conviction? Had I thought of this, I 
might have understood that neither I nor any one of those I knew could cure this disease. 

I should have understood that those surprised and attentive faces that peered over the 
partition showed merely surprise at hearing sympathy expressed for them, but certainly 
not any hope of being cured of their immorality. They do not see the immorality of their 
lives. They know they are despised and abused, but cannot understand why. They have 
lived from childhood among other such women, who they know very well have always 
existed and do exist, and are necessary for society: so necessary that Government 
officials are appointed to see that they exist properly.” They know moreover that they 
have power over men and can often influence them more than other women can. They see 
that their position in society, though they are always abused, is recognized both by 
women and men and by the Government, and so they cannot even understand what there 
is for them to repent of and wherein they ought to amend. During one of our rounds a 
student told me of a woman in one of the lodgings who traded in her thirteen year-old 
daughter. Wishing to save the girl, I purposely went to that lodging. The mother and 


The pas spoil issued to a prostitute by the police. -A. M. 

2 This is a reference to the licensing, inspection, and medical examination of brothels that was regularly 
carried on in Russia.-A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


32 


What Then Must We Do? 


daughter were living in great poverty. The mother, a small, dark, forty-year-old 
prostitute, was not merely ugly but unpleasantly ugly. The daughter was equally 
unpleasant. To all my indirect questions about their way of life the mother replied curtly 
and with hostile distrust, evidently regarding me as an enemy. The daughter never 
answered me without first glancing at her mother, and evidently trusted her completely. 
They did not evoke in me cordial pity rather repulsion; but yet I decided that it was 
necessary to save the daughter, and that I would speak to some ladies who take an interest 
in the wretched position of such women, and would send them here. Had I but thought of 
the long past life of that mother: of how she bore, nursed, and reared that daughter-in her 
position assuredly without the least help from others, and with heavy sacrifices - had I 
thought of the view that had been formed in her mind, I should have understood that in 
her action there was absolutely nothing bad or immoral: she had done and was doing all 
she could for her daughter - that is to say, just what she herself considered best. One 
might take the daughter from the mother by force, but one could not convince the mother 
that it was wrong of her to sell her daughter. To save her one ought long ago to have 
saved her mother - saved her from the view of life approved by everybody, which allows 
a woman to live without marriage, that is without bearing children and without working, 
serving only as a satisfaction for sensuality. Had I thought of that I should have 
understood that the majority of the ladies I wished to send here to save that girl 
themselves live without bearing children and without work, serving merely to satisfy 
sensuality and deliberately educate their daughters for such a life. One mother leads her 
daughter to the taverns, another takes hers to Court or to balls, but both share the same 
view of life: namely, that a woman should satisfy a man's lusts and that for that service 
she should be fed, clothed, and cared for. How then can our ladies save that woman or her 
daughter? 


CHAPTER IX 

STILL stranger was my relation towards the children. In my role of benefactor I noticed 
them too. I wished to save innocent beings from perishing in that den of depravity, and I 
wrote them down intending to occupy myself with them 'afterwards' . 

Among them I was particularly struck by a twelve-year-old boy, Serezha. He was a sharp, 
clever lad who had been living at a boot maker’s and was left homeless when his master 
was sent to prison. I was very sorry for the lad and wished to be of use to him. 

I will tell how the help I gave him ended, for the story shows most clearly how false my 
position as a benefactor was. I took the boy home and put him in our kitchen. Was it 
possible to put a lousy boy taken from a den of depravity, among our own children? I 
considered myself very kind and good to let him inconvenience not me but our servants, 
and because we (not I but the cook) fed him, and because I gave him some cast-off 
clothes to wear. The boy stayed about a week. During that time I twice spoke a few 
words to him in passing, and while out for a walk called on a boot maker I know and 
mentioned the boy to him as a possible apprentice. A peasant 1 who was staying with me 
invited the boy to live with him in the village as a labourer. The boy declined, and a week 


1 Sutaev, of whom there is an account in my Life of Tolstoy. -A. M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


33 


Leo Tolstoy 


later disappeared. I went to Rzhimov House to inquire for him. He had been there, but 
was not at home when I called. That day and the day before he had gone to the Zoo- 
logical Gardens, where he was hired for thirty kopeks a day to take part in a procession of 
costumed savages, who led an elephant about in some show they had on. I returned 
another day, but he was so ungrateful that he evidently avoided me. Had I then reflected 
on that boy's life and my own, I should have understood that he had been spoilt by 
learning the possibility of living an easy life without work and by having become 
unaccustomed to work; and I, to benefit him and improve him, had taken him into my 
house where he saw - what? My own children older than himself, and younger, and of his 
own age-never doing any work for themselves but giving all sorts of work to others: 
dirtying things, spoiling everything about them, overeating themselves with rich, tasty, 
and sweet food, breaking crockery, spilling things and throwing to the dogs food that to 
him appeared a delicacy. If I took him from a 'den' and brought him to a good place, he 
was right to assimilate the views of life existing in that good place; and from those views 
he understood that in a good place one must live merrily, eating and drinking tasty things 
without working. It is true he did not know that my children do the hard work of learning 
the declensions in Latin and Greek grammar, nor could he have understood the object of 
such work. But one cannot help seeing that had he understood that fact, the effect of my 
children's example on him would have been still stronger. He would then have 
understood that my children are being educated in such a way that without working now, 
they may be able in future, by the aid of their diplomas, to work as little as possible and 
command as much as possible of life's good things. And he understood this, and did not 
go with the peasant to tend cattle and live on potatoes and kvas, but went to the 
Zoological Gardens to dress as a savage and lead an elephant about for eight pence a day. 

I might have understood how absurd it was of me, while educating my own children in 
complete idleness and luxury, to hope to correct other people and their children who were 
perishing from idleness in what I call the Rzhanov den, where at any rate three-fourths of 
the people- work for themselves and for others. But I understood nothing of all that. 

There were very many children in most wretched conditions in Rzhanov House: the chil- 
dren of prostitutes, orphans, and children who were taken about the streets by beggars. 
They were all very pitiful. But my experiment with Serezha showed me that, living as I 
do, I could not help them. When Serezha was living with us, I detected in myself a desire 
to hide our life, and especially our children's life, from him. I felt that all my efforts to 
guide him to a good industrious life were destroyed by the example we and our children 
set. To take a child from a prostitute or a beggar is very easy. It is very easy, when one 
has money, to have him washed, cleaned, and dressed in good clothes, well fed, and even 
taught various sciences; but for us who do not earn our own bread, to teach him to earn 
his bread is not merely difficult but impossible; for by our example, and even by that 
material bettering of his life which costs us nothing, we teach him the opposite. One may 
take a puppy, tend it, feed it, teach it to fetch and carry, and be pleased with it; but it is 
not enough to tend and feed a man and teach him Greek; one has to teach him to live: to 
take less from others and give more, but we, whether we take him into our house or put 
him into a Home founded for the purpose, cannot help teaching him the reverse. 



Leo Tolstoy 


34 


What Then Must We Do? 


CHAPTER X 

THAT feeling of compassion for people and aversion from myself that I had experienced 
at Lyapin House I no longer felt; I was quite filled with the wish to accomplish the 
business I had started - that of doing good to the people I met here. And strange to say, 
whereas it seemed that to do good - to give money to those in need was a very good thing 
and should promote one's love of people, it turned out on the contrary that this business 
evoked in me ill-will towards people and condemnation of them. During the first round, 
in the evening, a scene occurred just like the one at Lyapin House; but it did not produce 
on me the same impression as at Lyapin House but evoked quite a different feeling. 

It began when in one of the lodgings I really found an unfortunate who was in need of 
immediate aid. It was a hungry woman who had not had anything to eat for two days. 

It was like this: in one very large, almost empty, night-lodging I asked an old woman 
whether there were any very poor people there, people who had nothing to eat. The old 
woman thought awhile, and then named two, but afterwards she seemed to remember 
something. 'Oh, yes, I fancy she is lying here,' said she, looking into one of the occupied 
bunks. 'Yes, this one, I fancy, has not had anything to eat.' 'Really? And who is she?' 'She 
was a strumpet, but nobody wants her now, so she gets nothing. The landlady has had 
pity on her, but now wants to turn her out... Agafya, eh, Agafya!' cried the old woman. 

We drew nearer and something on the bunk rose. It was a rather grey, dishevelled 
woman, lean as a skeleton, in a dirty, torn chemise, with particularly shining and fixed 
eyes. She looked past us with those fixed eyes; caught with her thin hand at a jacket lying 
behind her, in order to cover the bony breast exposed by her torn and dirty chemise, and 
ejaculated: 'What? What?' I asked her how she was getting on. It was long before she 
understood and replied: 'I don't myself know; they are turning me out.' I asked her. I am 
ashamed to write it down - whether it was true that she had not had anything to eat. With 
the same feverish rapidity she replied, still not looking at me: 'I did not eat yesterday and 
I have not eaten to-day.' 

This woman's appearance touched me, but not at all as I had been touched at Lyapin 
House: there pity for those people made me at once feel ashamed of myself, while here I 
was glad to have found at last what I was looking for - someone who was hungry. 

I gave her a ruble, and remember being very glad that others saw it. The old woman, 
seeing this, also asked me for money. It was so pleasant to give, that without considering 
whether it was or was not necessary, I gave to the old woman also. She then accompanied 
me on my way out, and some people standing in the corridor heard her thank me. 
Probably the questions I had asked about poverty had raised expectations, and some 
people were following us about. In the corridor again they began to ask me for money. 
There were among these people some evident drunkards who aroused an unpleasant 
feeling in me, but having given something to the old woman I had no right to refuse these 
and I began distributing money. While I gave, more and more people came up. 
Excitement arose in all the lodgings. On the staircases and in the galleries people 
appeared, watching me. As I came out into the yard a boy ran quickly down from one of 



What Then Must We Do? 


35 


Leo Tolstoy 


the staircases, pushing through among the people. He did not see me and rapidly shouted, 
'He gave Agafya a ruble.' Having run down the stairs the boy joined the crowd that was 
following me. I went out into the street; various people walked with me and asked for 
money. I gave away what small change I had and went to a trading-stall there, asking the 
man who kept it to change ten rubles for me. And here there occurred what had happened 
at Lyapin House. A terrible confusion arose. Old women, broken down gentry, peasants, 
and children, crowded to the stall holding out their hands; I gave them money and 
questioned some of them about their lives, entering them in my note-book. The owner of 
the stall, having turned in the fur corners of his winter overcoat, sat like a statue, 
occasionally glancing at the crowd and again directing his eyes past us. He evidently, like 
the rest, felt that it was stupid, but could not say so. 

In Lyapin House I had been horrified by the wretchedness and degradation of the people 
and felt myself guilty, and felt a wish and a possibility of being better. But now a similar 
scene produced on me quite a different effect: I experienced, in the first place, a feeling 
of ill-will towards many of those who besieged me, and, secondly, I was uneasy as to 
what the shopkeepers and yard-porters thought of me. 

On returning home that day I was ill at ease. I felt that what I was doing was stupid and 
immoral, and as always happens in consequence of an inner perplexity, I talked much 
about the business I had started, as though I did not at all doubt its success. 

The next day I went alone to see those of the people I had noted down who seemed most 
to be pitied and whom I thought it would be easiest to help. As I have said, I did not 
really help any of them. To help them proved harder than I had expected. And whether 
because of my incompetence or because it really was impossible, I only disturbed them 
and did not help them. I visited Rzhanov House several times before the final Census- 
round was made, and the same thing happened each time. I was besieged by a crowd of 
suppliants among whom I was quite lost. I felt the impossibility of achieving anything 
because there were too many of them, and I therefore felt angry with them for being so 
numerous; but besides that, taking them separately, they did not attract me. I felt that each 
of them was telling me lies or not telling the whole truth, and saw in me merely a purse 
from which money might be extracted. And it very often seemed to me that the money a 
man wheedled out of me would do him more harm than good. The oftener I went to the 
place and the more I got to know the people there the plainer the impossibility of doing 
anything became, but I did not abandon my enterprise till the last night of the Census. 

I am particularly ashamed to remember that last visit. Previously I had gone alone, but 
now we went some twenty of us together. At seven o'clock those who wished to take part 
in this last night's round collected at my house. They were nearly all strangers to me: 
students, an officer, and two of my society acquaintances, who saying in the usual way 
'C'est tres inter essant!' asked me to include them among the Census-takers. 

My society acquaintances had dressed specially in shooting jackets and high travelling 
boots, a costume in which they went on hunting expeditions, and which in their opinion 
was adapted for a visit to the night-lodging-houses. They took with them peculiar note- 
books and extraordinary pencils. They were in that special state of excitement people are 
in when preparing for a hunt, a duel, or to start for the war. In their case the stupidity and 
falseness of our position was particularly noticeable, but the rest of us were in the same 



Leo Tolstoy 


36 


What Then Must We Do? 


false situation. Before we started we held a consultation, like a council of war, as to how 
and with what to begin, how to divide our party, and so forth. The consultation was just 
like those which take place in councils, assemblies, and committees that is to say, 
everybody spoke not because he had something that needed saying or because he wanted 
to learn something, but each devised something to say so as not to seem to lag behind the 
others. But in the course of these conversations no one referred to charity, of which I had 
spoken to them all so often. Abashed as I was I felt that I must again refer to charity, that 
is to the need of entering up during our round all whom we found to be in a state of 
poverty. I had always felt ashamed to speak of this, but now, amid our excited 
preparations for the campaign, I could scarcely utter it. All listened to me as it seemed 
with regret, and at the same time all agreed verbally; but it was evident that they all knew 
it was folly and that nothing would come of it, and all immediately began to talk about 
something else. This continued till it was time to start and we drove off. 

We arrived at the dark tavern, roused the attendants, and began to sort our papers. When 
we were told that the people had heard of our visit and were leaving the quarters, we 
asked the landlord to have the gates closed, and ourselves went out into the yard to 
reassure those who were leaving, telling them that no one would ask to see their 
passports . 1 I remember the strange and unpleasant impression those excited night-lodgers 
produced on me: tattered, half-dressed, by the light of the lamp In the dark yard all 
appearing to me to be tall; frightened and terrible in their fright they stood in a group near 
the stinking privy and heard our assurances but did not believe them. Evidently, like 
hunted animals, they were ready for anything merely to escape from us. Gentlemen in 
various guises - as police-officers in town or country, as examining magistrates, and as 
Judges - had harassed them all their lives in the towns and in the villages and on the high- 
roads and in the streets and in taverns and dosshouses, and now suddenly these gentlemen 
had come and shut the gates on them merely to count them; it was as hard for them to 
believe this as it would be for hares to believe that dogs had come not to catch them but 
to count them. But the gates were closed, and the alarmed night lodgers went back to 
their quarters, and having separated Into groups we set to work. With me went the two 
society men and two students. Before us in the darkness went Vanya in overcoat and 
white trousers, carrying a lantern, and we followed him. 

We visited lodgings I already knew and in which I also knew some of the lodgers, but 
most of the people were new and the spectacle was new and terrible - more terrible than I 
had seen at Lyapin House. All the lodgings were full, all the bunks were occupied, and 
often by two people. The sight was horrible from the way they were crowded together, 
and from the mingling of women and men. All the women who were not dead drunk were 
sleeping with men. Many women with children were sleeping with strange men on the 
narrow bunks. Terrible was the sight of these people's destitution, dirt, raggedness, and 
terror. And terrible, above all, was the immense number in this condition. One tenement, 
another, a third, a tenth, a twentieth, and no end to them! Everywhere the same stench, 
the same stifling atmosphere, the same overcrowding, the same mingling of the sexes, the 
same spectacle of men and women drunk to stupefaction, and the same fear, 
submissiveness, and culpability on all faces; and again I felt pained and ashamed of 


1 To be without a passport, or to have a false one, was a serious offence in Russian law and police practice. 
- A.M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


37 


Leo Tolstoy 


myself as I had done in Lyapin House, and I understood that what I had undertaken was 
horrid, stupid, and therefore impossible. And I no longer questioned anyone or took notes 
about anything, knowing that nothing would come of it. 

I suffered profoundly, at Lyapin House I had been like one who happens to see a horrible 
sore on a man's body, he is sorry for the man and conscience-stricken at not having pitied 
him before, but he may still hope to help him. But now I was like a doctor who has come 
to the sufferer with his medicines, has uncovered his wound and chafed it, but has 
himself to admit that he has done it all in vain and that his medicine is of no use. 


CHAPTER XI 

THAT visit dealt the last blow to my self-deception, it became obvious to me that what I 
had undertaken was not merely stupid but horrid. Yet, though I knew this, it seemed to 
me that it would not do to throw up the whole affair at once. It seemed as. if I was bound 
to go on, first, because by the article I had written and by my visits and promises I had 
raised hopes among the poor; and secondly, because I had also by my article and by 
conversations evoked the sympathy of charitable people, many of whom had promised to 
co-operate both with work and money. And I awaited applications from both classes and 
meant to deal with them as best I could. 

As to the needy, this is what occurred. I received more than a hundred letters and 
applications; these were all from the rich-poor, if I may use the expression. I went to see 
some of them and to some I did not reply. Nowhere did I succeed in doing anything. All 
the applications were from people who had once occupied a privileged position (I mean a 
position in which a man receives from others more than he gives), had lost it, and wished 
to regain it. One wanted two hundred rubles to maintain his declining business and 
complete the education of his children another wanted a photographic establishment; 
third wanted his debts paid and to get his respectable clothes out of pawn; a fourth 
wanted a piano in order to perfect himself and to support his family by giving lessons. 
Most of them simply asked for help without defining how much money they wanted, but 
when one looked into what they wanted, it turned out that their needs grew In proportion 
to the amount of help available, and there was not and could not be any satisfying them. I 
repeat that this may have occurred because I did not know how to deal with them, but the 
fact remains that I helped nobody though in some cases I tried to. 

As to the co-operation of the charitable, what happened seemed to me very strange and 
unexpected. Of all who promised me money for the poor and even fixed the amount, not 
one gave me a single ruble. From the promises given me I might have counted on 
receiving some three thousand rubles but of all those people not one remembered the 
conversation or gave me a single farthing. Only the students gave me what they received 
for their work on the census, which was, I think twelve rubles . 1 So that my whole under- 
taking, which was to have dealt with tens of thousands of rubles given by the rich and to 
have saved hundreds and thousands of people from poverty and vice, came merely to 
this: that I distributed haphazard some dozens of rubles to those who begged of me, and 
was left with twelve rubles in hand given by the students, and twenty five rubles allowed 


1 About a penny. 



Leo Tolstoy 


38 


What Then Must We Do? 


me by the Town Duma for my work as organizer: which amounts I positively did not 
know what to do with. 

The whole affair was at an end. On the Sunday of Carnival week, before leaving Moscow 
and going to the country. I went in the morning to Rzhanov House to get rid of those 
thirty-seven rubles by distributing them to the poor. I went to see those I knew in the 
tenements, and found only one sick man, to whom I gave something, five rubles I think. 
There was no one else there to give to. Of course many began begging. But I did not 
know them now any better than I had known them at first, and I decided to consult Ivan 
Fedotych, the owner of the tavern as to the disposal of the remaining thirty-two rubles. It 
was the first day of Carnival. Everyone was dressed in his best, all had eaten enough and 
many were tipsy. In the yard, by a corner of the house, in a torn peasant coat and bast- 
shoes, stood an old but still active rag-and-bone man sorting the booty in his basket, 
throwing the leather, iron, and other things, into different heaps, and trolling a merry song 
in a strong and excellent voice. I had a chat with him. He was seventy, lived by himself 
by his trade as rag-and bone dealer, and not only did not complain, but said he had 
enough to eat and get drunk on. I asked him if there were any who were specially in need. 
He seemed vexed, and said plainly that none were in need except drunkards and lazy- 
bones, but on hearing of my aim, he asked me for five kopeks 1 to get a drink with, and 
ran off to the tavern. I also went into the tavern to Ivan Fedotych, to entrust him with the 
distribution of the remaining money. The tavern was full; gaudy and tipsy girls were 
going from door to door, all the tables were occupied many were already drunk, and in a 
small room someone was playing a concertina and two people were dancing. Ivan 
Fedotych out of respect for me ordered the dancing to cease, and sat down with me at a 
vacant table. I said that as he knew his lodgers and I was commissioned to distribute a 
little money, would he not point out to me those most in need? Good-natured Ivan 
Fedotych (he died a year later), though busy with his trade, left it for a while to help me. 
He considered, and evidently felt puzzled. An elderly waiter heard what we were talking 
about and joined in our conference. 

They began to go over the lodgers, some of whom I knew; but they could not agree. 
'Paramonovna,' suggested the waiter. 'Yes, she goes hungry sometimes. But then she goes 
on the spree.' 'Well, what of that? All the same ... ' 'And Spiridon Ivanovich, he has 
children?' But Ivan Fedotych had his doubts about Spiridon Ivanovich. 'Akuhna? But she 
receives an allowance. How about the blind man?' To him I objected. I had just seen him. 
He was a blind man of eighty, without kith or kin. One would suppose no condition could 
be worse; but I had just seen him - he was lying drunk on a high featherbed and, not 
seeing me, he was abusing, in the filthiest language and in a terrible bass voice, the 
comparatively young woman with whom he cohabited. They then suggested a one-armed 
boy who lived with his mother. I noticed that Ivan Fedotych was embarrassed owing to 
his conscientiousness, for he knew that at Carnival time whatever was given would all 
come back to him at the tavern. But I had to get rid of my thirty-two rubles, and I 
insisted, and somehow, well or ill, the money was at last disposed of. Those who received 
it were for the most part well dressed, and we had not to go far for them for they were 
there in the tavern. The one-armed boy appeared in high boots, a red shirt, and a 
waistcoat. 


1 About 25 shillings. 



What Then Must We Do? 


39 


Leo Tolstoy 


So ended my charitable activity, and I departed for the country, vexed with others - as is 
always the case - because I had myself done something stupid and bad. My charity came 
to nothing and quite ceased, but the flow of thoughts and feelings in me did not cease but 
went on with redoubled force. 


CHAPTER XII 


WHAT did it all mean? 

I had lived in the country and had there been in touch with village poverty. Not out of 
humility which is more like pride, but to tell the truth which is necessary to make the 
whole trend of my thoughts and feelings comprehensible, I will mention that in the 
country I did very little for the poor, but the demands made on me there were so modest 
that even the little I did was of use to the people and created an atmosphere of love and 
satisfaction around me, amid which it was possible to soothe the gnawing consciousness 
of the wrongfulness of my way of life. When we moved to town I hoped to live in just the 
same way. But there I met poverty of quite a different kind. Town poverty was less 
truthful and more exacting and more cruel than village poverty. Above all, there was so 
much of it in one place that it produced a terrible impression on me. What I saw at 
Lyapin House made me at once realize the odiousness of my life. That feeling was 
sincere and very strong. But despite its sincerity and strength I was at first weak enough 
to fear the revolution it demanded in my life, and I compromised. I believed what 
everyone told me and what all have been saying since the world began, that there is 
nothing wrong in riches and luxury, which are God's gifts, and that one can help the 
needy without ceasing to be luxurious. I believed this and wished to do so. And I wrote 
the article in which I called on the rich for help. The rich all acknowledged themselves 
morally bound to agree with me, but evidently either did not wish or were unable to do 
anything, or give anything, for the poor. I began to visit the poor and saw what I had not 
at all expected. On the one hand in those dens - as I called them - 1 found people whom it 
was out of the question for me to help, for they were workers accustomed to work and to 
endure, and therefore possessed a far firmer hold on life than my own. On the other hand 
I saw unfortunates whom I could not help because they were just like myself. The 
majority of the unfortunates I saw were unfortunate only because they had lost the 
capacity, the wish, and the habit, of working for their bread. That is to say their 
misfortune consisted in being like me. 

I could not find any unfortunates - sick, cold, or hungry - whom one could help at once, 
except the one starving woman Agafya. And I became convinced that cut off as I was 
from the life of the people I wished to help, it would be almost impossible for me to find 
such unfortunates, for every case of real want was met by the very people among whom 
these unfortunates live, and above all, I became convinced that money would not enable 
me to alter the wretched life these people lead. I became convinced of all this, but from 
false shame at abandoning what I had begun, from self-deception as to my own 
beneficence, I continued for some time to go on with it till of itself it came to nothing, so 
that with much difficulty I managed somehow, with Ivan Fedotych's aid, in the tavern in 
Rzhanov House, to get rid of those thirty-seven rubles which I did not consider belonged 
to me. 



Leo Tolstoy 


40 


What Then Must We Do? 


Of course I could have continued the affair and made of it a semblance of philanthropy. I 
could by persistency with those who had promised me money have obliged them to hand 
it over to me and could have collected still more and could have distributed that money 
and consoled myself with my benevolent activity; but I saw on the one hand, that we rich 
people neither wish, nor are able, to set aside for the poor a part of our abundance (we 
have so many needs of our own), and that there is no one to give money to, If we wish 
only to do good and not merely to give away haphazard as I had done in the Rzhanov 
tavern. And I threw up the whole thing and with a feeling of despair left for the country. 

There I wished to write an article about my experience and to explain why my 
undertaking had not succeeded. I wished to justify myself against the reproaches 
addressed to me concerning my article on the Census, and to indict society for its 
indifference and to state the causes which produce this urban poverty, and the need to 
counteract it, and also the means I saw for doing so. 

I then began the article and thought it would contain much of value. 

But try as I would, in spite of an abundance and superabundance of material since I wrote 
under the influence of irritation, and had then not yet got rid of all that hindered my 
seeing the matter in a right light, and above all because I was not yet simply and clearly 
conscious of the cause of the whole matter (a very simple cause rooted in myself), I could 
not manage the article, and I did not finish it till the present year . 1 

In the moral sphere something occurs which is surprising and too little noticed. 

If I tell a man who does not know it, anything I know of geology, astronomy, history, 
physics, or mathematics, he receives it as new information and never says to me: 'But 
what is there new about it? Everyone knows that and I have long known it'; but impart to 
a man the loftiest moral truth, expressed in the clearest and briefest form, as it has never 
before been expressed, and every ordinary man, especially one not interested in moral 
questions, and especially one whom this moral truth strokes the wrong way, will certainly 
say: 'But who does not know that? That was known and uttered long ago.' It really seems 
to him that it was said long ago and in that very way. Only those to whom moral truths 
are serious and precious know how important and valuable they are, and by what 
prolonged efforts the simplification and elucidation of moral truth is reached - its 
transformation from dim, indefinitely conceived suppositions and wishes into firm and 
definite expressions inevitably demanding corresponding action. 

We are all accustomed to think that moral teaching is a very empty and dull affair in 
which there can be nothing new or interesting, yet the whole life of man with all its 
complex and diverse activities - political, scientific, artistic, and commercial which seem 
to be independent of morality, have no other purpose than the ever greater elucidation, 
confirmation simplification and diffusion, of moral truth. 

I remember walking along a street once in Moscow and seeing a man come out of a shop 
look attentively at the paving stones, select one of them, squat down over it and begin (as 
it seemed tome) to scrape or rub it with the greatest energy and ardour. 'What is he doing 
to the pavement?' thought I. Coming up to him I saw what he was doing. He was a lad out 
of a butcher’s shop, and was whetting his knife on a paving stone. He was not thinking at 


1 The winter of 1885 - 1886- A. M 



What Then Must We Do? 


41 


Leo Tolstoy 


all about the stones when he examined them and was thinking still less about them while 
he was doing his job - he was simply whetting his knife. He has to sharpen his knife to 
cut meat with it, while it had seemed to me that he was doing something to the stones of 
the pavement. In just the same way, though It seems that mankind is occupied with 
commerce, treaties, wars, sciences, and arts, only one thing is important to humanity, and 
it is doing only that one thing: it is elucidating to itself the moral laws by which it lives. 
Moral laws exist; humanity merely elucidates them to itself, and this elucidation seems 
unimportant and insignificant to him who does not want moral law and does not wish to 
live by it. But this elucidation of the moral law is not only the chief, it is the sole business 
of humanity. 

This elucidation is unobserved, just as the difference between a dull knife and a sharp one 
may be unobserved. A knife is a knife, and for him who does not want to cut anything 
with that knife the difference between a dull and a sharp one passes unobserved. But for a 
man who has understood that his whole life depends on the dullness or sharpness of his 
knife, every whetting of it is important and he knows that there is no end to this 
sharpening, and that a knife is a knife only when it is sharp and can cut what needs 
cutting. 

This happened to me when I began to write the present article. I thought I knew all and 
understood all about the questions evoked in me by the impressions received at Lyapin 
House and during the Census, but when I tried to realize and express them it turned out 
that the knife would not cut and had to be sharpened. And only now after three years do I 
feel that my knife has been sufficiently sharpened to enable me to cut what I want to. I 
have learnt very little that is new. My thoughts are the same, but they were duller, they 
dispersed easily and did not converge: they had no sting in them, and they did not unite 
into the one simplest and clearest conclusion, as they now do. 


CHAPTER XIII 

I REMEMBER that during the whole period of my fruitless attempt to aid the 
unfortunates in the town population I appeared to myself like one who wishes to draw 
another out of a bog but is himself standing in just such a bog. Each effort I made obliged 
me to realize the instability of the ground I stood on. I felt that I was myself in a bog, but 
this consciousness did not then cause me to examine more carefully beneath my feet to 
discover what I was standing on; I was all the time seeking external means of curing the 
evil around me. 

I then felt that my life was bad and that it would not do to live so. But from the fact that 
my life was bad and that one must not live so, I did not draw the clear and simple 
conclusion that I must improve my way of life and live better, but drew the strange 
conclusion that to enable me to live better it was necessary to correct other people's lives; 
and so I began to correct them. I was living in town and wished to correct the life of other 
people living in the town, but I soon became convinced that I could not possibly do this, 
and I began to reflect on the nature of town-life and town-poverty. 

'What is this town-life and town-poverty? Why, living in town, can I not help the town 
poor?' I asked myself. And I replied that I could do nothing for them, first, because there 



Leo Tolstoy 


42 


What Then Must We Do? 


were too many there in one place, and secondly, because they were quite different from 
the poor in the villages. Why are there so many of them here, and in what do they differ 
from the poor of the villages? The reply to both questions was one and the same. There 
are many of them here because all who are unable to feed themselves in the villages 
collect here, around the rich, and their peculiarity is that they are people who have come 
from their village to feed themselves in the town. 1 (If there are any town poor who were 
bom here and whose fathers and grandfathers were born here, those fathers and 
grandfathers came here to feed themselves.) 

What is meant by 'feed oneself in town'? In the words 'to feed oneself in town' there is 
something strange, something resembling joke, when one comes to consider it. How can 
people come from the country, that is, from where there are woods and meadows, and 
grain, and cattle - all the wealth of the earth - to feed themselves in a place where trees, 
and grass, and even soil, are wanting, and where there are only stones and dust? What is 
meant by those words: 'feed oneself in the town', which are constantly used as though 
they were quite clear and comprehensible, both by those who are fed and by those who 
feed them. 

I recall all the hundreds and thousands of town dwellers - some well off and some in 
poverty with whom I talked about why they came there, and they all without exception 
said that 

'Moscow neither sows nor reaps, 

But always has its wealth in heaps'; 

that there is plenty of everything in Moscow, and that therefore only in Moscow could 
they earn the money they needed in the country for grain, a cottage, a horse, and for 
articles of prime necessity. But yet the village is the source of all wealth and it is only 
there that real wealth is to be found: grain, and timber, and horses, and everything. Why 
come to town to obtain what is in the country? And why, above all, carry from the village 
to town what is needed by the villagers: flour, oats, horses, and cattle? 

Hundreds of times have I talked of this with peasants who were living in town, and from 
my talks with them and from my observation I have understood that the crowding of 
country folk into the towns is partly compulsory, because they cannot feed themselves 
otherwise, and partly voluntary, since the temptations of the town attract them. It is true 
that the condition of the peasant is such that to satisfy the demands made on him in the 
village he cannot avoid selling the grain and the cattle which he knows he will himself 
need, and so he is obliged, whether he likes it or not, to go to town to get his grain back 
again. But it is also true that the comparative ease with which money can be earned and 
the luxury of town-life attracts him thither, and that on the pretext of feeding himself in 
town he goes there to get easier work and to be better fed, to drink tea three times a day, 
to dress up, and even to get drunk and live dissolutely. The cause of both is the same: the 
passing of wealth from the producers into the hands of non-producers and its 
accumulation in towns. And really when autumn comes all the wealth is collected in the 
village. And immediately come demands for taxes, conscription, rents, and also the 


1 In English one would naturally say 'to get a living in the town’, but it is here more convenient to use the 
Russian expression ’to feed themselves' because of what follows. -A. M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


43 


Leo Tolstoy 


temptations of vodka, weddings, fetes, itinerant pedlars, and other things; and in one way 
or another that wealth in its diverse forms - sheep, calves, cows, horses, pigs, fowls, 
eggs, butter, hemp, flax, rye, oats, buckwheat, peas, and hemp-seed and linseed-passes 
into the hands of other people and is carried to the towns and from the towns to the cities. 
The villager, obliged to part with all this to satisfy the demands and temptations 
presented to him, having given up his wealth remains in want and has to go to the place 
to which his wealth has been carried, and there he tries partly to secure the money he 
needs to get what is of prime necessity in the country, and partly, carried away by the 
temptations of the town, he himself with others indulges in what the town has to offer. 

Everywhere in Russia, and I think not in Russia only but throughout the world, this goes 
on. The wealth of the country producers passes into the hands of dealers, landowners, 
officials, and manufacturers, and those who receive this wealth wish to enjoy it. And they 
can only enjoy it fully in town. In the village, on account of the distance at which people 
live, it is difficult, in the first place, to satisfy all the requirements of the rich; there are 
not all the workshops, stores, banks, restaurants, theatres, and all kinds of social 
amusements. Secondly, one of the chief pleasures furnished by riches - vanity, the desire 
to surprise and outshine others - is also difficult to secure in the country, again on account 
of the sparseness of the population. In the village connoisseurs of luxury are lacking - and 
there is no one to astonish. No matter what adornments of the house, what pictures or 
bronzes a dweller in the village may procure, or what carriages or toilets - there is no one 
to admire them or envy them - for the peasants do not understand anything about it. 
Thirdly, luxury in the country is even disagreeable and dangerous to a man who has a 
conscience and fear. It is uncomfortable and uncanny in the country to have a milk bath 
or to feed puppies on milk, when near by there are children who need it; it is 
uncomfortable and uncanny to build pavilions and layout gardens among people who live 
in huts surrounded by manure, and who lack fuel. In the village there is no one to keep 
the stupid peasants in order, who in their ignorance may destroy all this. 

And so the rich people gather together in the towns and settle near other rich people who 
have similar tastes: where the gratification of every luxurious taste is carefully guarded 
by numerous police. The core of such town-dwellers are the government officials; around 
them all sorts of workmen and traders have settled down, and they are joined by the. rich. 
There a rich man only wishes for anything and it will be supplied. There too it is 
pleasanter for a wealthy man to live because there he can satisfy his vanity there is 
someone to vie with in luxury, someone to astonish and to outshine. Above all, it is better 
for a rich man in town because formerly, in the village, he was uncomfortable and felt ill 
at ease on account of his wealth, but now on the contrary. It would be uncomfortable not 
to live luxuriously as all the people around him do. What seemed frightening and 
awkward in the country, here seems to him quite proper. The rich assemble in town and 
there, under the protection of the authorities, calmly demand all that has been brought 
thither from the country. The villager is partly obliged to go where this continual holiday 
of the rich is going on and where what has been taken from him is being used up, in order 
to feed on the crumbs that fall from the rich man's table, and partly - seeing the easy and 
luxurious life of the rich which is approved and defended by everybody - he wants to 
arrange his own life so as to work less and enjoy the labour of others more. 



Leo Tolstoy 


44 


What Then Must We Do? 


So he makes his way to town and looks round where the rich people are, and tries by all 
means to get back from them what he needs, submitting to all the conditions they impose 
on him. He assists in the satisfaction of all their whims; and he or she attends on the rich 
in the baths, in the restaurants, as cabman, or as prostitute, and makes carriages, and toys, 
and fashionable dresses, and gradually learns from the rich man to live like him not by 
work but by obtaining from others by various expedients the riches they have 
accumulated - and so he becomes perverted and perishes. And it was this population 
perverted by city-wealth which forms the town-poverty I wished to aid but was unable to 
deal with. 

And indeed one need but consider the position of those country folk who come to town to 
earn money for bread or for taxes, when they see everywhere around them the insanely 
squandered thousands and the easily acquired hundreds, while they themselves have to 
earn kopeks by heavy toil, to be surprised that any of them remain working people, and 
that they do not all turn to the easier, ways of obtaining money, by trading, cattle - 
dealing, mendicancy, vice, fraud, or even robbery. 

You know it is only we who share in the unceasing orgy that goes on in the towns, who 
can be so accustomed to it that it seems to us natural for one person to live in five 
enormous rooms heated by fuel enough to cook the food and warm the lodgings of 
twenty families; to employ two horses and two attendants to carry us half a mile; to cover 
our parquet-floors with rugs, and to spend, I will not say five or ten thousand rubles on a 
ball, but say twenty-five rubles on a Christmas Tree, and so on. But a man who needs ten 
rubles for bread for his family, or whose last sheep is being taken to pay a seven-ruble tax 
and who cannot obtain the money even by heavy toil, cannot get accustomed to it. We 
think it all seems natural to the poor. There are even people naive enough to say that the 
poor are very grateful to us for feeding them by our luxury. But being poor does not 
deprive men of reason, and they reason as we do. When we hear of a man losing or 
squandering ten or twenty thousand rubles, we immediately think, 'What a foolish and 
good-for-nothing fellow he is to squander so much money uselessly, and how well I 
could have used that money for a building I have long wanted, or to improve my farm,' 
and so forth; and the poor reason just in the same way when they see wealth senselessly 
wasted, and they do it the more insistently since they need the money not to satisfy some 
caprice but to supply things they urgently need. We are much mistaken when we think 
that the poor c fail to see this, and can calmly look at the luxury surrounding them. 

They never have admitted and never will admit that it is right for some to have a 
continual holiday while others must always fast and work. At first it astonishes and 
angers them to see it. Then they grow accustomed to it; and seeing that such 
arrangements are considered legitimate, they themselves try to avoid work and to share in 
the perpetual holiday. Some succeed and become such ever-feasting folk, others 
gradually insinuate themselves into an approach to that position, others again break down 
without having attained their aim, and having lost the habit of working, fill the brothels 
and doss-houses. 

Two years ago we took a peasant lad from the village as a manservant. He did not get on 
with the footman and was dismissed. He found a place with a merchant, satisfied his 
master, and now goes about in showy boots and wearing a chain across his waistcoat. In 
his place we engaged a married peasant. He took to drink and lost some money. We 



What Then Must We Do? 


45 


Leo Tolstoy 


engaged a third man. He was intemperate, and having drunk all his clothes, loafed for a 
long time about the doss-houses. An old man-cook took to drink in town and fell ill. A 
footman who used to drink desperately, but who in the country had avoided vodka for 
five years, took to drink again last year while living in Moscow without his wife who 
used to restrain him, and he ruined his whole life. A lad from our village is living with 
my brother as manservant. His grandfather, a blind old man, came to me while I was 
staying in the country and asked me to shame his grandson into sending ten rubles 
towards the payment of the taxes, as otherwise he would have to sell his cow. 'He always 
says: one has to dress properly,' said the old man; 'well he has got himself boots and that 
is enough, or else what is it he wants? Does he want to have a watch?' said the 
grandfather, expressing by those words the insanest proposition he could think of. The 
proposition was indeed senseless if one knew that the old man had gone through the 
whole of Lent without being able to afford any oil with his food, and that he was losing 
the wood he had cut because he was unable to pay a ruble and twenty kopeks he owed; 
but it turned out that the old man's insane jest was an actual fact. The lad came to me in a 
black overcoat of good cloth and wearing boots for which he had paid eight rubles. A few 
days earlier he had taken ten rubles in advance from my brother and had bought the 
boots. And my children, who have known the lad since childhood, tell me that he really 
considers it necessary to provide himself with a watch. He. is a very good-natured lad, 
but he thinks he will be laughed at till he has a watch. So a watch is necessary. This year 
in our house a housemaid, a girl of eighteen, had an affair with the coachman. She was 
dismissed. Our old nurse, with whom I spoke about it, reminded me of another poor girl 
whom I had forgotten. She too during our short stay in Moscow ten years ago had an 
affair with a footman. She also was dismissed, and ended in a brothel, dying of syphilis in 
the hospital before she was twenty. We only need look around us to be horrified at the 
infection which - not to speak of the factories and workshops that serve our luxury - we 
by our luxury directly and immediately diffuse among the very people we afterwards 
wish to help. 

And so looking into the nature of the town poverty I was unable to help, I saw that its 
first cause was that I collect what the country folk need and take it to town. The second 
cause was that here in town, by means of what I have collected in the country, I by my 
insensate luxury tempt and corrupt those country folk who follow me to town in order to 
get back somehow or other what was taken from them in the village. 


CHAPTE R XIV 

FROM quite an opposite side I came to the same conclusion. Remembering all my 
relations with the city poor during that period, I saw that one reason I was unable to help 
them was that they were insincere and untruthful with me. They all regarded me not as a 
man but as a means. I could not get into touch with them: perhaps, thought I, I do not 
know how to; but without sincerity it was impossible to help them. How can one help a 
man who does not tell one his whole position? At first I blamed them for this (it is so 
natural to blame others), but a single word from a remarkable man-namely, Sutaev , 1 who 
was staying with me at the time, explained the case to me and showed me where the 


1 Sutaev (previously alluded to) was a peasant sectarian whom Tolstoy held in high esteem. - A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


46 


What Then Must We Do? 


cause of my failure lay. I remember that Sutaev's remark struck me forcibly even then, 
but I only understood its full significance later. It was at the time when my self-delusion 
was at its height. I was sitting at my sister's; Sutaev also was there and my sister was 
asking me about my enterprise. I began telling her and, as always happens when one is 
not sure of what one is doing, I told her with great enthusiasm, warmth, and verbosity, 
both what I was doing and what might come of it. I told her how we were going to look 
after the orphans and old folk, to send back to their villages peasants who could not get 
on in town; how we should make the path of reform easy for the vicious, and how, if only 
this affair succeeded, not a single man in Moscow would be left without help. My sister 
sympathized with me and we talked about it. During this conversation I glanced at 
Sutaev. Knowing his Christian life and the importance he attaches to charity, I expected 
his approval and spoke so that he should understand me. I addressed my sister, but what I 
said was meant rather for him. He sat immovable in his black tanned sheepskin coat 
which, peasant-fashion, he wore indoors as well as out of doors, but he seemed not to 
hear us and to be absorbed in his own thoughts. His small eyes were dim as though 
directed inwards. Having said my say, I turned to him and asked what he thought of it. 

'It's all useless,' said he. 

'Why?' 

'The whole Society you're starting will be no use, and no good will come of it,' repeated 
he with conviction. 

'Why not? Why will it be no use to help thousands, or even hundreds, of unfortunates? Is 
it wrong to clothe the naked and feed the hungry as the Gospel tells us to?' 

'I know, I know! But you're not doing the right thing. Is that the way to help? You go out 
walking and a man asks you for twenty kopeks. You give it. Is that charity? Give him 
spiritual charity, teach him! But what have you done? Merely got rid of him!' 

'No, that's not what we are talking about. We want to find out the need that exists, and to 
help with money and work and find employment for those who require it.' 

'You won't do anything with those people that way.' 

'What do you mean? Are they to be left to die of cold and hunger?' 

'Why should they die? Are there so many of them?' 

'Many of them !' said I, thinking he treated the matter so lightly because he did not know 
what an immense number there were. 'Do you know that in Moscow alone there are, I 
suppose, some twenty thousand cold and hungry people? And in Petersburg, and in other 
towns...!' 

He smiled. 

'Twenty thousand! And how many homes are there in Russia alone? A million?' 

'Well, what of it?' 

'What of it!' His eyes gleamed, and he became animated. 'Why, let us divide them among 
us. I am not rich, but I will at once take two. There is that lad you had in your kitchen. I 
have asked him, but he won't come. If there were ten times as many we could place them 



What Then Must We Do? 


47 


Leo Tolstoy 


all. You take one, I'll take another. We could go to work together. He would see how I 
work, and would learn how to live. We would sit at one table and he would hear a word 
now from me and now from you. That is charity, but your scheme is quite useless.' 

This simple remark struck me. I could not but acknowledge its justice; but it then seemed 
to me that, though it was true, what I had begun might perhaps also be useful. But the 
farther I went with the affair and the more I came in contact with the poor, the oftener I 
remembered those words and the more significance for me did they acquire. Indeed, I 
drive up in an expensive fur coat, or in my own carriage; or a man who has no boots sees 
my two thousand ruble lodgings, or even merely sees that I give away five rubles without 
regret because it comes into my head to do so; and he knows that if I give away rubles 
like that, it is because I have collected many and have a lot of superfluous ones I have not 
given away but on the contrary have extracted with ease from other people. What can he 
see in me but a man who has taken what ought to be his? And what feeling can he have 
towards me but a desire to get back as many as possible of the rubles I have taken from 
him and from others? I want to get into touch with him, and complain that he is not frank; 
but I fear to sit on his bed lest I should get lice or be infected, and I dare not let him into 
my room. When he comes, hungry, to see me, he has to wait in the hall (if he is lucky) or 
in the porch. Yet I say he is to blame that I cannot get into touch with him and that he is 
not frank! 

Let the most cruel of men try to gorge himself on five-course dinners among people who 
have eaten little and eat only black bread. No one will find it possible to eat and see the 
hungry folk licking their lips. So, to be able to eat tasty food where there are hungry 
people, it is first of all necessary to hide oneself from them and eat where they cannot see 
one. And that is just what we do first of all. 

And I looked more simply at our life and saw that to come in close touch with the poor is 
not difficult for us just by accident, but that we purposely arrange our life so as to make 
such contact difficult. 

More than this, standing on one side to look at our life - the life of the rich - 1 saw that all 
that is considered as welfare in our life consists in, or at any rate is inseparably bound up 
with, what separates us as far as possible from the poor. Indeed all the efforts of our 
wealthy life, beginning with food, clothes, dwellings, our cleanliness, and even our very 
education - have as their chief aim to segregate us from the poor. And on thus dividing 
ourselves - separating ourselves with impassable walls - from the poor, at least nine- 
tenths of our wealth is spent. The first thing a man who gets rich does is to cease to eat 
out of the common bowl; 1 he gets crockery, and separates himself from the kitchen and 
the servants. 

He feeds his servant well that her saliva may not flow at sight of his tasty food, and he 
eats by himself: but as it is dull eating alone, he devises ways of improving the food and 
decorating the table, and the very manner of taking our food (dinners) becomes a subject 
of vanity and pride; and the way of partaking of food becomes a way of separating 
himself from others. It is unthinkable for a rich man to invite a poor man to his table. One 
must know how to take a lady to table, how to bow, to sit, to eat, to use a fingerbowl, and 


1 In a Russian peasant family it is usual for all to eat out of one common family bowl, each with his own 
wooden spoon. -AM. 



Leo Tolstoy 


48 


What Then Must We Do? 


only the rich know how to do all that. The same occurs with clothes. If a rich man wore 
simple clothes merely to protect his body from the cold: an overcoat, a sheepskin, felt and 
leather boots, a peasant coat, trousers, and shirt - he would need very little, and he could 
not, if he had two sheepskins, refuse to give one to a man who had none; but a rich man 
begins by having apparel made for him which consists of several articles and is only 
suitable for special occasions and therefore will not do for a poor man. He has dress- 
coats, vests, pea-jackets, patent leather shoes, capes, shoes with French heels, fashionable 
clothes composed of small pieces, hunting dress, travelling jackets, and so forth, which 
are suitable only in conditions remote from poverty. Thus clothes also become a means of 
separation from the poor. Fashion makes its appearance, which is just what separates the 
rich from the poor. It is the same, even more clearly, with our dwelling places. In order to 
live alone in ten rooms it is necessary that this should not be seen by those who are living 
ten in a room. The richer a man is the more difficult it is to make one's way to him - the 
more porters there are between him and the poor, and the less possible is it to take a poor 
man over his carpets and seat him in a satin chair. It is the same with means of 
conveyance. A peasant driving in a cart or on a carrier's sledge must be very harsh not to 
give a lift to a traveller on foot - there is room and opportunity for him to do so. But the 
finer the carriage the more remote the possibility of giving a lift to anyone. Some of the 
smartest vehicles are even named 'sulkys'. 

The same is true of the whole manner of life expressed by the word cleanliness. 

Cleanliness! Who does not know people, especially women, who make a great virtue of 
this cleanliness? And who does not know the devices of this cleanliness, which are 
endless when obtained by the labour of others? Who among those who have become rich 
does not know by experience with what difficulty and trouble he accustomed himself to 
this cleanliness, which only confirms the proverb, 'White hands love other people's 
work'? 

To-day cleanliness consists in changing one's shirt every day; to-morrow in changing 
twice a day. To-day in washing one's neck and hands every day; to-morrow one's feet 
also, after tomorrow one's whole body each day and with some special friction besides. 
To-day one has a table-cloth for two days; to-morrow a fresh one every day; and then two 
a day. To-day the footman's hands must be clean; to-morrow he must wear clean gloves 
and in clean gloves must bring in a letter on a clean tray. And there are no limits to this 
cleanliness when it is obtained by other people's labour - and which is of no use to 
anyone except as a means of separating oneself from others and making intercourse with 
them impossible. 

More than that, when I looked into the matter I became convinced that the same thing is 
true of what is generally called education. 

Language does not deceive; it calls by its true name what people understand by that 
name. What the common folk call 'education' is, fashionable dress, refined conversation, 
clean hands, and a particular kind of cleanliness. Of such a man in contradistinction to 
others, they say that he is an 'educated man'. In a rather higher circle they mean by 
'education' the same that is meant among the people, but to the conditions of 'education' 
are added piano-playing, a knowledge of French, ability to write a Russian letter without 
mistakes in spelling, and yet more external cleanliness. In a still higher circle by 



What Then Must We Do? 


49 


Leo Tolstoy 


'education' is meant all this, with the addition of a knowledge of English, and a diploma 
from one of the higher educational institutions, and a yet higher degree of cleanliness. 
But the first, the second, and the third kind of education are essentially one and the same. 
'Education.' consists of those forms and that knowledge which will separate a man from 
others. It’s object is the same as that of cleanliness - to separate us from the mass of the 
poor, in order that those cold and hungry people may not see how we make holiday. But 
to hide oneself is impossible, and they do see. 

And thus I became convinced that the reason it was impossible for us, the rich, to help the 
town poor, lay also in the impossibility of coming into close touch with them, and that 
this impossibility we ourselves create by our whole life and by the whole use we make of 
our wealth. I became convinced that between us - the rich - and the poor there stands a 
wall of cleanliness and education that we have erected and reared by our wealth, and to 
be able to aid the poor we have first of all to destroy that wall, so that we might apply 
Sutaev's method of distributing the poor among us. And from this side, too, I reached the 
same conclusion to which the course of my reflections on town poverty had brought me: 
that the cause of that poverty is our wealth. 


CHAPTER XV 

I BEGAN to examine the matter from yet another side - the purely personal one. Among 
the things which particularly struck me during the time of my philanthropic activity there 
was a very strange one for which I was long unable to find an explanation. It was this: 
every time it chanced, in the street or at home, that I gave some small coin to a pauper 
without talking to him, I saw, or it seemed to me that I saw, pleasure and gratitude on his 
face and I myself experienced a pleasant sensation at such times. I saw that I had done 
what the man wanted and expected of me. But if I stopped to speak to the man, and ques- 
tioned him sympathetically about his former and his present life, entering more or less 
into detail, I felt that I could not give him three or twenty kopeks, and I began rummaging 
in my purse, doubting how much to give, and always gave him more, and always saw that 
the man went away dissatisfied. If I entered into still closer communication with him my 
doubts as to how much to give increased still more, and no matter what I gave the man 
became yet more gloomy and more dissatisfied. As a general rule it turned out that if 
after closer contact with a poor man I gave him three rubles or more, I nearly always saw 
gloom, dissatisfaction, and even resentment on his face, and it even happened that when I 
had given ten rubles he went away without even saying thank you, as though I had 
offended him. And on such occasions I always felt ill at ease, ashamed of myself, and 
guilty. If I kept in touch with a poor man for weeks, months, and years, and helped him, 
told him my views, and came into close touch with him, my relations with him became a 
torment and I saw that the poor man despised me. And I felt that he was right to do so. 

If I go along the street and he, standing there, begs three kopeks of me among others 
walking or driving past, and I give it him, I am for him a passer-by and a good, kindly 
passer-by - one who gives a thread towards making a shirt for the naked. He expects 
nothing more than a thread, and if I give it he blesses me sincerely. But if I stop with him, 
talk to him as to a fellow man, and show that I wish to be more than a passer-by to him; if 
as often happens he weeps while telling me his woe, he no longer regards me merely as a 



Leo Tolstoy 


50 


What Then Must We Do? 


passer-by, but sees what I want him to see in me - a kindly man. But if I am a kindly man 
my kindness cannot stop at twenty kopeks, or at ten rubles, or at ten thousand. It is 
impossible to be good-natured only a little. Suppose I have given him much - set him up, 
clothed him, put him on his feet so that he may live without depending on others, but for 
some reason - misfortune or his own weakness and viciousness - he again lacks the 
overcoat, linen, and money which I gave him - is again hungry and cold and has again 
come to me - why should I refuse him? If the reason of my activity is to attain a certain 
material result: to give him so many rubles or such and such an overcoat, I might, once I 
had given them, be at rest; but the reason of my activity is not that, its reason is that I 
wish to be a kindly man, that is to say I wish to see myself in every other man. Everyone 
understands kindliness in this way and not otherwise. And therefore if he drinks all you 
give him twenty times over, and if he is again cold and hungry, you - if you are a kindly 
man-cannot help giving to him again, and can never cease giving if you have more than 
he has. And if you draw back, you thereby show that all you did you did not because you 
were a kindly man, but because you wished to seem kindly in his eyes and in the eyes of 
others. 

And with such people, from whom I had to draw back and cease giving and thereby re- 
nounce kindliness, I experienced a tormenting sense of shame. 

What was that shame? I felt it at Lyapin House, and before and after that in the village 
whenever I happened to give money or other things to the poor, and during my visits to 
the town poor. 

One recent instance of this shame vividly reminded me of it and supplied me with an ex- 
planation of the shame I experienced when giving money to the poor. 

It occurred in the country. I wanted twenty kopeks to give to a pilgrim, and sent my son 
to borrow them from someone; he brought the pilgrim the money and told me he had got 
it from our man-cook. A few days later some more pilgrims came and I again wanted 
twenty kopeks. I had a ruble, and remembering that lowed money to the cook, I went to 
the kitchen hoping to get change. I said: 'I borrowed twenty kopeks of yours, here's a 
ruble...' Before I had finished speaking he called his wife from the next room and said: 
'Take it, Parasha.' Thinking she understood what I wanted, I handed her the ruble. I must 
mention that the cook had been with us only a week and though I had seen his wife I had 
never spoken to her. Just as I was going to ask her for the change, she quickly bent over 
my hand and wished to kiss it , 1 evidently supposing that I was giving her the ruble. I 
muttered something, and left the kitchen. I felt ashamed more painfully ashamed than I 
had done for years. I even writhed and was conscious of making grimaces, and I groaned 
with shame as I ran out of the kitchen. This shame, which seemed to me quite undeserved 
and unexpected, startled me, especially as it was long since I had experienced such a 
feeling, and because it seemed to me that I, as an old man, was living in a way that did 
not deserve such shame. It struck me very much. I mentioned the occurrence to my 
family and to some acquaintances, and they all agreed that they would have felt as I did. 
And I began to ask myself why it had made me feel ashamed. An incident that had 
happened to me previously in Moscow supplied me with the answer. 


1 A common way of expressing gratitude in Russia. - A. M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


51 


Leo Tolstoy 


I pondered on that incident, and the shame I had felt with the cook's wife became 
intelligible, and all the feelings of shame experienced during my period of Moscow 
charity, and which I now constantly experience when I happen to give people anything 
more than such petty contributions to mendicants and pilgrims as I am accustomed to 
give and consider not as charity but as decency and politeness. If a man asks you for a 
light, you must light a match for him if you have one. If a man asks for three or twenty 
kopeks, or even for a few rubles, you must give it if you have it. It is a matter of 
politeness and not of charity. 

The incident was this: I have already mentioned two peasants with whom, two years ago, 
I used to saw wood. One Saturday evening, in the dusk, I was walking with them to town. 
They were going to their master to get their wages. Near the Dragomilov Bridge we met 
an old man. He asked for alms and I gave him twenty kopeks. As I gave it I thought that 
my charity would have a good effect on Semen, with whom we had been talking of 
divine things. Semen was that Vladimir peasant who had a wife and two children in 
Moscow. He also stopped, turned up the skirt of his long coat, drew out his purse, and 
rummaging in it, took out a three-kopek piece which he gave to the old man, asking for 
two kopeks change. The old man showed that he had two three-kopek pieces and a one- 
kopek. Semen looked at these, and was on the point of taking the one kopek, but changed 
his mind, took off his cap, made the sign of the cross, and went on, leaving the old man 
the three kopeks. I knew Semen's position. He had no house and no property. His 
earnings up to the day when he gave those three kopeks amounted to six rubles and fifty 
kopeks. So that six rubles and fifty kopeks represented his total savings. My savings 
equalled about six hundred thousand rubles. I had a wife and children and so had Semen. 
He was younger than I and had fewer children; but his children were young while I had 
two already old enough to work, so that apart from our savings our positions were alike; 
perhaps mine was even somewhat the better. He gave three kopeks, I gave twenty. What 
had he and what had I given? What ought I to have given to match his gift? He had six 
hundred kopeks: he gave one of them, and then two more. I had six hundred thousand 
rubles. To do what he did, I should have given three thousand rubles and asked for two 
thousand rubles change, and if there was no change I should have left those two thousand 
rubles also, made the sign of the cross, and gone on my way; quietly talking of how fac- 
tory hands live and of the price of liver on the Smolensk market. I thought of this at the 
time, but only much later was I able to draw from that instance the conclusion inevitably 
flowing from it. That conclusion seems so unusual and strange that despite its 
mathematical certainty one needs time to grow accustomed to it. It always seems as if 
there must be some mistake about it, but there is none. There is only the terrible tog of 
delusion in which we live. 

That deduction, when I reached it and recognized its certainty, explained to me my 
feeling of shame with the cook's wife and with all the poor people to whom I gave, or 
give, money. 

What indeed is this money I give to the poor, and which the cook's wife thought I was 
giving to her? In most cases it is such a small fraction of my property that it cannot be 
expressed in figures intelligible to Semen or to the cook's wife; it is generally about a 
one-millionth part. I give so little that for me it is not and cannot be a deprivation; it is 
only a diversion indulged in when and as I please. And that was how the cook's wife 



Leo Tolstoy 


52 


What Then Must We Do? 


understood me. H I give a ruble or a twenty kopek piece to a man from the street, why 
should I not give her a ruble? To give away money like that is in her eyes the same as for 
gentlefolk to throw gingerbreads among a crowd to be scrambled for; it is an amusement 
for those who possess much 'mad money'. I was ashamed because the mistake she made 
showed me plainly how she, and all poor people, must regard me: 'He throws mad (that 
is, unearned) money about.' 

What indeed is my money, and where has it come from? Part of it I have got from the 
land I inherited from my father. A peasant sells his last sheep or cow to pay it to me. The 
other part of my money I have got for my writings, for books. If my books are harmful I 
only place temptation in the path of those who buy them and the money I receive is ill- 
gotten; but if my books are of use the case is still worse. I do not give them to people, but 
say, 'Give me seventeen rubles , 1 and then I will let you have them.' And as in the former 
case the peasant sold his last sheep, so here a poor student, a teacher, or any poor man, 
deprives himself of things he needs, to give me that money. And I have thus got together 
much money, and what do I do with it? I bring it to town and give some of it to the poor 
if they also come to town and obey my whims and clean the pavement and my lamps and 
boots, and work for me in factories. For this money I get all I can out of them: that is, I 
try to give them as little, and to take as much, as possible. And quite unexpectedly, 
without any particular reason, I suddenly begin giving away this same money to those 
same poor people; not to all of them, but to some whom I select. How can each of them 
help thinking that perhaps he may have the luck to be one of those with whom I shall 
amuse myself when I distribute my mad money? 

That is how they all regard me, and how the cook's wife also regarded me. And I was so 
greatly deluded that I called 'doing good', this chucking away farthings with one hand to 
those whom it pleased me to select, while gathering thousands from the poor with the 
other! It is not surprising that I felt ashamed. 

Yes, before doing good I must myself stand aside from evil, in conditions where one may 
cease to do evil. For my whole life is evil. I might give away a hundred thousand rubles 
and still not be in a position to do good, for I should still have five hundred thousand left. 
Only when I have nothing left shall I be in a position to do even a little good, if but as 
much as the prostitute who for three days looked after the sick woman and her baby. And 
that had seemed to me so little! And I dared to think of doing good! What I felt from the 
first at the sight of the hungry and cold people at Lyapin House: namely, that I was to 
blame for it, and that one could not, could not, could not go on living as I was doing, was 
the one thing that was really true ! 

What then must we do? To this question, if anyone still needs an answer, I will, God 
willing, furnish a detailed reply. 


1 34s., the price of Tolstoy's collected works at that time. -A, M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


53 


Leo Tolstoy 


CHAPTER XVI 

IT was hard for me to realize this, but when I came to it I was horrified at the delusion in 
which I had been living. I was up to my ears in the mire, yet thought I could drag others 
out of it. 

What indeed do I want? I want to do good, to arrange that people should not be cold or 
hungry but should live in a way fit for human beings. 

I want this, and I see that by violence, extortion, and various devices in which I 
participate, the workers' bare necessities are taken from them, while the non-workers (of 
whom I am one) consume in superfluity the fruits of the labour of those who toil. 

I see that this exploitation is so arranged that the more cunning and complex the devices a 
man employs (or which those from whom he inherits have employed) the more he 
commands of the work of others and the less he works himself. 

First comes a Stieglitz, a Derviz , 1 a Morozov , 2 a Demidov , 3 a Yusupov , 4 and then the 
great bankers, merchants, landowners, and officials. Then the middle-sized bankers, 
merchants, officials, and landowners - of whom I am one. Then the lower order of petty 
traders, inn-keepers, usurers, police officers and constables, school teachers, chanters, 
and business clerks; then the house porters, footmen, coachmen, water-carriers, cabmen, 
and pedlars; and then at last come the working people, the factory-hands and peasants, 
who in number are to the others as ten to one. I see that the life of nine-tenths of the 
people - the workers - demands by its nature strain and labour as all natural life does, but 
that in consequence of the various devices which deprive these people of necessities and 
make their life hard, it becomes worse and more full of privations year by year, while our 
life - the life of the non-workers - by the help of science and art directed to that aim, 
becomes each year more superabundant, attractive, and secure. 

I see that in our time working folk, especially the old men, women, and children, simply 
perish from intense labour and insufficient nourishment and that they are not sure of 
obtaining even the most elementary necessities; while side by side with this the non- 
working class, of which I am a member, is year by year more and more provided ,with 
superfluities and luxuries, becomes yet more and more secure, and has finally, among its 
lucky members (of whom I am one), reached such a degree of security as in olden times 
people only dreamt of in fairy tales. We have reached the condition of the owner of the 
magic inexhaustible purse; that is to say, a condition in which a man is not only 
completely freed from the law of labour for the support of life, but is able without labour 
to avail himself of all life's bounties and to hand on that magic inexhaustible purse to his 
children or to whom he pleases. I see that the produce of man's toil passes more and more 
from the labouring people to those who do no labour, and that the pyramid of the social 
structure is, as it were, reconstructed so that the foundation stones pass to the top, and the 
rapidity of this movement increases almost in geometrical progression. I see that what is 
happening is as though in an ant-hill the society of ants were to lose its sense of a 


1 Prominent financiers and railway concessionaires in Russia when Tolstoy was writing this book. 

2 The Morozovs were very wealthy cotton-mill owners, of peasant origin. 

3 The Demidovs were the enormously wealthy founders of the mining industry in Russia. 

4 The Princes Yusupov were very large landowners, having held important official positions from the time 
of Peter the Great. They are descendants of a Khan of the Nogay tribe. 



Leo Tolstoy 


54 


What Then Must We Do? 


common law, and some ants began to carry the produce of toil from the bottom of the 
heap to the top, ever narrowing the base and enlarging the top and so compelling the 
other ants to shift from the base to the top. I see that the ideal of an industrious life has 
been replaced by the ideal of a magic purse. The rich, and I among them, have by various 
devices obtained that magic purse for themselves, and to enjoy it we move to town - that 
is, to the place where nothing is grown but everything is consumed. The poor labouring 
man who is plucked that the rich man may have this magic purse, tries to follow him to 
town, and there also takes to tricks, and either secures a position in which while working 
little he obtains much, thus laying yet more burdens on the working folk; or, not reaching 
such a position, he perishes and becomes one of those cold and hungry inmates of the 
night lodging-houses - who are increasing in number with extraordinary rapidity. 

I belong to the class who by various devices deprive the working people of necessities, 
and who by these devices have provided a magic purse for themselves which is a 
temptation to those same unfortunates. I want to aid people, and therefore it is clear, 
above all, that I should not pluck them as I am doing, and on the other hand I should not 
tempt them. Otherwise, by most complex cunning and cruel devices, which have been 
elaborated through the ages, I have arranged for myself the condition of any owner of a 
magic purse, that is, a condition which enables me without ever doing any work, to 
compel hundreds and thousands of people to work for me-as I am doing; and I imagine 
that I pity people and wish to help them. I sit on a man's back, choking him and making 
him carry me, and yet assure myself and others that I am very sorry for him and wish to 
ease his lot by all possible means - except by getting off his back. 

It is really so simple. If I want to aid the poor, that is, to help the poor not to be poor, I 
ought not to make them poor. But as it is at my own choice I give away to the poor who 
have strayed from the path of life, rubles, or tens or hundreds of rubles; but of exactly 
such rubles I take thousands from people who have not yet strayed from the path, and 
thus make them poor and also pervert them. 

It is very plain; yet it was terribly difficult for me to understand it fully without any 
compromises or excuses which would justify my position; but as soon as I acknowledged 
my guilt all that had before seemed strange, complicated, obscure, and insoluble, became 
quite intelligible and simple. Above all, my own path of life resulting, from this 
explanation became simple, clear and agreeable, instead of being tangled insoluble and 
tormenting, as it had been before. 

Who am I who wish to help people? I wish to help people and - having got up at noon 
after playing bridge with four candles on the table - enfeebled, pampered, needing the aid 
and service of hundreds of people, I came to help whom? People who rise at five o'clock, 
sleep on boards, feed on bread and cabbage, are able to plough, to mow, to fix an axe- 
handle, to plane, to harness a horse, and to sew - people who in strength, endurance, skill, 
and abstemiousness are a hundred times superior to me who come to help them! What 
else but shame could I experience on coming into contact with these people? The weakest 
among them-a drunkard living in Rzhanov House, whom they call a loafer - is a hundred 
times more industrious than I; his balance (so to say), that is, the proportion between 
what he takes from people and what he gives to them, is a thousand times superior to my 
balance if I reckon what I take from people as against what I give to them. 



What Then Must We Do? 


55 


Leo Tolstoy 


And those are the people I go to help. I go to help the poor. But who is poor? Not one of 
them than I am. I am a quite enfeebled, good-for-nothing parasite, who can only exist 
under most exceptional conditions found only when thousands of people labour to 
support a life that is of no value to anyone. And it is I, an insect devouring the leaf of the 
tree, who wish to aid this growth and health of that tree and wish to heal it. 

I spend my whole life in this way; eat, talk, and listen; I eat, write, or read, that is again 
talk and listen; I eat and play; I eat and again talk and listen; I eat and go to bed; and so it 
is every day, and I am unable, and do not know how, to do anything else. And that I may 
do this it is necessary that from morning to evening the porter, the peasant, the man and 
woman cook, the footman, the coachman and laundress, should work; to say nothing of 
those working people who are needed that these coachmen, cooks, footmen and the rest 
should have utensils and the things with which and on which they work for me: axes, 
barrels, brushes, crockery, furniture, glasses, blacking, paraffin, hay, wood-fuel, meat. 
And all these people work hard every day and all day, that I may be able to talk, eat and 
sleep. And it was I, this wretched man, who imagined that I could help others - help the 
very people who were supporting me. 

It is not surprising that I did not help anyone and that I felt ashamed, but it is surprising 
that such an absurd idea could have occurred to me. The woman who tended the sick old 
man helped him, the peasant woman who cut a bit of bread from the loaf she had 
obtained from the soil, helped a beggar; Semen, who gave three kopeks he had earned, 
helped the beggar, because those three kopeks really represented work he had done; but I 
had served no one, had worked for no one, and knew well that my money did not 
represent work I had done. 

And I came to feel that in money itself, in the very possession of it, there is something 
evil and immoral; and that money itself, and the fact that I possess it, is one of the chief 
causes of the evils I saw around me - and I asked myself: What is money? 


CHAPTER XVII 

MONEY! What is money? 

Money represents work. I have even met educated people who declare that money 
represents the work of him who possesses it. I confess that m an obscure way I formerly 
shared that opinion but I felt it necessary to know what money really is, and to find this 
out I turned to science. 

Science says that there is nothing unjust or harmful in money, but that it is a natural con- 
dition of social life, necessary: (1) for convenience of exchange, (2) for fixing a measure 
of value, (3) for savings, and (4) for payments. The obvious fact that if I have three 
surplus rubles in my pocket which I can spare, I can at a whistle call together in any 
civilized town a hundred people who for those three rubles will perform most laborious, 
repulsive, and degrading tasks, is not due to the nature of money but to the very complex 
conditions of our economic life. The power some people have over others does not arise 
from money, but from the fact that the labourer does not receive the full value of his 
labour. That he does not receive the full value of his labour results from the nature of 
capital, rent, and wages, and from complex relations between these and the items of 



Leo Tolstoy 


56 


What Then Must We Do? 


production, distribution, and consumption, of wealth. In plain Russian it results that those 
who have money can twist those who have none into ropes. But science says that the 
truth of the matter does not lie in that. Science says that three factors enter into every kind 
of production: land, stored up labour (capital), and labour. From different interactions of 
these factors on one another, and because the first two factors - land and capital - are not 
in the hands of the workers but in those of other people-and from very intricate 
combinations arising from this, the enslavement of some people by others results. From 
what does the dominion of money, which amazes us by its injustice and cruelty, arise? 
Why do some people rule over others by means of money? Science says that this is due to 
the division of the factors of production, and from combinations that result there from 
and oppress the labourers. This reply always seemed to me strange, not merely because it 
leaves out one part of the question - namely, the significance of money in the matter - but 
also by its division of the factors of production, which at first sight always strikes one as 
artificial and not in accord with the facts. It is asserted that in all production three factors 
are always engaged: land, capital, and labour, and thereupon it is always assumed that 
wealth (or what represents it - money) is naturally subdivided among those who own 
these factors: the rent-the value of the land - belongs to the landlord; the interest to the 
capitalist; and wages - the payment for work - to the working man. Is that so? First of all, 
is it true that in all production these three factors are engaged? 

Around me while I write this, hay is being produced. Of what is this production made up? 
I am told: of the land on which the grass has grown; of capital-the scythes, rakes, 
pitchforks, and carts necessary for gathering the hay; and of labour. But I see that this is 
not true. Besides the land the sun, water, and the social organization (which preserves 
these fields from trespass), the workers' knowledge, and their ability to speak and to 
understand words, and many other factors which for some reason political economy does 
not take into account - all take part in the production of this hay. 

The power of the sun is just such a factor of all production as the land, and is yet more 
necessary. I can imagine a condition (say in a town) in which people assume a right to 
shut, off the sun from others by walls or trees; why is it not included among the factors of 
production? Water is another factor as essential as land. So is the air also. And I can 
again imagine people deprived of water and of pure air because other people claim an 
exclusive right to the water and the air that is needed. Social security is another such 
essential factor, and food and clothing for the workers are also such factors of production, 
as some economists admit education and the ability to speak, which make it possible to 
apply various kinds of work, are other such factors. I could fill a whole volume with such 
omitted factors of production. Why then have just these three factors of production been 
selected and put at the basis of the science? Sunlight and water can be reckoned as 
separate factors of production just as land is the labourers' food and clothing, knowledge, 
and its transmission, can be reckoned as separate factors of production, just like the 
labourers' implements. Why are sunbeams, water, food, and knowledge not reckoned as 
separate factors of production, but only land, implements, and labour? Is it merely 
because only in rare instances do people claim rights in sunbeams, water, air, or the right 
to speak and to listen, while in our society such rights are constantly claimed in the use of 
land and the implements of labour? There is no other basis for it, and so I see, first, that 
the division of the factors of production into three only is quite arbitrary and does not rest 
on the nature of things. But perhaps this division is so natural to people that wherever 



What Then Must We Do? 


57 


Leo Tolstoy 


economic relations are formed these three, and only these three, factors of production 
come to the front. Let us see whether that is so. I look first of all around myself at the 
Russian settlers, of whom there are and have been mi llions. These settlers come to some 
new land, settle down on it, and begin to work; and it does not enter any of their heads 
that a man who does not work the land can have any right to it, and the land does not 
advance any separate claims of its own, on the contrary the settlers regard the land as a 
common possession and consider that every man has a right to mow and plough where he 
pleases and as much as he can manage. The settlers bring implements for the cultivation 
of the land, for growing vegetables, and for building their houses, and again it does not 
occur to anyone that the tools of labour can of themselves produce an income nor does 
that capital make any claim, but on the contrary the settlers consciously recognize that 
any profit charged for the loan of implements or for a loan of grain - that is, for capital - 
is unjust. The settlers work on free land with their own tools or with tools lent to them 
without interest, each on his own account, or all together at a common task, and in such a 
commune it is impossible to find rent, interest on capital, or wages. In speaking of such 
communes I am not inventing, but am describing what has taken place everywhere and 
happens now, not only among Russian settlers but everywhere, as long as nothing 
infringes man's natural habits. I describe what appears to everyone natural and 
reasonable. People settle on the land and each one sets to work at what is natural to him; 
and each, having prepared what he needs for it, does his own work. If it is more 
convenient for them to work together they form an association, an artel; but neither in 
their separate farming nor in the artels are the factors of production separated, but there is 
only labour and the necessary conditions of labour: the sun which warms all, the air 
which people breathe, the water they draw, the land on which they work, clothes for their 
bodies, food for their stomachs, the crowbar, the spade, the plough, and the engine, with 
which people work; and it is evident that neither the sun, the air, the water, the land, nor 
the clothes for the body, nor the crowbar with which they work, nor the spade, nor the 
plough, nor the engine which they use in the artel can belong to anyone but to those who 
make use of the rays of the sun, breathe the air, drink the water eat the bread, cover their 
bodies, and work with the spade or the engine; because all these are needed only by those 
who use them. And when people act so, we all see that they act as is proper for men and 
as is reasonable. And so, observing the economic relations among men at the time of their 
formation, I do not see that the division of the factors of production into three is natural to 
man. On the contrary I see that it is unnatural and irrational. But perhaps it is only in 
primitive societies that the division into those three factors does not take place, while it is 
inevitable with an increase in population and the development of culture, since this 
division has taken place in European society and we cannot help acknowledging the 
accomplished fact. Let us see whether that is so. We are told that in European society the 
division of the factors of production has been completed that is, that some people possess 
the land, others the implements of production, and a third set is deprived of land and 
implements. The workers are deprived of land and of the implements of production. We 
are so accustomed to this assertion that we are no longer struck by its strangeness. But if 
we consider that expression, we at once perceive its incorrectness and even senselessness. 
There is an inner contradiction in the very expression. The conception of a labourer 
includes the conception- of the land on which he lives and of the tools he works with. If 
he did not live on the land and had no implements of labour he would not be a labourer. 



Leo Tolstoy 


58 


What Then Must We Do? 


There never has been or could be a labourer without land or implements. There cannot be 
an agricultural labourer without land on which to work, and without scythe, cart, and 
horse; nor can there be a shoemaker without a house on the land, without water, air, and 
implements of toil with which he works. If a peasant has no land, horse, or scythe, or a 
shoemaker has no house, water, or awl, this means that someone has driven him off the 
land and taken from him, or cheated him out of, his scythe, cart, horse, or awl, but it does 
not mean that there can be an agricultural labourer without a plough, or a shoemaker 
without tools. As a fisherman on land and without tackle is unthinkable unless someone 
has driven him off the water and taken his tackle, so is a peasant or shoemaker 
unimaginable without the land on which he lives and without implements of labour, 
unless someone has deprived him of land and taken away his tools. 

There may be people who are driven from one spot to another and from whom their 
implements of toil have been taken, and who are compelled to work with other people's 
tools at articles they do not need, but that does not indicate that such is the nature of 
production; it only means that there are cases when the natural conditions of production 
are infringed. If one accepts as the factors of production everything of which the worker 
may be deprived by other people's violence why not consider a claim on a slave's person 
to be a factor of production? Why not regard a claim to the sun's rays, to the air, to the 
water, as being such factors? A man may appear who, having built a wall, shuts out the 
sun from his neighbour; there may be someone who diverts the water of a river into a 
pond and so pollutes the water; or someone may appear who regards another as his 
possession; but neither the first, nor the second, nor the third pretension, even if forcibly 
carried into effect, can be admitted as a basis for a division of the factors of production, 
and it is as incorrect to accept an imaginary right to the land and to the implements of toil 
as separate factors of production as it would be to reckon the imaginary right to control 
the rays of the sun, the air, the water, or the person of another man, as being such factors. 
There may be people who claim a right to the land and to a worker's implements of toil, 
as there have been men who claimed a labourer's person, and as there may be men 
claiming an exclusive use of the sun, of water, or of the air, and there may be men who 
drive the worker from place to place and forcibly take from him the produce of his toil as 
soon as it is made, as well as his implements of labour, and who compel him to work for 
a master and not for himself, as is done in factories - all this is possible; but there can still 
be no workman without land and without tools, just as a man cannot be another's chattel 
despite the fact that men long declared that it was so. 

Just as the assertion of a right of property in another man's person cannot deprive a slave 
of his innate right to seek his own welfare rather than that of his owner - so now the 
assertion of a right of property in land and in other men's implements of production, 
cannot deprive the labourer of each man's innate right to live on the land and with his 
personal or communal tools to produce things he considers useful for himself. All that 
science, observing the present economic conditions, can say is that there exist claims 
made by certain people to the workers' land and tools, in consequence of which for some 
of those workers (by no means for all) the conditions of production natural to man are 
violated in such a way that the workers are deprived of the land and of the implements of 
production and compelled to use other people's tools; but it cannot be said that this casual 
infringement of the law of production is itself the law of production. 



What Then Must We Do? 


59 


Leo Tolstoy 


By affirming that this division of the factors of production is the basic law of production, 
an economist does what a zoologist would do who, seeing a great lmy greenfinches with 
clipped wings in little cages, should conclude that a little cage and a small water-pail 
drawn up along rails, are the essential conditions of the life of birds, and that the life of 
birds is composed of these three factors. However many finches there may be with 
clipped wings in cardboard cages, the zoologist should not consider cardboard cages a 
natural condition of birds. However many workers may be driven from their places and 
deprived of their produce and of the implements of their toil, the natural characteristic of 
a worker to live on the earth and produce with his own implements the things he needs 
will remain the same. There are the claims made by some people to the earth and to the 
labourers' implements of toil, just as in the ancient world there were the claims of some 
men to own the persons of others; but as there cannot be a division of people into owners 
and slaves, such as people wished to establish in the ancient world, so there cannot be a 
division of the factors of production into land and capital, such as economists in present- 
day society wish to establish. But these unjustifiable encroachments by some men on the 
freedom of others, men of science call natural factors of production. Instead of taking its 
bases from the natural characteristics of human society, science has taken them from a 
specific case and, wishing to justify that specific case, has admitted one man's right to the 
land whereon another feeds himself, and to the tools of labour with which another works; 
that is, it has admitted a right which never existed and never can exist and which bears a 
contradiction in its very expression, for the right a man claims to land he does not work 
on is really nothing but the right to use land I do not use, and the right to the tools of 
labour is nothing but the right to work with tools I do not work with. Science by its 
division of the factors of production asserts that the natural condition of the workman is 
the unnatural condition in which he finds himself, just as in the ancient world, by the 
division into citizens and slaves, people asserted that the unnatural condition of the slaves 
was a natural characteristic of man. That division, accepted by science merely to justify 
an existing evil which it has adopted as the basis of its investigations, has resulted in 
science vainly trying to furnish some kind of explanation of existing facts, and while 
denying the clearest and simplest answers to the questions presented, giving answers that 
amount to nothing. 

The question for economic science is this: What is the cause of the fact that some people 
who have land and capital are able to enslave those who have no land or capital? The 
reply which common sense presents is that this results from money, which has the effect 
of enslaving people. But science denies this, and says that it does not result from the 
nature of money but from the fact that some people have land and capital and others have 
not. We ask: Why can people who have land and capital enslave those who have none? - 
and we are told: 'Because they have land and capital.' But that is what we were asking 
about. To be deprived of land and of the tools of production is enslavement. It is the old 
reply: tacit dormire quia habet virtus dormitiva . 1 But life does not cease to present its 
essential question, and even science itself sees this and tries to give a reply, but cannot do 
so as long as it starts from the basis it has chosen and revolves in a vicious circle. To be 
able to do it, science should first of all renounce its false division of the factors of pro- 
duction, that is, should cease to take the results of phenomena for their causes, and should 


1 It causes sleep because it has a sleep-giving quality. 



Leo Tolstoy 


60 


What Then Must We Do? 


first seek the nearest, and then the more remote, causes of those phenomena which form 
the subject of its investigation. Science should reply to the question: What is the reason of 
the fact that some people are deprived of the land and of the implements of production, 
while others possess them? Or what is the reason of the alienation of the land and the 
implements of labour from those who cultivate the land and use the implements? And as 
soon as science sets itself that question quite new considerations present themselves, 
turning upside down all the assumptions of the former quasi-science which revolved in a 
vicious circle of assertions that the poverty of the workers results from the fact that they 
are poor. To plain men it seems indubitable that the proximate cause of the enslavement 
of some people by others is money. But science denies this, and says that money is only 
an instrument of exchange which has nothing in common with the enslavement of people. 
Let us see whether that is so. 


CHAPTER XVIII 

WHERE does money come from? Under what conditions does a nation always have 
money, and under what conditions do we know nations not using it? A tribe lives in 
Africa or Australia, as in olden times the Scythians or the Drevlyans 1 lived. Such a tribe 
lives, ploughing, raising cattle, and growing fruit. We hear of them at the dawn of history, 
and history begins with the incursion of conquerors. The conquerors always do one and 
the same thing: they take from the tribe all they can take, cattle, grain, woven stuffs, and 
even male and female prisoners, and carry it all off. Some years later the conquerors 
return, but the tribe has not yet recovered from its ruin and there is but little to be taken 
from it, so the conquerors devise other better ways of exploiting the tribe. These ways are 
very simple and occur naturally to everyone. The first method is personal slavery. This 
involves the inconvenience of having to direct the whole working force of the tribe and 
feed them all; so a second method naturally presents itself - that of leaving the tribe on its 
land, while claiming for oneself the ownership of the land and dividing it among one's 
followers in order through them to exploit the people's labour. But this method too has its 
inconveniences. The followers have to manage all the productive operations of the tribe; 
and a third method, as primitive as the others, is introduced - that of demanding a certain 
periodic tribute from the conquered. The conqueror's aim is to take as much as possible 
of the people's produce. Obviously, to do this, he must take the things that have the 
highest value among the tribesmen and that at the same time are not bulky but can 
conveniently be stored, such as skins and gold. 

So the conqueror usually imposes on the family or tribe a periodic tribute in skins and 
gold and by this means exploits the toil of the people in the way most convenient to 
himself. The skins and the gold having been almost all taken from the tribe, the 
conquered people to obtain gold have to sell to one another and to the conqueror and his 
followers everything they have, both their property and their work. This same process 
went on in the ancient world and in the Middle Ages, and goes on still. In the ancient 
world, with the frequent conquest of one nation by another and in the absence of 
recognition of the equality of man, personal slavery was the most usual method by which 
some people enslaved others, and the centre of gravity of that enslavement rested on 


1 A Slavonic tribe mentioned in early Russian history. 



What Then Must We Do? 


61 


Leo Tolstoy 


chattel slavery. In the Middle Ages the feudal system - that is, the property in land bound 
up with it, and serfdom - partly replaced chattel slavery, and the centre of gravity of the 
enslavement was shifted from the person to the land: in recent times, since the discovery 
of America and the development of trade and the influx of gold accepted as the general 
money standard, with the intensification of government power, money tribute has become 
the chief method of enslaving people and on it all the economic relations of man are 
based. In a volume of literary productions there is an article by Professor Yanzhul which 
gives the recent history of the Fiji Islands. If I wanted to invent a most striking 
illustration of the way in which the demand for money has become in our days the chief 
instrument by which some men enslave others. I could not invent anything more glaring 
and convincing than this true story, which is based on documentary evidence and 
occurred the other day. 

The Fijians live in Polynesia on islands in the Southern Pacific Ocean. The whole group, 
Professor Yanzhul tells us, consists of small islands covering about 8,000 square miles. 
Only half of them are inhabited, by a population of 150,000 natives and 1,500 whites. 
The native inhabitants, who emerged from savagery long ago, are distinguished among 
the natives of Polynesia by their ability, and are capable of work and of development, as 
they have proved by rapidly becoming good farmers and cattle-breeders. They were 
thriving, but in 1859 the kingdom found itself in a desperate position. The Fijians and 
their King Thakombau needed money. They needed $45,000 for contributions or 
indemnities demanded by the United States of America for violence said to have been 
inflicted by Fijians on some citizens of the American republic. 

To collect this sum the Americans sent a squadron, which suddenly seized some of the 
best islands as security and even threatened to bombard and destroy the settlements 
unless the contribution was paid to the American representatives by a given date. The 
Americans had been among the first white men to settle in Fiji with missionaries. 
Selecting or seizing under one pretext or another the best plots of land on the islands and 
laying out cotton and coffee plantations they hired whole crowds of natives, whom they 
bound by contracts the savages did not understand, or obtained through contractors who 
dealt in live chattels. Conflicts between such planters and the natives, whom they 
regarded as slaves, were inevitable, and a conflict of that kind served as pretext for the 
American demand for compensation. Despite its prosperity Fiji till then had been in the 
habit of making payments in kind, as was customary in Europe till the Middle Ages. The 
natives did not use money, and their trade was entirely done by barter; goods were 
exchanged for goods, and the few public or government levies were collected in country 
produce. What were the Fijians and their King Thakombau to do when the Americans 
categorically demanded $45,000 under threat of dire consequences in case of non- 
payment. For the Fijians the figure itself was incomprehensible, not to speak of the 
money, which they had never seen in such quantities. Thakombau consulted with the 
other chiefs, and decided to turn to the Queen of England. At first he asked her to take the 
islands under her protection, and later on asked her simply to annex them. But the 
English treated this petition cautiously and were in no hurry to rescue the semi-savage 
monarch from his difficulties. Instead of a direct reply they fitted out a special expedition, 
in 1860, to investigate the Fiji Islands, in order to decide whether it was worth spending 
money on satisfying the American creditors and annexing the islands to the British 
dominions. 



Leo Tolstoy 


62 


What Then Must We Do? 


Meanwhile the American government continued to insist on payment, took possession, as 
security, of some of the best positions, and having observed the prosperity of the people, 
raised its demand from $45,000 to $90,000, and threatened to raise it still further if 
Thakombau did not pay promptly. So, pressed on all sides, poor Thakombau, who was 
ignorant of European methods of arranging credit transactions, began, on the advice of 
European settlers, to seek money from Melbourne merchants on any terms, even if he had 
to yield his whole kingdom to private persons. And so in Melbourne, in response to 
Thakombau's appeal, a trading Company was formed. This Company, which took the 
name of the Polynesian Company, concluded an agreement with the Fiji rulers on terms 
very favourable to itself. Undertaking to meet the debt to the American government and 
engaging to pay it by certain fixed dates, the Company under its first agreement obtained 
100,000, and later 200,000 acres, of the best land at its own selection, with freedom for 
all time from all taxes and duties for its factories, operations, and colonies, and for a pro- 
longed period the exclusive right to establish banks in Fiji with the privilege of unlimited 
issue of bank-notes. Since the signing of that contract, finally concluded in 1868, the 
Fijians were confronted, side by side with their own government under Thakombau, by 
another power - the influential trading Company with great landed possessions on all the 
islands and a decisive influence in the government. Till then Thakombau's government 
for the satisfaction of its needs had contented itself with what it obtained by various 
tributes in kind and by a small customs duty on imported goods. With the conclusion of 
this agreement, and the establishment of the powerful Polynesian Company, its financial 
position changed. An important part of the best land in its dominions passed over to the 
Company and so the taxes diminished; on the other hand, as we know, the Company had 
a right to the free import and export of goods, as a result of which revenue from the 
customs was also reduced. The natives, that is to say 99 per cent, of the population, had 
always been but poor contributors to the customs revenue, for they hardly used any 
European goods except a little cotton stuff and some metal ware; and now, when through 
the Polynesian Company the wealthier European inhabitants escaped the payment of 
customs dues, King Thakombau's revenue became quite insignificant and he had to bestir 
himself to increase it. And so Thakombau consulted his white friends as to how to escape 
from his difficulties, and they advised him to introduce for the first time in the country 
direct taxation, and, no doubt to facilitate matters for him, it was to be in the form of a 
money-tax. The levy was instituted in the form of a general poll-tax of £1 on each male 
and four shillings on each woman in the islands. 

Even to the present day in the Fiji Islands, as we have already mentioned, the cultivation 
of the soil and direct barter prevails. Very few natives have any money. Their wealth 
consists entirely of various raw produce and of cattle, but not of money. Yet the new tax 
demanded, at fixed dates and at all costs, a sum of money which for a native with a 
family came to a very considerable total. Till then a native had not been accustomed to 
pay any personal dues to the government except in the form of labour, while the taxes 
had all been paid by the villages or communes to which he belonged, from the common 
fields out of which he, too, drew his chief income. He had only one way out of the 
difficulty: to obtain money from the white colonists that is, to go either to a trader or a 
planter who had what he needed-money. To the first he had to sell his produce at any 
price, since the tax-collector demanded it by a given date, or he was even obliged to 
borrow money against future produce, a circumstance of which the trader naturally took 



What Then Must We Do? 


63 


Leo Tolstoy 


advantage to secure an unscrupulous profit; or else he had to turn to a planter and sell him 
his labour, that is to become a labourer. But it turned out that wages on the Fiji Islands, in 
consequence probably of much labour being offered simultaneously, were very low, not 
exceeding, according to the report of the present administration, a shilling a week for an 
adult male, or £2.12 s. a year; and consequently merely to obtain the money to pay his 
own tax, not to mention his family's, a Fijian had to abandon his home, his family, his 
own land and cultivation, and often to move far off to another island and bind himself to 
a planter for half a year, in order to earn the £1 needed for the payment of the new tax; 
while for the payment of the tax for a whole family he had to seek other means. The 
result of such an arrangement can easily be imagined. From his 150,000 subjects 
Thakombau only collected £6,000; and then an intensive demand, previously unknown, 
began for taxes, and a series of compulsory measures. The local administration, 
previously honest, soon came to an understanding with the white planters who had begun 
to manage the country. The Fijians were taken to court for non-payment and sentenced, 
besides the payment of costs, to imprisonment for not less than half a year. The role of 
prison was played by the plantation of the first white man willing to pay the tax and legal 
costs for the prisoner. In this way the whites obtained cheap labour to any desired extent. 
At first this handing over to compulsory labour was permitted for a period of six months 
only, but later on the venal judges found it possible to sentence men even to eighteen 
months' labour and then to renew the sentence. Very soon, in a few years, the picture of 
the economic condition of the inhabitants, of Fiji had completely changed. Whole 
flourishing districts had become half-depopulated and were extremely impoverished. The 
whole male population, except the old and the feeble, were working away from home for 
the white planters to obtain money needed for the payment of the tax, or to satisfy 
sentences of the court. Women in Fiji do hardly any agricultural labour, and so, m the 
absence of the men, the land was neglected or totally abandoned. In a few years half the 
population of Fiji had become slaves to, the white colonists. To improve their condition 
the Fijians again turned to England. A new petition appeared, to which were appended 
the names of many of the most notable persons and chiefs, begging to be made British 
subjects, and it was presented to the British consul. By this time England, thanks to its 
scientific expeditions, had not only studied but had even surveyed the islands and was 
well aware of the natural wealth of that beautiful corner of the globe. For these reasons 
the negotiations this time were crowned with full success, and in 1874, to the great 
dissatisfaction of the American planters, England officially entered into possession of the 
Fiji Islands, adding them to its colonies. 

Thakombau died and a small pension was assigned to his heirs. The government of the 
islands was entrusted to Sir Hercules Robinson (Lord Rosmead), the Governor of New 
South Wales. During the first year of its annexation to England Fiji was without a 
government of its own, but Sir Hercules Robinson appointed an administrator. On taking 
the islands in hand the English government had a hard task to solve in fulfilling all that 
was expected of it. In the first place, the natives expected the abolition of the hateful poll- 
tax; the white colonists (who were partly American) either regarded the British rule 
distrustfully or (the British section) expected from it all kinds of benefits, for instance, the 
recognition of their dominion over the natives and the legalization of their claims to land 
they had seized, and so forth. The English government, however, proved competent to 
deal with the problem, and its first act was to abolish for ever the poll-tax which 



Leo Tolstoy 


64 


What Then Must We Do? 


occasioned the enslavement of the natives for the profit of a few colonists. But here Sir 
Hercules Robinson was confronted by a serious dilemma. It was necessary to annul the 
poll-tax to escape from which the Fijians had appealed to the British government, but at 
the same time, by the rules of English colonial policy, the colony had to pay its own way, 
that is to say, had to find means to meet the expenses of its administration. Yet with the 
abolition of the poll-tax the whole income of Fiji (from the customs dues) did not exceed 
£6,000, whereas the expenses of the administration demanded at least £70,000 a year. So 
Robinson, having abolished the money tax, devised a labour tax, that is, imposed 
obligatory labour on the Fijians, but this did not bring in the £70,000 required for his 
Own and his assistants' maintenance. And matters did not progress till the appointment of 
a new Governor, Sir A. M. Gordon (Baron Stanmore), who, to obtain from the 
inhabitants the money needed for his own and his assistants' support, devised the plan of 
not demanding money until there should be enough of it in circulation on the islands, but 
of collecting produce from the natives and selling it himself. 


This tragic episode in the life of the Fijians is the clearest and best indication of what 
money is and of its significance. Here all is expressed: the first basis of slavery - cannon, 
threats, murder, the seizure of land, and also the chief instrument - money, which replaces 
all other means. What has to be followed through the course of centuries in an historic 
sketch of the economic development of nations, is here, when the various forms of 
monetary coercion have been fully developed, concentrated into a single decade. The 
drama begins with the American government sending ships with loaded cannon to the 
shores of the land, whore inhabitants it wishes to enslave. 

The pretext for the threat is monetary, but the drama begins with cannon directed against 
all the inhabitants: women, children, the aged, and the innocent: an occurrence now being 
repeated in Africa, China, and Central Asia. That was the beginning of the drama: 'Your 
money or your life,' repeated in the history of all the conquests of all the nations; $45,000 
and then $90,000, or a massacre. But there were no $90,000 available. The Americans 
had them. And then the second act of the drama begins: brief, bloody, terrible and 
concentrated slaughter has to be postponed, and changed for less noticeable, but more 
prolonged sufferings. And the tribe with its ruler seeks means to substitute monetary 
enslavement - slavery, for the massacre. It borrows money, and then the monetary forms 
of the enslavement of men are organized. 

These forms at once begin to act like a disciplined army and within five years the whole 
work is done: the people are not only deprived of the right to use the land, and of their 
property, but also of their liberty; they are slaves. 

The third act begins: the situation is too hard and the unfortunate people hear rumours 
that it is possible to exchange masters and go into slavery to someone else. (Of 
emancipation from the slavery imposed by money there is no longer any thought.) And 
the tribe calls in another master, to whom it submits with a request to mitigate its 
condition. The English come, see that the possession of these islands will make it 
possible for them to feed the drones of whom they have bred too many, and the English 
government annexes these islands with their inhabitants, but does not take them as chattel 
slaves and does not even take the land and distribute it to its own supporters. Those old 



What Then Must We Do? 


65 


Leo Tolstoy 


methods are now unnecessary. All that is necessary is that a tribute should be exacted; 
one large enough on the one hand to keep the slaves in slavery, and sufficient on the other 
to feed a multitude of drones. 

The inhabitants had to pay £70,000 sterling. That is the fundamental condition on which 
England agreed to rescue the Fijians from their American slavery, and at the same time 
this was all that was necessary for the complete enslavement of the natives. But it turned 
out that under the conditions they were in the Fijians could not possibly pay £70,000. The 
demand was too great. The English modify the demand for a time, and take part of the 
claim in produce, in order, in due course, when money should be in circulation, to raise 
their exaction to its full amount. England did not act like the former Company, whose 
procedure may be compared to the first arrival of savage conquerors among a savage 
people, when all they want is to seize what they can get and to go away again, but 
England acts as a far-seeing enslaver: it does not at once kill the hen that lays the golden 
egg, but will even feed it, knowing the hen to be a good layer. At first she slackens the 
reins for her own advantage, in order later to pull them in and reduce the Fijians to the 
state of monetary enslavement in which the European and civilized world finds itself, and 
from which no emancipation is in sight. 

Money is a harmless medium of exchange, only not when at the shores of a country 
loaded cannon are directed against its inhabitants. As soon as money is forcibly exacted 
at the cannon's mouth, then inevitably that is repeated which occurred on the Fiji Islands 
and has been repeated, and is repeated, everywhere and always: in the case of the old 
Princes of Russia and the Drevlyans, and with all governments and their subjects. People 
who have the power to coerce others will do it by the forcible demand of such a quantity 
of money as will oblige the coerced to become the slaves of the coercers. And besides 
this, what happened in the case of the English and the Fijians always happens, namely 
that the coercers, in order to hasten the enslavement, will in their demands for money 
always exceed rather than understate the limit of what is needed for the purpose. They 
will reach that limit without exceeding it only if a moral feeling is present, and even if 
that feeling does exist, they will always reach it when they are themselves in want. But 
governments will always exceed that limit, first because a government has no moral 
feelings, and secondly because, as we know, governments are themselves in extreme 
want, due to wars and to the need of paying their supporters. Governments are always 
irredeemably in debt and, even if they wished to, could not help following the rule 
expressed by a Russian statesman of the eighteenth century, that 'one must shear the 
peasant and not let him get overgrown'. All governments are irredeemably in debt, and 
this debt in its totality (apart from fortuitous diminutions in England and America) 
increases from year to year in a terrifying progression. Similarly do the budgets grow, 
that is the necessity of struggling with other aggressors and making payments of money 
and land to those who aid its own aggressions, and therefore the charges on land grown 
the same way. Wages do not grow - not on account of the law of rent, but because there is 
an exaction by violence, of payments to the state and for the land, which has the purpose 
of taking from people all their surplus so that to satisfy this demand they must sell their 
labour: for the exploitation of that labour is the object of the imposition, of the taxes. But 
the exploitation of that labour is only possible when, in the aggregate, more is demanded 
than the workers can pay without depriving themselves of nourishment. Raising the scale 
of wages would destroy the possibility of this slavery, and therefore, while there is 



Leo Tolstoy 


66 


What Then Must We Do? 


violence, it never can be raised. And this simple and intelligible action of one set of men 
on another, economists have called the 'iron law' while the instrument by means of which 
this action is produced they call a 'medium of exchange'. 

Money - this harmless medium of exchange is needed by men in their mutual intercourse. 
But why has there never been, or could there be, money in its present-day significance 
where no forcible demand for money-taxes exists? And why has there always been, and 
always will be as there is among the Fijians, the Kirgiz, the Africans, the Phoenicians, 
and in general among people who do not pay taxes - either the direct exchange of things 
for things, or else the use of casual tokens of value, such as sheep, furs, skins, or shells? 
Any particular kind of money; only obtains currency among people when it is forcibly 
demanded of them all. Only then does it become necessary to everyone that he may 
ransom himself from violence, and only then does it obtain a constant exchange value. 
And what then acquires value is not what is most convenient as a medium of exchange 
but what the government demands. If gold is demanded, gold will have value; if knuckle- 
bones were demanded, knuckle-bones would have value. If this were not so, why has the 
emission of this medium of exchange always formed, and why does it form, a prerogative 
of government? People - let us say the Fijians - have established a medium of exchange; 
well then let them exchange as they please, and you who have power - that is who have 
means to inflict violence - should not interfere with that exchange. But as it is, you coin 
money, forbidding anyone else to coin it, or else (as among us in Russia) you merely 
print bits of paper with the Tsar's head on them and sign them with a particular signature, 
exacting penalties for any imitation of this money, and you distribute it to your assistants, 
and in payment of state and land taxes demand just these coins or these bits of paper with 
just that signature, and so much of it that a workman has to give his whole labour to 
obtain these same bits of paper, or coins, and you assure us that we need this money - as a 
'medium of exchange'. Men are all free and they do not oppress one another, do not, hold 
one another in slavery, only there is this money in use and an iron law according to which 
rent rises and wages dwindle to a minimum! The fact that half (and more than half) the 
Russian peasants are enslaved as labourers to landowners and to mill-owners, on account 
of direct and indirect taxes and land dues, does not at all mean, what is obvious, that the 
compulsory exaction of direct indirect, and land taxes paid in money to the government 
and to its assistants - the land-owners - compels workmen to go into slavery to those who 
take the money, but it means that money exists - a medium of exchange - and that there is 
an iron law ! 

Before the serfs were emancipated I could compel Vanka to do any kind of work, and if 
he refused I sent him to the rural police and they whipped his bottom till Vanka 
submitted. At the same time if I made Vanka overwork himself or did not give him land 
or food, the matter went before the authorities and I had to answer for it. Now men are 
free but I can make Vanka, Sidorka, or Petrushka do any kind of work, and if he refuses I 
do not give him money for his taxes and they will whip his bottom till he submits; 
besides which I can make a German, a Frenchman, a Chinaman or a Hindu who lacks 
land and bread, work for me by not giving him money to hire land or buy bread unless he 
submits to me. And if I make him work without food beyond his strength, and if I kill 
him with work, no one will say a word to me, and if in addition I have read books on 
political economy I may be firmly convinced that all men are free and that money does, 
not occasion slavery. The peasants have long known that 'a ruble hits harder than an oak 



What Then Must We Do? 


67 


Leo Tolstoy 


cudgel'. But the economists do not wish to see this. To say that money does not cause 
slavery, is just like saying half a century ago that the serf law did not produce slavery. 
Economists say that despite the fact that the possession of money enables one man to 
enslave another, money is a harmless medium of exchange. Why should one not have 
said half a century ago, that despite the fact that the serf-law could enslave a man, the law 
was not a means of enslavement but a harmless medium of mutual service? Some people 
gave rough labour, others attended to the physical and mental welfare of the slaves and 
organized their work. I even think that that used to be said. 


CHAPTER XIX 

IF this pseudo-science, political economy, were not occupied, like all the juridical 
sciences, with devising excuses for violence, it could not avoid taking note of the strange 
fact that the distribution of wealth - the circumstance that some people are deprived of 
land and capital and that some men enslave others - is all dependent on money, and only 
by means of money does one set of men now exploit the labour of others, that is, enslave 
others. 

I repeat: a man who has money can buy up all the com and starve another and make a 
complete slave of him through his need of bread. And this is done before our eyes on an 
enormous scale. It would seem necessary to seek the connexion between the phenomena 
of slavery and money; but science asserts with full confidence that money has nothing to 
do with the enslavement of men. 

Science says: money is a commodity like any other the value of which is fixed by its cost 
of production, the only difference being that this commodity has been chosen as most 
convenient to serve as a standard of values, for savings, as a means of exchange, and to 
effect payments: one man makes boots and another grows grain, while a third raises 
sheep; and more conveniently to exchange their produce they introduce money which 
represents a proportionate amount of work, and by its means they can exchange leather 
soles for sheep's ribs and ten pounds of flour. 

The exponents of this pseudo-science are very fond of imagining such a state of affairs to 
themselves, but it never existed in the world. Such a conception of society is like the 
conception of a primitive uncorrupted perfect human society that philosophers used to be 
fond of devising. But there never was such a state. In all human societies where money 
has existed as such, violence has always been exerted by the strong and well armed 
against the weak and unarmed; and where there was violence the standard of values, 
money - whatever it may have been: cattle, hides, furs, or metals-inevitably lost that 
significance and became merely a means of ransom from violence. Money certainly has 
the innocuous qualities science enumerates, but they would be its essential qualities only 
in a society where there was no violence of man to man - in an ideal society; and in such 
a society money as money - a common measure of values - would not exist at all, just as 
it has not existed and could not exist in any society not subjected to general governmental 
violence. But in all societies known to us where money exists it has obtained importance 
as a medium of exchange only because it has served as an instrument of violence. And Its 
chief significance is not as a medium of exchange but as an instrument of violence. 
Where there is violence money cannot be a regular medium of exchange because it 



Leo Tolstoy 


68 


What Then Must We Do? 


cannot be a standard of values. It cannot be a standard of values because as soon as one 
man in a society can deprive another of the products of his labour, this standard is at once 
infringed. If horses and cows are brought to market some of which have been reared by 
their owners while others have been forcibly taken from those who reared them, it is plain 
that the price of horses and cows in that market will not correspond to the cost of rearing 
the stock, and that the prices of all articles will be altered as a consequence of this 
alteration, and money will not have fixed the price of those articles. Moreover if one can 
acquire a cow, a horse, or a house, by force, it is also possible to take money itself by 
force and with that money to obtain all kinds of produce. But if money itself is obtained 
by violence and used to purchase commodities, it quite loses every semblance of a 
medium of exchange. The oppressor, when he seizes the money and gives it for things 
produced by labour, does not exchange, but by means of money takes whatever he wants. 

But even if such an imaginary and impossible society had existed in which, without any 
general governmental violence exercised over men, money - silver or gold - had the 
significance of a standard of values and a medium of exchange, even then as soon as 
violence was introduced money would at once lose that significance. An oppressor makes 
his appearance in such a society as a conqueror. This man, let us suppose, seizes cows, 
horses, clothing, and the houses of the inhabitants, but finds it inconvenient to deal with 
all these, and so it naturally occurs to him to take from these people whatever among 
them represents all kinds of values and can be exchanged for all kinds of articles, namely, 
money. Money at once ceases to have significance as a standard of values in that society, 
because the value of all articles will depend on the caprice of the oppressor. The article 
the oppressor needs most and for which he will give most money, will become the most 
valuable, and vice versa. So that in a society subjected to violence money at once 
acquires the predominant significance of a means whereby the oppressor exercises his 
violence, and it will retain significance as a medium of exchange among the oppressed 
only in so far and to such an extent as is convenient to the oppressor. 

Let us imagine matters in such a society. Serfs furnish their owner with linen, poultry, 
sheep, and day-labour. The owner substitutes money dues for these payments in kind and 
fixes prices for the various articles brought him. Anyone who can supply no linen, corn, 
cattle, or day labour, may pay a fixed sum of money. Evidently among this owner's serfs 
the price of articles will always depend on the arbitrary will of the serf owner. He uses 
the articles he receives; and some he needs more and others less, and accordingly fixes 
higher or lower prices for them. Evidently his whims or needs will decide the prices of 
these articles among those who have to pay him. If he needs grain he will fix a higher 
payment for not furnishing the allotted quantity of gram and a cheaper rate for not 
furnishing linen, cattle, and day-labour; and so those who have no grain will sell their 
produce, labour, linen, or cattle, to others in order to be able to buy grain to satisfy the 
proprietor. If the serf-owner decides to put all these obligations on a money basis, again 
the price of the commodities will not depend on their labour value but, first, on the 
amount of money the estate owner demands, and, secondly, on the question which of the 
articles produced by the peasants he most needs and for which therefore he will pay 
more, and for which less, money. The exaction by the estate-owner of money from the 
peasants would only fall to influence the price of articles among those peasants 
themselves-first, if the serfs of this owner lived in isolation from others and had no 
intercourse except among themselves and with their owner; and, secondly, if he used the 



What Then Must We Do? 


69 


Leo Tolstoy 


money not to purchase commodities in his own village, but outside it. Only under such 
conditions would the prices of the commodities though nominally altered, remain 
relatively true, and money would have the significance of a standard of values and of 
exchange; but if the peasants had economic relations with the surrounding population, the 
estate-owner’s greater or lesser demand for money would heighten or lower the price of 
the articles they produced, in relation to their neighbours. (If less money were demanded 
of their neighbours than of them, their produce would be sold more cheaply than that of 
their neighbours and vice versa.) And, secondly only if the money he collected were not 
used to purchase the productions of his own peasants would the estate-owner's exaction 
of money from the peasants fail to influence the value of their produce. But if he uses the 
money to buy things his peasants produce, it is evident that among them the relation of 
prices between various commodities will constantly change according to the estate- 
owner's purchases of this or that commodity. Let us suppose that one estate-owner 
charged very highly for permission to allow his serfs to work or trade on their own 
account while a neighbouring proprietor made a small charge for the same privilege, it is 
plain that within the domain of the former all commodities will be cheaper than in the 
domain of the second, and that prices in the one .domain and the other will depend 
directly on the increase or decrease of the dues the serfs have to pay. Such is one of the 
influences of violence on price. Another, resulting from the former, will consist in the 
relation between the values of the different products. Let us suppose that one estate- 
owner is fond of horses and pays well for them, while another likes towels and pays well 
for them. Evidently in the domain of both these owners the price for horses and towels 
will be high, and the price of these commodities will be out of proportion to that of cows 
and grain. Next day the man fond of towels dies, and his successor is fond of poultry: 
evidently the price of linen will fall and the price of poultry will rise. Where the violent 
coercion of one man by another exists m a society, the significance of money as a 
standard of values at once succumbs to the arbitrary will of the oppressor and its 
significance as a medium for the exchange of the products of toil gives way to its 
significance as the most convenient means of exploiting the labour of others. The 
oppressor needs the money not as a means of exchange, nor to fix the standard of values - 
he fixes that himself - but only for convenience in his oppression, since money can be 
stored up and money affords the easiest method of keeping the greatest number of people 
in slavery. To seize all the animals, in order always to have as many horses and cows and 
sheep as may be wanted, is inconvenient, for they have to be fed; and it is the same with 
grain, which may spoil; and it is the same with labour and the corvee: at one time a 
thousand labourers are wanted, at another time not even one. Money demanded from 
those who have none makes it possible to avoid all these inconveniences and always to 
have everything that is wanted, and just for this purpose does the oppressor need it. 
Besides that, money is required by the oppressor in order that his power to exploit the 
labour of others may not be limited to certain people but may extend to all who need 
money. If there was no money each estate-owner could exploit only the labour of his own 
serfs; but when two of them agree to take from their serfs money which those serfs do not 
possess, they can both equally exploit all the forces on the two estates. 

And so an oppressor finds it more convenient to make his demands on other people's 
work by means of money, and he needs money simply for this purpose. And for a man 
subjected to violence - a man from whom his work is taken money is not necessary either 



Leo Tolstoy 


70 


What Then Must We Do? 


for exchange (he exchanges without money as all nations without governments have 
done) or to fix a standard of values, for that fixing is done apart from him; or for savings, 
for a man from whom the produce of his labour is taken cannot save; or for payments, 
because a man who is oppressed will have to pay out more than he receives or, if he does 
receive, the payments made him are not in money but in goods (in cases where he 
receives payment for his work directly from his employer's stores) and the same is 
practically the case if all he earns is spent on articles of primary necessity in outside 
shops. Money is demanded of him and he is told that if he does not pay it he will get no 
land or grain, or his cow or his house will be taken from him and he will be hired out to 
labour or will be put in prison. From this he can escape only by selling the produce of his 
labour and his labour itself at prices fixed not by fair exchange but by the power which 
demands the money of him. 

And under such conditions - the influence on values of tribute or of taxes, which is seen 
always and everywhere: with land-owners on a small scale and in kingdoms on a large 
scale - under these conditions, when the cause of the change in prices is as plain as the 
reason why marionettes move their limbs is plain to him who looks behind the wings - 
under these conditions to speak of money as representing a medium of exchange and a 
standard of values is, to say the least, amazing. 


CHAPTER XX 

EVERY enslavement of one man by another is based entirely on the fact that one man 
can deprive another of life, and while maintaining that menacing position can compel the 
other to obey his will. 

One may say with confidence that if there is any enslavement of man, if, that is, one man 
at the will of another and contrary to his own desire performs actions undesirable to the 
doer, the cause of this is simply violence and is based on a threat to the man's life. If a 
man gives his whole work to others, gets insufficient nourishment, hands his little 
children over to hard labour, leaves the land and devotes his whole life to hateful labour 
on things he does not himself want - as occurs before our eyes in our world (which we 
call cultured, because we live in it), it is safe to say that he does this only because he is 
threatened with death if he does not do it. And so in our cultured world, where the 
majority of people do work that is hateful and unnecessary to them under terrible 
privations, the majority of people are in a state of slavery based on threats to their lives. 
In what does this enslavement consist? And wherein lies the threat to their lives? 

In ancient times the method of enslavement and the threat to life were obvious: a 
primitive method of enslaving people was employed. It consisted in a direct threat to kill 
them by the sword. The armed man said to him who was unarmed: I can kill you, as you 
see I have just killed your brother, but I do not wish to-I spare you because, first of all, it 
will be more advantageous both for you and for me if you work for me than if you are 
killed. So do everything I order, for if you refuse I shall kill you. And the unarmed man 
submitted to him that was armed and did all he commanded. The unarmed man worked, 
the armed man threatened. That was the personal slavery that first appeared among all 
peoples and is still to be met with among primitive tribes. That form of enslavement 
comes first, but as life becomes more complex it changes its form. As life becomes more 



What Then Must We Do? 


71 


Leo Tolstoy 


complicated that method presents great inconvenience to the oppressor. To exploit the 
labour of the weak it is necessary to clothe and feed them that is, to keep them so that 
they are fit for work - and this of itself limits the number of the slaves; besides, this 
method obliges the oppressor to stand always over the slaves threatening them with 
death. And so another method of enslaving them is devised. 

Five thousand years ago, as is written in the Bible, Joseph in Egypt invented this new, 
more convenient, and broader method of enslaving people. It is the same that in modem 
times is employed for taming unruly horses and wild beasts in menageries. It is - hunger. 

This is how this invention is described in the Book of Genesis, in the Bible: 

'Ch. xli, v. 48. And he gathered up all the food of the seven [fruitful] years which were in 
the land of Egypt, and laid up the food in the cities: the food of the field, which was 
round about every city, laid he up in the same. 

'49. And Joseph laid up corn as the sand of the sea, very much, until he left numbering; 
for it was without number. 

'53. And the seven years of plenty, that was in the land of Egypt, came to an end. 

'54. And the seven years of famine began to come, according as Joseph had said: and 
there was famine in all lands; but in all the land of Egypt there was bread. 

'55. And when all the land of Egypt was famished the people cried to Pharaoh for bread: 
and Pharaoh said unto all the Egyptians, Go unto Joseph; what he saith to you, do. 

'56. And the famine was over all the face of the earth: and Joseph opened all the 
storehouses, and sold unto the Egyptians; and the famine was sore in the land of Egypt. 

'57. And all countries came into Egypt to Joseph for to buy corn; because the famine was 
sore in all the earth.' 

Joseph, employing the primitive method of the enslavement of people by threat of the 
sword, collected the grain in the fruitful years, in anticipation of bad years which usually 
follow good ones, as everyone knows even without Pharaoh's dream, and by that means - 
hunger - he enslaved both the Egyptians and the inhabitants of the surrounding countries 
by methods more powerful and more convenient to Pharaoh. When the people began to 
hunger, he arranged matters so as to keep them permanently in his power - by hunger. 
This is described in Chapter xlvii: 

'13. And there was no bread in all the land; for the famine was very sore, so that the land 
of Egypt and the land of Canaan fainted by reason of the famine. 

'14. And Joseph gathered up all the money that was found in the land of Egypt, and in the 
land of Canaan, for the corn which they bought: and Joseph brought the money into 
Pharaoh's house. 

'15. And when the money was all spent in the land of Egypt, and in the land of Canaan, 
all the Egyptians came unto Joseph, and said, Give us bread: for why should we die in thy 
presence? for our money faileth. 

'16. And Joseph said, Give your cattle; and I will give you for your cattle, if money fail. 



Leo Tolstoy 


72 


What Then Must We Do? 


'17. And they brought their cattle unto Joseph: and Joseph gave them bread in exchange 
for the horses, and for the flocks, and for the herds, and for the asses: and he fed them 
with bread in exchange for all their cattle for that year. 

'18. And when that year was ended, they came unto him the second year, and said unto 
him, We will not hide from my lord, how that our money is all spent; and the herds of 
cattle are my lord's; there is nought left in the sight of my lord, but our bodies, and our 
lands: 

'19. wherefore should we die before thine eyes, both we and our land? buy us and our 
land for bread, and we and our land will be servants unto Pharaoh: and give us seed, that 
we may live, and not die, and that the land be not desolate. 

'20. So Joseph bought all the land of Egypt for Pharaoh; for the Egyptians sold every man 
his field, because the famine was sore upon them: and the land became Pharaoh's. 

'21. And as for the people, he removed them to the cities from one end of the border of 
Egypt even to the other end thereof. 

'22. Only the land of the priests bought he not: for the priests had a portion from Pharaoh, 
and did eat their portion which Pharaoh gave them; wherefore they sold not their land. 

'23. Then Joseph said unto the people. Behold, I have bought you this day and your land 
for Pharaoh: lo, here is seed for you, and ye shall sow the land. 

'24. And it shall come to pass at the in-gatherings, that ye shall give a fifth unto Pharaoh, 
and four parts shall be your own, for seed of the field, and for your food, and for them of 
your households, and for food for your little ones. 

'25. And they said. Thou hast saved our lives: let us find grace in the sight of my lord, 
and we will be Pharaoh's servants. 

'26. And Joseph made it a statute concerning the land of Egypt unto this day, that Pharaoh 
should have the fifth; only the land of the priests alone became not Pharaoh's.' 

Previously Pharaoh, to exploit the labour of the people, had to compel them to work by 
force; but now, when the stores and the land were Pharaoh's, he only had to guard those 
stores by force, and hunger enabled him to compel them to work for him. 

The land is all Pharaoh's and the stores (the part he collects) are always his, and so, 
instead of driving with the sword each man individually to work, it is only necessary to 
use force to guard the stores, and the people are enslaved not by the sword but by hunger. 

In a year of famine all may be starved at Pharaoh's will, and in a year of plenty those who 
owing to some mishap are short of grain can be starved. 

And the second method of enslavement is instituted not directly by the sword, that is, not 
by the strong man driving the weaker man to work by threats of killing him, but by the 
oppressor, having taken the supplies and guarded them with the sword, compelling the 
weaker man to labour for his food. 

Joseph says to the hungry: 'I can starve you to death as I have the com, but I spare you on 
condition that, for the grain I give you, you will do whatever I command.' 



What Then Must We Do? 


73 


Leo Tolstoy 


For the first method of enslavement the man in power needs only warriors constantly 
riding about among the people and, by threats of death, seeing that his orders are obeyed. 
For the first method the oppressor need only divide up with his warriors. But under the 
second method, besides warriors, the oppressor needs another kind of assistants to 
preserve the stores of grain and the land from the hungry people -he needs great and little 
Josephs, managers and distributors of the grain. And the strong man has to divide up with 
them, and to give Joseph a vesture of fine linen, a gold ring, and servants, and grain, and 
silver for his brethren and his relatives. Besides, by the nature of the case, under the 
second method not only the managers and their relatives but all those who have stores of 
grain become sharers in the advantage of the violence used. As under the first method 
founded on sheer force, everyone who had arms became a participant in the violence 
employed, so under the second method based on hunger, all who have supplies share in 
the benefits of the oppression and lord it over those who have none. 

For the oppressor the advantage of this method over the former is that, first and chiefly, 
he is no longer obliged to coerce the workers by force to do his will, but they come 
themselves and sell themselves to him; secondly, a smaller number escape his coercion. 
The only disadvantage of this method for the oppressor is that it obliges him to share with 
a larger number of people. The advantage of this method for the oppressed is that they are 
no longer subject to coarse violence, but are left to themselves and can always hope under 
fortunate conditions to pass over from the ranks of the oppressed to the ranks of the 
oppressors; the disadvantage for them is that they can never more escape from some 
measure of coercion. This new method of enslavement generally comes into use together 
with the old method, and the strong man reduces the one and extends the other as may be 
required. But this method of enslavement still does not fully satisfy the strong man's 
desire-to take as much as possible of the produce of their labour from the greatest number 
of workers and to enslave as great a number of people as possible - and does not keep 
pace with the increasing complexity of life's conditions, and a still newer method of 
enslavement is devised. The new, and third, method is that of tribute. This method like 
the second is based on hunger, but to the method of enslaving people by depriving them 
of bread is added that of depriving them also of other necessaries. The oppressor 
demands from the slaves such a quantity of monetary tokens, which he himself possesses, 
that to obtain them the slaves are obliged to sell not only more than the fifth of their store 
of grain that Joseph fixed, but also articles of prime necessity: meat, skins, wool, clothes, 
fuel, even buildings, and thus the oppressor always holds the slaves in subjection not only 
by hunger, but also by thirst, want, cold, and all other kinds of privation. 

And a third form of slavery is organized - the monetary, which consists in the strong man 
saying to the weak one: I can do what I like with each of you separately, I can simply 
take a gun and shoot each of you, or I can kill you by taking the land that feeds you; I 
can, with the money you have to bring me, buy up all the grain that feeds you, and I can 
sell it to other people and starve you all at any moment, and I can take from you all that 
you have: cattle, dwellings, and clothes; but that is inconvenient and unpleasant for me, 
and therefore I allow you all to arrange your own work and your own production as you 
please - only bring me so many pieces of money, the demand for which I will assess 
either per head or according to the land you hold, or by the quantity of food and drink 
you have, or by your clothes, or your buildings. Bring me these money tokens and 
arrange matters among yourselves as you please, but know that I shall defend and protect 



Leo Tolstoy 


74 


What Then Must We Do? 


not widows, nor orphans, nor the sick, nor the old, nor those who have suffered from 
fires, but only the regularity of circulation of these money tokens. That man only will be 
justified before me and protected by me who regularly brings me the required number of 
money tokens I demand. But how he gets them is a matter of indifference to me. 

And the strong man only issues these tokens as receipts for the fulfilment of his demands. 

The second method of enslavement is that by taking a fifth part of the crops and laying up 
stores of grain, Pharaoh, besides personal enslavement by the sword, obtains in common 
with his assistants the possibility of ruling all the workers in times of famine and some of 
them whenever calamity befalls them. 

The third method is, that Pharaoh demands of the workers more than would pay for the 
fifth of the crops which he formerly took from them, and with his assistants obtains a new 
means of ruling over the workmen not only in time off amine and casual misfortune but 
at all times. Under the second method the people kept some supplies of grain, which 
enabled them without surrendering themselves to slavery to bear small failures of harvest 
and casual mishaps, but under the third method, when the exactions are greater, their 
supplies of grain and all other supplies of prime necessities are taken from them and at 
the slightest mishap the worker, having no reserves of grain or other supplies which he 
could exchange for grain, has to go into slavery to those who have money. For the first 
method the oppressor need only have soldiers and need only divide with them; for the 
second, besides guards over the land and the stores of grain, he also requires collectors 
and clerks to distribute the grain; under the third method he can no longer himself own all 
the land, but besides warriors to guard the land and the wealth, he must also have 
landowners and tax-collectors, officials to allot the taxes and assess them per head or 
according to the articles used; inspectors, customs-officers, revenue officers and 
assessors. The organization of the third method is much more complex than that of the 
second; under the second method the collection of the grain can be farmed out as was 
done in ancient times and is still done in Turkey; but when the enslaved are taxed, a 
complex administration is needed to watch that the people or their taxable actions should 
not escape the tribute. And so under the third method, the oppressor has to share with a 
still greater number of people than under the second method; besides which, by the very 
nature of the case, all people either of that same or of other countries who have money 
become participants. The advantages for the oppressor of this method over the first or 
second methods are the following: 

In the first place, by means of this method a greater amount of labour can be taken and 
taken in a more convenient manner, for a money tax is like a screw, it can be easily and 
conveniently turned to the utmost limit which does not kill the golden hen; so that it is 
not necessary to await a famine year as in Joseph's time-for the famine year can always 
be arranged. 

Secondly, because under this method the coercion is extended to all those landless people 
who formerly escaped and gave only part of their labour for bread, but who are now 
obliged in addition to that part to give also part of their labour for taxes to the oppressor. 
The disadvantage for the oppressor is that under this method he has to share with a 
greater number of people: not only his immediate assistants but, first, with all those 
private landowners who usually appear where this system is adopted, and secondly, with 



What Then Must We Do? 


75 


Leo Tolstoy 


all those people of his own or even of other nations who have such money tokens as are 
demanded from the slaves. 

The advantage for the oppressed in comparison with the second method is only this, that 
he has still more personal independence from the oppressor; he can live where he pleases, 
do what he pleases, and sow or not sow grain; he is not obliged to account for his work, 
and if he has money he can consider himself quite free, and he can always hope, or 
actually attain if but for a time - when he has money to spare or has land bought for it - 
not merely a position of independence but even that of an oppressor. The disadvantage 
for him is that, under this third method, the position of the oppressed in general becomes 
far harder and they are deprived of the greater part of what they produce, since under this 
third method the number of people who live on the labour of others is still greater and 
therefore the burden of supporting them falls on a smaller number. This third method of 
enslavement is also a very old one, and comes into use together with the two previous 
ones without entirely excluding them. None of the three methods of enslavement has ever 
ceased to exist. All three methods may be compared to screws which press down a board 
that lies on the workers and squeezes them. The chief, fundamental, and central screw, 
without which the others cannot hold - the one which is first screwed down and never 
ceases to act - is that of personal slavery, the enslavement of one set of people by another 
by means of threats to kill them with the sword; the second - which is screwed down after 
the former - is the enslavement of people by depriving them of land and of stores of food, 
a deprivation supported by the personal threat of death; and the third screw is the 
enslavement of people by a demand for money tokens they have not got, and that too is 
supported by the threat of murder. All three screws are operated, and only when one is 
tightened are the others relaxed. For the complete enslavement of the workers all three 
screws - all three methods of enslavement - are needed, and in our society all three 
methods are constantly in use - all three screws are tightened. 

The first method, enslaving men by personal violence and by threats to kill them by the 
sword, has never been abandoned, and will not be abandoned as long as there is any 
enslavement of man by man, because all enslavement depends upon it. We are all very 
naively confident that personally slavery has been abandoned in our civilized world, that 
the last remnants of it were abolished in America and Russia, and that now only among 
savages is there slavery, but that we have none. We forget only one small circumstance 
namely about those millions of men who in standing armies without which no single 
government exists and with the abolition of which the whole economic structure of every 
government would inevitably go to pieces. But what are those mi llions of soldiers if not 
the personal slaves of those who rule over them? Are not they compelled to do the will of 
their owners under threat of torture and death - a threat frequently put into execution? 
The only difference is that the subjection of these slaves is not called slavery but 
discipline, and that while the others were slaves from birth to death these are so for the 
period, more or less brief of what is termed their 'service'. Personal slavery is not only not 
abolished in our civilized societies but with the introduction of universal military 
conscription it has of late been strengthened and still remains what it has always been 
though somewhat modified. And it cannot fail to exist, for as long as there is any 
enslavement of man by man there will be this personal slavery which by threat of the 
sword maintains the territorial and tax enslavement of men. It may that this slavery that 
of the army, may be very necessary, as is alleged, for the defence and glory of our 



Leo Tolstoy 


76 


What Then Must We Do? 


fatherland, though this advantage is more than doubtful, for we see that in unsuccessful 
wars it often serves for the enslavement and degradation of the country; but what is 
evident is the suitability of this slavery for the maintenance of land and tax slavery. If the 
Irish or the Russian peasants seized, the land from the estate-owners, the troops would 
come and take it back again. Build distilleries or breweries and fail to pay the excise 
dues, and soldiers come and close the establishment. Refuse to pay taxes and the same 
will happen. 

The second screw is the method of enslavement by depriving people of land and therefore 
of their food supplies. This method of enslavement also has existed and does exist 
wherever people are enslaved, and however much its form may be altered it exists 
everywhere. Sometimes the land all belongs to the sovereign, as in Turkey, and a tithe of 
the harvest is taken for the treasury; sometimes only part of the land, and a tax is 
collected from it; sometimes again the land all belongs to a small number of people and 
part of the labour is taken for it, as in England; or a larger or smaller part of it belongs to 
great landowners, as in Russia, Germany, and France. But where there is enslavement 
there is also appropriation of land by means of enslavement. This screw for the 
enslavement of people is slackened or tightened in proportion to the strain on the other 
screws' thus, in Russia when personal enslavement extended to the majority of workmen, 
land slavery was superfluous; but the screw of personal slavery in Russia was only 
relaxed when the screws of land and tax enslavement were tightened. The people were all 
inscribed in communes, their migration or change of location was made difficult, the land 
was appropriated or given to private owners, and then the peasants were set 'free'. In 
England, for instance, the land enslavement is what chiefly acts, and the question of the 
nationalization of the land merely consists in tightening the tax screw in order to relax the 
screw of territorial enslavement. 

The third method of enslavement - by tribute or taxation-also existed before, and in our 
time, with the diffusion of uniform money tokens in various states and the intensification 
of governmental power, it has acquired special force. This method has been so elaborated 
in our time that it bids fair to replace the second - the territorial - method of enslavement. 
It is the screw with the tightening of which the land-screw relaxes, as is evident in the 
economic condition of all Europe. Within our own memory, we have lived through two 
transitions of slavery from one form to another in Russia: when we freed the serfs and left 
the proprietors in possession of most of the land, the proprietors feared that their power 
over the slaves would slip away; but experience showed that when letting go of the old 
chain of personal slavery they only had to seize the other, that of land-ownership. The 
peasant lacked bread to eat and the proprietor had the land and the stores of grain, and 
therefore the peasant remained a slave as before. The next transition was when 
government demands greatly tightened the other screw-that of taxation, and most of the 
labourers were obliged to sell themselves into bondage to the estate-owners or to the 
factories. And the new form of slavery held the people yet more thoroughly, so that nine- 
tenths of the Russian working classes work for proprietors and factory owners only 
because they are compelled to do so by the demands for State and land taxes. This is so 
obvious that were the government to try the experiment of not collecting direct, indirect, 
and land taxes for a year, all the work on other people's land and at the factories would 
come to a standstill. Nine-tenths of the Russian people hire themselves out when the 
taxes are being collected, and on account of those taxes. 



What Then Must We Do? 


77 


Leo Tolstoy 


All three methods of enslavement have existed continuously and still exist; but people are 
inclined not to notice them as soon as new justifications are alleged for them. And what is 
strange is that this very method on which at the present time everything is based, the 
screw holding everything together, is just what is not noticed. 

When in the ancient world the whole economic structure was based on personal slavery, 
the greatest intellects did not notice it. To Xenophon and Plato and Aristotle and to the 
Romans it seemed that things could not be otherwise, and that slavery was an inevitable 
and natural outcome of wars, without which the existence of humanity was unthinkable. 
So also in the Middle Ages, and even down to recent times, people I did not see the 
significance of land-ownership and the slavery resulting from it, on which the whole 
economic structure of the Middle Ages rested. And just in the same way now, no one sees 
or even wishes to see that in our time the enslavement of the majority of people depends 
on money-taxes - State and land taxes - demanded by the governments and their 
dependants and collected by the administration and the army - the very administration 
and army that are paid for out of those taxes. 


CHAPTER XXI 

WHAT is surprising is not that the slaves themselves - subjected to slavery from of old - 
are not conscious of their condition and consider the slavery in which they have always 
lived to be a natural condition of human life, and regard a change in the form of slavery 
as an alleviation; nor is it surprising that slave-owners sometimes sincerely think they are 
emancipating their slaves by loosening one screw when another is already screwed tight. 
Both slaves and owners are accustomed to their position, and the slaves, not knowing 
freedom only seek alleviation or a mere chancre of the form of their slavery, while the 
slave-owners - desiring to hide their injustice - wish to attribute a special significance to 
the new forms of slavery they impose on the people m place of the old. But it is 
surprising that science, which is called liberal, can when investigating the economic 
conditions of a people's life avoid seeing what is at the base of the whole economic 
condition of the people. One would think it the business of science to discover the 
connexion between phenomena and the common cause of a series of phenomena. But 
political economy does just the opposite: it carefully conceals the connexion of the 
phenomena and their significance and carefully avoids answering the simplest and most 
essential questions; like a lazy and restive horse it only goes well down hill when there is 
nothing to pull, but as soon as it is necessary to pull, it swerves, pretending that it has to 
go aside to do its own business. As soon as a serious essential question presents itself to 
science, a learned discussion is at once begun on irrelevant matters, merely with the 
purpose of distracting attention from the question at issue. 

You ask: What is the cause of the unnatural, abnormal, irrational, and not merely useless 
but harmful phenomenon - that some men cannot eat or work except by the will of 
others? And science, with most serious mien, replies: Because some people control the 
work and the nourishment of others - such being the law of production. 

You ask: What is this right of property on the basis of which some people appropriate the 
land, food, and instruments of labour of others? Science answers with most serious mien: 



Leo Tolstoy 


78 


What Then Must We Do? 


This right is based on the protection of a man's work; that is, that the protection of the 
work of one set of men expresses itself by seizing the work of other men. 

You ask: What is this money that is everywhere coined and printed by governments, that 
is, by the authorities, and which is forcibly demanded of the workers in such enormous 
quantities, and in the form of national debts is imposed on future generations of 
labourers? You ask whether this money exacted as taxes in quantities increased to the 
utmost possibility, has not an effect on the economic relations of the payers towards the 
receivers? And science with most serious face replies: Money is a commodity like sugar 
or chintz, and is distinguished only by the fact that it is the most convenient medium of 
exchange, but taxes have no influence on the economic condition of the people: the laws 
of the production, exchange, and distribution of wealth are one thing, while taxes are 
another. 

You ask whether the circumstance that government can at its pleasure raise or lower 
prices, and by increasing taxes can bind in slavery all who do not possess land, has not an 
influence on economic conditions? And science with most serious face replies: None at 
all! The laws of production, distribution, and exchange are one science; taxes and State 
affairs in general are another science - that of finance. 

You ask, finally, about the whole people being m slavery to the government, about the 
government being able at its own will to ruin everybody, to take all the produce of their 
labour and even to tear the men themselves from their work, putting them into military 
slavery; you ask whether this circumstance has no influence on economic conditions. To 
this science does not even take the trouble to reply: this is quite a separate matter - State 
law. Science most seriously examining the laws of the economic life of the people whose 
every function and whole activity depends on the oppressor's will, and regarding this 
influence of the oppressor as a natural condition of people's life, does what an 
investigator of the economic conditions of the life of personal slaves of various owners 
would do if he did not take into account the influence exerted on the lives of those slaves 
by the will of the owner who at his own caprice obliges them to do this or that work and 
drives them at will from place to place, feeds them or leaves them unfed, and kills them 
or lets them live. 

We should l ik e to think that science does this out of stupidity, but one only has to 
penetrate and examine the propositions of the science to convince oneself that it is not 
due to stupidity but to great ingenuity. 

This science has a very definite aim, which it attains. That aim is to maintain superstition 
and deception among the people and thereby hinder the progress of humanity towards 
truth and welfare. There has long existed, and still exists, a terrible superstition which has 
done almost more harm than the most fearful religious superstitions. And it is this 
superstition which so-called science maintains with all its might and main. This 
superstition is quite similar to the religious superstitions: it consists in the assertion that, 
besides man's duty to man, there exist yet more Important obligations to an imaginary 
being. For theology this imaginary being is God, but for political science it is the State. 
The religious superstition consists in this, that sacrifices, sometimes of human lives, to 
this imaginary being are necessary, and men may and should be brought to them by all 
means, not excluding violence. The political superstition consists in this, that besides the 



What Then Must We Do? 


79 


Leo Tolstoy 


duties of man to man there exist more important duties to the imaginary being, and that 
sacrifices, very often of human life, offered up to this imaginary being, the State, are also 
necessary, and that men may and should be brought to them by all possible means not 
even excluding violence. This superstition, formerly supported by the priests of various 
religions, is now supported by so-called science. Men are thrust into a most terrible 
slavery, worse than ever before; but science tries to assure people that this is necessary 
and cannot be otherwise. 

The State must exist for the good of the people and must carryon its business: govern the 
people and defend them from enemies. For this the State needs money and soldiers. The 
money must be supplied by all the citizens of the State, and therefore all the relations of 
men must be viewed under the necessary conditions of statehood. 

'I want to help my father in his farm work,' says a simple ignorant man; 'I want, to marry, 
but they take me, and send me for six years to Kazan as a soldier. I leave the army and 
want to plough the land and support my family, but for a hundred versts around me I am 
not allowed to plough unless I pay money, which I have not got to people who do not 
know how to plough and who demand so much money for it that I have to give them all 
my labour; but for all that I earn something and want to give what I have saved to my 
children; but an official comes to me and takes away my savings for taxes; again I earn 
something, and again it is all taken away from me. All my economic activity, all of it 
without exception, is dependent on the demands of the State, and it seems to me that an 
Improvement in my condition and in that of my brothers must come from our 
emancipation from the demands of the State.' 

But Science says: Your conclusions are the result of your ignorance. Learn the laws of 
the production distribution, and exchange of wealth, and do not confuse economic with 
political questions. The facts you refer to are not infringements of your liberty but 
necessary sacrifices which you, l ik e other people, must bear for your own freedom and 
welfare. 'But, you see, they have taken, my son and promise to carry off all my sons as 
soon as' they grow up,' again replies the simple man. 'They took him by force and have 
driven him under fire into some strange land of which we had never heard and for aims 
we cannot understand. And, you see, the land we are not allowed to plough and for want 
of which we starve is owned by a man we have never seen and whose usefulness we 
cannot even comprehend. And the taxes for which the policeman took the cow from my 
children by force, will for all I know go to that same policeman who took the cow, and to 
various members of Commissions and Ministries whom I do not know and in whose 
utility I do not believe. How can all this violence secure my liberty, and all this evil 
promote my welfare?' 

It is possible to compel a man to be a slave and to do. what he considers bad for himself, 
but it is impossible to make him think that while suffering violence he is free and that the 
evident evil he endures forms his welfare. That seems impossible, but is just what has 
been done in our time by the aid of science. 

The government, that is armed men using force, decide what they must take from those 
whom they coerce: like the English in dealing with the Fijians, they decide how much 
labour require of their slaves, beside how many assistants they need to collect this labour, 
organize their assistants as soldiers, as landed proprietors, and as tax collectors and the 



Leo Tolstoy 


80 


What Then Must We Do? 


slaves yield their labour and at the same time believe that they give it up not because their 
masters wish it, but because, for their own freedom and welfare, service and bloody 
sacrifice offered to a divinity called ‘the State’ are essential, and that while paying this 
service to this divinity they remain free. They believe this because formerly religion and 
the priests said so, and now science and the learned people talk that way. But we need 
only cease to believe blindly what others, calling themselves priests and learned men, for 
the absurdity of such assertions to become evident. People who do violence to others 
assure them that this violence is necessary for the State and that the State is necessary for 
the freedom and welfare of the people: it turns out that the oppressors oppress the people 
to promote their freedom, and harm them for their good. But men are rational beings that 
they may understand wherein their welfare lies and may promote it freely. And affairs the 
goodness of which is unintelligible to people and to which they are driven by force, 
cannot be good for them, for a rational being can regard as good only what presents itself 
to his reason as being so. If from passion or lack of sense men are drawn towards evil, all 
that others who do not commit the same errors can do is to persuade them to do what ac- 
cords with their real welfare. People may be persuaded that their welfare will be greater if 
they all become soldiers, are all deprived of land, and give their whole labour for taxes; 
but until all men regard this as their welfare and therefore do it voluntarily, it cannot be 
called the general good of man. The sole sign of the goodness of an undertaking is that 
people do it of their own free will, and man's life is full of such affairs. 

Ten workmen provide themselves with cooper's tools in order to work together, and 
doing this they do what is certainly for their common welfare; but it is not possible to 
suppose that these workmen if they compel by violence an eleventh man to participate in 
their association, could affirm that what was their common good would also be good for 
this eleventh man. 

So also with gentlemen who give a dinner to a friend of theirs; it is impossible to assert 
that this dinner will be good for someone from whom they take ten rubles by force for it. 
So also with peasants who decide to dig a pond for their convenience. For those who 
consider the existence of the pond a benefit worth more than the cost of labour expended 
upon it, the making of it will be a common good, but for him who considers the existence 
of this pond as less important than the harvesting of a field with which he is behind-hand, 
the digging of this pond cannot be considered a good. So also of roads people make, and 
of churches, and museums, and a great variety of social and political affairs. All these 
things can be a good only for those who regard them as such and engage on them freely 
and willingly, as in the case of the purchase of the cooper's tools for the association, the 
dinner given by the gentlemen, or the pond dug by the peasants. But undertakings to 
which people have to be forcibly driven cease to be a common good just on account of 
that violence. 

This is all so clear and simple that if people had not so long been deceived it would not 
be necessary to explain anything. We live, let us suppose, in a village, and we, all the 
villagers, have decided to build a bridge across a bog into which we sink. We have agreed 
or promised to give so much money, or timber, or so many days' work from each 
household. We have agreed to do this because this bridge will be worth more to us than 
its building will cost. But among us there are some for whom it is better not to have the 
bridge than to spend money on it, or who at least think that this is so. 



What Then Must We Do? 


81 


Leo Tolstoy 


Can coercing these people to take part in building the bridge make it a benefit to them? 
Evidently not, for those who considered free participation in the building of the bridge 
disadvantageous will consider it yet more disadvantageous when it is compulsory. Let us 
even suppose that we all without exception agreed to build this bridge and promised to 
contribute so much money or labour from each household for the work, but it so happens 
that some of those who promised to contribute have not done so because their 
circumstances changed, causing them to think it better to be without a bridge than to 
spend money on it; or simply they have changed their minds; or even reckon on others 
building the bridge without their contribution and on still being able to use it. Can the 
compelling of these people to take part in building the bridge make their compulsory 
sacrifice a benefit to them? Evidently not, for if they did not fulfill their promise owing to 
altered circumstances which made it harder for them to contribute to the bridge than to do 
without a bridge, obligatory contributions will be only a greater evil to them. And if the 
ref users aimed at taking advantage of the labour of others, still, compelling them to make 
sacrifices will merely be a punishment for their intention, and a quite unproven intention 
punished before it had been carried into effect; but in neither case will compulsion to 
participate in an undesired affair be an advantage to them. 

So it is when sacrifices are undertaken for an affair intelligible to everyone and of evident 
and undoubted utility, such as a bridge across a bog all have to cross. How much more 
unjust and senseless will it be to compel millions of people to make sacrifices for an aim 
that is unintelligible, intangible, and often indubitably harmful, as is the case with 
military service and the payment of taxes. But according to science what appears to 
everyone an evil is a common good; it seems that there are people, a tiny minority, who 
alone know wherein the common good lies, and, though all the rest of the people consider 
this common good to be an evil, this minority, while compelling all the rest to do this 
evil, can consider this evil to be a common good. 

Therein lies the chief superstition and chief deception hindering the progress of humanity 
towards truth and welfare. The maintenance of this superstition and this deception is the 
aim of political sciences in general and of what, is called political economy m particular 
Its aim is to hide from people the condition of oppression and slavery in which they are. 
The means it employs for this purpose are, when dealing with the violence that conditions 
the whole economic life of the enslaved, purposely to treat this violence as natural and 
inevitable, and thus to deceive people and divert their eyes from the real cause of their 
misery. 

Slavery has long been abolished. It was abolished in Rome, and in America, and in 
Russia, but what was abolished was the word and not the thing itself. 

Slavery consists in some men freeing themselves from labour (needed for the satisfaction 
of their wants) which is compulsorily put upon others; and where there is a man not 
working, not because others work for him lovingly but because instead of working 
himself he is able to compel others to work for him-there slavery exists. And where, as in 
all European countries, there are people utilizing the labour of thousands of others by 
means of violence and believing that they have a right to do so - while others submit to 
this coercion and regard it as their duty to do so - there slavery of terrible dimensions 
exists. 



Leo Tolstoy 


82 


What Then Must We Do? 


Slavery exists. In what does it consist? In that in which it has always consisted and with- 
out which it can never exist - the violence of the strong and armed towards the weak and 
unarmed. 

Slavery in its three fundamental methods of personal violence - military service; land 
tribute enforced by soldiery; and tribute imposed on inhabitants in the form of direct and 
indirect taxes and maintained by that same soldiery exists just as it used to. We do not see 
it only because each of the three forms of slavery has received a new justification, hiding 
its meaning from us. 

The personal violence of the armed towards the unarmed has been justified as the defence 
of the fatherland against its imaginary foes; in reality it has its old meaning, namely the 
subjection of the vanquished by oppressors. The violence exerted in depriving the 
workers of the land they work has received justification as a reward for services supposed 
to have been rendered to the common good, and it is confirmed by the right of 
inheritance; in reality it is the same deprivation of land and enslavement of the people, 
effected by the army (the authorities). 

The last, the monetary coercion of taxation the strongest and now the chief method - has 
received the most amazing justification, namely that people are deprived of their property 
and freedom and of their whole good for the sake of freedom and general welfare. In 
reality it is nothing but the same slavery, except that it is impersonal. 

Where violence is legalized, there slavery exists. Whether the violence is expressed by 
incursions made by princes and their retainers, killing women and children and burning 
the villages; or by slave-owners taking work or money from their slaves for land and in 
case of non-payment calling in armed forces; or by some people laying tribute on others 
and riding armed through the villages; or by the Ministry of the Interior collecting money 
through Provincial Governors and the rural police, and in case of refusals to pay sending 
in the military - in a word, so long as there is violence supported by bayonets, there will 
not be a distribution of wealth among the people, but all wealth will go to the oppressors. 

A striking illustration of the truth of this conclusion is supplied by Henry George's 
project for nationalizing the land. 1 George proposes to recognize all land as belonging to 
the State, and therefore to replace all taxes, both direct and indirect, by a ground rent. 
That is to say, every one making use of land should pay to the State the rental-value of 
such land. 

What would result? Agricultural slavery would be abolished within the bounds of the 
State, that is, the land would belong to the State: England would have its own, America 
its own, and the slave-dues a man had to pay would be determined by the amount of land 
he used. 

Perhaps the position of some of the workers (agrarian) would be improved, but as long as 
the forcible collection of a rent tax remained there would be slavery. An agriculturalist 
unable after a failure of crops to pay the rent forcibly demanded of him, to retain his land 
and not lose everything would have to go into bondage to a man who had money. 


1 Accustomed as we are in England to hear of Land Nationalization as a rival project to Henry George's 
taxation of land values, Tolstoy's way of stating the case seems strange. But as his meaning is clear enough, 
the Russian text has been closely followed in this translation. -A.M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


83 


Leo Tolstoy 


If a bucket leaks there is certainly a hole in it. Looking at the bottom of a bucket it may 
seem that the water leaks out of several holes, but however much we may stop up these 
imaginary holes from outside, the water will still leak out. To stop the flow we must find 
the place where the water, escapes from the bucket and stop it up from inside. The same 
must be done with measures proposed for stopping the ill-distribution of wealth - for 
stopping up the holes through which wealth, leaks away from the people. People say: 
'organize workers' associations, make capital public property, make the land public 
property!' All this is only external plugging of the places from which the water seems to 
leak. To stop the leakage of the workers' wealth into the hands of the leisured classes it is 
necessary to find from within the hole through which this leakage takes place. This hole 
is the coercion armed men exert on the unarmed; the violence of troops by means of 
which the people themselves are taken from their work, and the land and the produce of 
people's toil taken from the people. As long as there exists a single armed man arrogating 
to himself the right to kill any other man whatever, so long will the irregular distribution 
of wealth exist, that is, slavery. 


CHAPTER XXII 

I AM always surprised by the oft-repeated words: 'Yes, in theory that is so, but how is it 
in practice?' Just as if theory were some nice phrases needed for conversation but not in 
order that practice, that is one's whole activity, should necessarily be based on it. There 
must have been a terrible number of stupid theories in the world for such a remarkable 
opinion to be generally accepted. Theory is what a man thinks on a subject, and practice 
is what he does. How then can it be that a man thinks he should do a thing this way and 
then does it the opposite way? If the theory of bread-baking is that it has first to be 
kneaded and then set to rise, no one knowing the theory, except a lunatic, will do the 
reverse. Yet with us it has become the fashion to say, 'In theory that is so, but how is it in 
practice?' 

In the matter with which I am engaged, what I had always thought was the case has been 
confirmed, namely, that practice inevitably follows theory and, I will not say justifies it, 
but cannot be different, and that if! have understood a matter about which I have thought, 
I cannot do it otherwise than as I understand it. 

I wished to help the poor just because I had money and shared the common superstition 
that money represents work, or is in general a legitimate and good thing. But when I 
began giving away money I saw that I was giving drafts I had collected - which were 
drawn on the poor. I was doing what many land-owners used to do, making some serfs 
serve other serfs. I saw that every use of money, whether by purchase of anything, or as a 
free gift of it to someone, is the issuing for collection of a draft on the poor, or the giving 
of it to someone for collection from the poor. And therefore the absurdity of what I 
wished to do - help the poor by exactions on the poor - became plain to me. I saw that 
money in itself is not merely not a good, but is an evident evil, depriving people of the 
greatest blessing - that of labouring and utilizing the fruits of one's own exertions - and 
that I cannot transmit this blessing to anyone, because I myself lack it: I do not labour and 
have not the happiness of utilizing my own labour. 



Leo Tolstoy 


84 


What Then Must We Do? 


It might seem that there was nothing particular in this abstract reflection on the question, 
What is money? But this reflection, which I entered upon not as a mere reflection but to 
solve a question of my life and sufferings, gave me the answer to the question, What must 
we do? 

As soon as I understood what riches are and what money is, it not only became clear and 
indubitable to me what I must do, but also what everybody ought to do, and what they 
will, therefore, inevitably do. In reality I merely understood what I had long known - the 
truth transmitted to mankind in remote times by Buddha, and Isaiah, and Lao-tsze, and 
Socrates, and to us particularly clearly and indubitably by Jesus Christ and his forerunner 
John the Baptist. In reply to the people's question: What then must we do? John the 
Baptist replied simply, briefly, and clearly: 'He that hath two coats, let him impart to him 
that hath none; and he that hath food, let him do likewise' (Luke iii. 10, 11). The same 
was said by Christ many times and yet more clearly. He said, 'Blessed are the poor, and 
woe unto ye that are rich.' He said, 'Ye cannot serve God and mammon.' He forbade his 
disciples to take money or even two coats. He told the rich young man that because he 
was rich, he could not enter the kingdom of God, and that it is easier for a camel to go 
through the eye of a needle than for a rich man to enter the kingdom of God. He said that 
he who will not renounce all - house, and children, and fields, to follow him, is not his 
disciple. He spoke the parable of the rich man, who like our rich men did nothing bad but 
merely clothed himself well and ate and drank sumptuously, and thereby ruined his soul, 
and of the pauper Lazarus, who did nothing good, but was saved just by the fact that he 
was a pauper. 

That truth had been known to me well enough, but the false teaching of the world had so 
obscured it that it had become to me merely a 'theory' in the sense people like to give that 
word, that is to say, it was mere empty words. But as soon as I succeeded in destroying in 
my consciousness the sophistries of the worldly teaching, theory merged with practice 
and the reality of my own life and of the life of all men showed up as its inevitable 
consequence. 

I understood that man, besides living for his personal welfare, must necessarily serve the 
welfare of others: that if we are to draw a comparison from the world of animals, as some 
people are fond of doing when defending violence and strife by the struggle for existence 
in the animal kingdom, we should draw it from the social animals, such as bees, and that 
therefore man, to say nothing of his reason or innate love of his fellow man is called on 
by his very nature to serve others and to serve the common human ends. I understood that 
that is the natural law of man under which alone he can fulfil his destiny and so be happy. 
I understood that this law has been infringed, and is infringed, by the fact that people, like 
robber bees, forcibly avoid toll and exploit the labour of others and direct their toil not to 
the common good but to the personal gratification of ever spreading passions (lusts), and 
themselves like the robber bees, perish thereby. I understood that men's misfortunes come 
from the slavery in which some hold others. I understood that the slavery of our time was 
produced by the violence of militarism, by the appropriation of the land and by the 
exaction, of money. And having understood the meaning of all three instruments of the 
new slavery, I could not but wish to free myself from taking part in it. 

When I was a serf-owner and understood the immorality of that position, I tried to 
liberate myself from it, like others who understood it. Considering my rights as slave- 



What Then Must We Do? 


85 


Leo Tolstoy 


owner to be immoral, I tried (until it should be possible to free myself completely from 
that position) to exert those rights as little as possible and to live and let others live as if 
those rights did not exist; and at the same time I tried by all means to instill into other 
slave-owners a sense of the wrongness and inhumanity of our imaginary rights. I cannot 
but do the same in regard to the present slavery. Until I can completely renounce the 
rights given me by the possession of landed property and money, which are maintained 
by military violence, I can but exact my rights as little as possible and at the same time do 
all that I possibly can to make plain to others the illegitimacy and inhumanity of those 
pseudo rights. The participation of a slave-owner in slavery consists in making use of 
other people's labour, whether that slavery rests on his right to the slave or on his 
possession of land or money. 

And therefore if a man really dislikes slavery and does not wish to be a participant in it, 
the first thing he will do will be not to use other people's labour, either by owning land, 
by accepting government employment, or by money. 

And the rejection of all the customary means of exploiting other people's labour will 
inevitably make it necessary for such a man, on the one hand to restrict his needs, and, on 
the other, to do for himself what others formerly did for him. 

This very simple and inevitable deduction enters into all the details of my life, 
immediately alters it all, and at once releases me from the moral sufferings I experienced 
at the sight of the miseries and depravity of men, and destroys all those three causes 
which made it impossible to help the poor and which I had encountered when seeking the 
causes of my failure. 

The first cause was the crowding of the people into the towns and the consumption in 
towns of the wealth of the villages. It is only necessary for a man to wish not to exploit 
other people's labour by means of government service, land-ownership, or money - and to 
wish therefore to satisfy his needs himself to the best of his strength and ability, for it 
never to enter his head to leave the village, where it is easiest to satisfy one's needs, for 
the town where everything is the product of someone else's labour and everything has to 
be bought. Then, in the village, he will be in a position to help the needy, and will not 
experience the feeling of helplessness I experienced in town when I tried to help people 
not by my own labour but by other people's labour. 

The second cause was the separation of the rich from the poor. It is only necessary for a 
man not to wish to exploit other people's labour by means of state service, land- 
ownership, or by money, for him to find himself obliged to satisfy his wants himself, and 
immediately the wall separating him from the working people will disappear of itself, and 
he will blend with them and stand shoulder to shoulder with them, and it will become 
possible for him to help them. 

The third cause was shame, based on conscious- ness of the immorality of my possession 
of the money with which I wanted to help others. We only need cease to wish to exploit 
other people's work by means of government service, ownership of land, or by money, 
and we shall never have that superfluous mad money, my possession of which evoked in 
others, who had none, the demands I was unable to satisfy, and evoked in me a 
consciousness of being in the wrong. 



Leo Tolstoy 


86 


What Then Must We Do? 


CHAPTER XXIII 

I SAW that the cause of men's sufferings and depravity was that some are in slavery to 
others, and so I drew the simple conclusion that if! wish to help others I must first of all 
cease causing sufferings I wish to relieve, that is, must not take part in the enslavement of 
men. But what drew me to enslave people was that from childhood I had been 
accustomed not to work but to make use of the labour of others, and I had lived, and still 
live, in a society that is not merely accustomed to this enslavement, but justifies it by all 
sorts of artful and artless sophistries. And I came to the following simple conclusion, that 
in order not to cause suffering and depravity I must make as little use as possible of the 
work of others and must myself work as much as possible. By a long path I reached the 
inevitable conclusion reached thousands of years ago by the Chinese in the saying: 'If 
there is one idle man, another will be starving.' I came to the simple and natural con- 
clusion that if I pity a tired horse on which I am riding, the first thing I must do if I am 
really sorry for it, is to get off and walk on my own feet. 

That reply, which gives full satisfaction to our moral feelings, was clear to my eyes and is 
clear to the eyes of us all, but we look aside and do not see it. 

In our search for a cure of our social evils we seek on all sides - in governmental, anti- 
governmental, scientific, and philanthropic superstitions, and do not see what strikes 
everyone's eyes. 

We use a close-stool and want others to carry it out for us, and we pretend to be very 
sorry for them and to want to make it easier for them and we invent all kinds of devices 
except the very simple one of carrying it out for ourselves if we want to use the stool in 
the house, or of going outside to do our business. 

For him who sincerely suffers at seeing the sufferings of those about us, there is a very 
clear, simple, and easy means, the only possible one for the cure of the evils surrounding 
us and to enable us to feel that we are living legitimately - the same that John the Baptist 
gave in reply to the question: 'What then must we do?' and which Christ confirmed: not to 
have more than one coat and not to have money, that is, not to make use of other people's 
labour and therefore first to do all we can with our own hands. 

This is so simple and so clear. But it is simple and clear when the needs are simple and 
clear and when a man is still fresh and not spoilt to the marrow of his bones by laziness 
and idleness. I live in a village and lie on the stove , 1 and I order a neighbour who is in 
debt to me, to chop wood and heat my stove. It is very clear that I am lazy and am taking 
my neighbour from his work; and I shall feel ashamed, and it will be tiresome to be 
always lying down, and if my muscles are strong and I am accustomed to work I shall go 
and chop the wood myself. 

But the temptation of slavery of all kinds has existed so long and so many artificial wants 
have grown up on it, there are so many people bound up one with another who are 
accustomed in various degrees to these wants, and people have been so spoilt and 
pampered for generations, and so complex are the temptations and the justifications that 
have been devised for luxury and idleness, that for a man at the top of the ladder of idle 


1 In Russian peasant huts the brick stove is built so as to heat the hut and to serve as an oven, and its flat top 
furnishes a warm and convenient place to sleep on. -A. M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


87 


Leo Tolstoy 


people it is far from being as easy to understand his sin as it is for a peasant who makes 
his neighbour heat his stove. 

It is terribly hard for people who are on the upper rungs of that ladder to understand what 
is demanded of them. Their heads are made dizzy by the height of the ladder of lies they 
stand on, when they see the place below to which they must descend in order to live their 
life not entirely well but even not quite inhumanly; and therefore this simple and clear 
truth seems strange to them. 

For a man with ten servants, liveries, coachmen, a chef, pictures, and pianos, it certainly 
seems strange and even ridiculous to do what is the simplest and first action of anyone 
who is, I will not say a good man but merely a man and not an animal: himself to chop 
the wood with which his food is cooked and with which he is warmed; himself to clean 
the boots and goloshes with which he has carelessly stepped into some dirt; himself to 
bring the water with which he keeps himself clean, and carry out the dirty water in which 
he has washed. 

But besides the remoteness of people from the truth, there is another cause which keeps 
them from seeing that it is obligatory for them to undertake the simplest and most natural 
physical work: this is the complexity of the circumstances and inter-connected interests 
of those among whom a rich man lives. 

This morning I went out into the corridor where the stoves are lighted. A peasant was 
heating the stove that warms my son's room. I went into his room; he was still asleep. It 
was eleven o'clock. To-day is a holiday; and so excuses - there are no lessons. 

A plump eighteen-year-old lad with a beard, who has eaten much the evening before, 
sleeps till eleven o'clock. But a peasant of his own age has got up in the morning, has 
already done a lot of things and is heating the tenth stove, while my son sleeps. 'Better let 
the peasant not heat the stove to warm that sleek lazy body!' thought 1. But at once I 
remembered that this stove warms also the housekeeper's room, who is a woman of forty 
and till three in the morning prepared everything for the supper my son ate, and then put 
away the dishes, but who still got up at seven. She could not heat the stove for herself, 
she would not have time. The peasant was heating for her also, and on her account the 
lazy fellow gets warmed. 

It is true that the interests of all are interwoven, but with no prolonged reckoning each 
man's conscience tells him on whose side is the labour and on whose the idleness. And 
not only does conscience tell it, it is told most clearly of all by his account-book. The 
more money anyone spends the more he obliges others to work for him; the less he 
spends the more he works. 

But industry, public works, and finally that most terrible of words: culture - the 
development of science and art? 



Leo Tolstoy 


What Then Must We Do? 


CHAPTER XXIV 

LAST year , 1 in March, I was returning home late one evening. Turning from Zubov 
street to Khamovniki side-street I saw some black spots on the snow of the Virgin's Field. 
Something was moving there. I should not have paid attention to it if a policeman 
standing at the entrance to the side-street had not shouted in the direction of the black 
spots: 

'Vasili! Why don't you bring her?' 

'She won't come!' replied a voice from there, and after that the black spots moved towards 
the policeman. 

I stopped and asked him what it was. He said: 'They have arrested the wenches at the 
Rzhanov House and taken them to the police-station. This one lagged behind, you see she 
won't move.' 

A yard-porter in a sheepskin coat was fetching her. She walked in front and he kept 
pushing her from behind. We, the porter, the policeman, and I, were all wearing winter 
things, but she had only her dress on. In the dusk I could only make out a brown dress, 
and a kerchief on her head and neck. She was short, as starvelings are, with short legs and 
a disproportionately broad ill shaped figure. 

'Now, carrion, we're waiting for you. Get along, I say! I'll give it you!' shouted the police- 
man. It was plain he was tired and had lost patience with her. She went a few steps and 
again stopped. The elderly yard-porter, a good-natured fellow (I know him personally), 
pulled her by the arm: 

'There, I'll teach you to stop! Go on!' he said, pretending to be angry. She staggered and 
began to speak in a grating voice. Every sound she uttered was a false note, hoarse and 
squeaking. 

'Now then! What are you shoving for? I'll get there!' 

'You'll freeze,' said the porter. 

'Our kind don't freeze. I'm a hot 'un.' 

She meant it as a jest but it sounded like abuse. Near the lamp-post that stands not far 
from the gate of our house she again stopped and leant almost fell - against the wooden 
fence of the yard, and began fumbling in her skirts with clumsy benumbed fingers. They 
again shouted at her, but she only muttered and went on with what she was doing. In one 
hand she held a cigarette bent like an are, and in the other some sulphur matches. I 
stopped, ashamed to go past her though also ashamed to stand and look on. At last I made 
up my mind and went up to her. She leant with her shoulder against the wooden fence, 
and vainly trying to strike the sulphur matches against it threw them away. I looked at her 
face. She was a starveling, but it seemed to me no longer young. I supposed her to be 
about thirty. She had a dirty-coloured face, small, dim, and drunken eyes, a knob-shaped 
nose, crooked slobbering lips that turned down at the comers, and a short strand of dry 
hair showed from under her kerchief. Her figure was long and flat and her hands and feet 


1 That is, in 1884. 



What Then Must We Do? 


89 


Leo Tolstoy 


stumpy. I stopped opposite her. She looked at me and smirked, as if to say she knew what 
I was thinking about. 

I felt I had to say something to her, and I wished to show her that I pitied her. 

'Are your parents alive?' I asked. 

She laughed hoarsely, then suddenly stopped and, raising her brows, looked at me. 

'Are your parents alive?' I repeated. 

She smirked with an expression which seemed to say: 'You have found a queer thing to 
ask about!' 

'I have a mother,' she said. 'What is it to you?' 

'And how old are you?' 

'Over fifteen,' said she, promptly answering a question she was evidently accustomed to. 

'Now, get on! We shall freeze to death with you here, blast you!' shouted the policeman, 
and she staggered away from the fence and swaying to and fro went down Khamovniki 
street to the police-station, while I turned in at the gate, entered the house, and asked if 
my daughters had come home. I was told that they had been to a party, had enjoyed 
themselves very much, had returned, and were already asleep. 

Next morning I wanted to go to the police-station to learn what they had done with this 
unfortunate woman, and I was setting out rather early, when one of those gentry 1 whose 
weaknesses have caused them to fall from the comfortable life to which they are 
accustomed and who are now up and now down again, came to see me. I had known this 
one three years. During that time he had several times pawned everything he had, even to 
the clothes he was wearing. Such a misfortune had happened to him quite recently, and 
now he was spending his nights in one of the night-lodgings at Rzhanov House and 
coming to me in the daytime. He met me as I was going out and, without listening to 
what I wanted to say, at once began to tell me what had happened at Rzhanov House that 
night. Before he had half finished the story he, an old man who had seen all phases of 
life, burst into sobs, began to cry, and turned to the wall. This is what he told me. All he 
said was perfectly true. I afterwards verified it on the spot, and leamt additional details 
which I will add to his story. 

In that doss-lodging on the ground floor, in Number 32 where my friend slept, among 
various transient night-lodgers, men and women who came together for five kopeks, there 
lived a washerwoman of about thirty years old, a blond woman, quiet and well-conducted 
but sickly. The landlady of the tenement is a boatman's mistress. In summer her lover 
keeps a boat, but in winter they make a living by letting bunks for the night, at three 
kopeks without a pillow or five kopeks with a pillow. The washerwoman had lived there 
for some months and was a quiet woman; but of late they had taken a dislike to her 
because her coughing prevented the lodgers sleeping. In particular a half-crazy old 
woman of eighty, who was also a permanent lodger there, took a violent dislike to the 
washerwoman and was always nagging at her for spoiling her sleep and for hawking all 


1 This was A. P. Ivanov who for many years worked intermittently, between his fits of drinking, as a 
copyist for Tolstoy, as mentioned at p. 330 of Vol. II of The Life of Tolstoy in this edition. -A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


90 


What Then Must We Do? 


night like a sheep. The washerwoman kept silent; she was in debt for her lodging and felt 
guilty, and so she had to be quiet. She was less and less often able to go to work, her 
strength was failing, and so she could not pay the mistress of the room; for the last week 
she had not been out to work at all, and with her cough only poisoned the life of them all, 
especially of the old woman who also did not go out. Four days before, the mistress told 
her she could not remain there: she was already owing sixty kopeks 1 and did not pay 
them, and there seemed little hope of their being paid; the bunks were all occupied, and 
the other lodgers complained of her coughing. 

When the mistress told the washerwoman to leave unless she could pay, the old woman 
was delighted, and pushed her out into the yard. The washerwoman went away but 
returned an hour later - and the mistress had not the heart to drive her away again. And on 
the next and the third day the mistress did not drive her out. 'Where shall I go to?' said the 
washerwoman. But on the third day the landlady's lover, a Moscovite and one who knew 
town ways and regulations, went for the police. A policeman, with a sword and a pistol 
on a red cord, came to the lodging, and using only polite and proper words fetched the 
washerwoman out into the street. 

It was a clear, sunny, but frosty, March day. Water was running down the gutters, and the 
yard-porters were breaking up the ice on the pavements. The sledges of the cab-drivers 
bumped over the crusted snow and screeched as they scraped on bare stones. The 
washerwoman went up the sunny side of the slope, came to the church, and sat down on 
the sunny side of its porch. But when the sun began to sink behind the house and the 
puddles began again to coat with ice, she felt cold and frightened. She got up and dragged 
herself along... Where to? Home, to the only home she had had latterly. Before she got 
there, resting on her way, it was growing dark. She came to the gates, turned in at them, 
slipped, uttered an exclamation, and fell. 

One man passed, and then another. 'Must be drunk.' Yet another man passed, stumbled 
over the washerwoman, and said to the yard-porter: 'Some drunken woman is lying in 
your gateway, I nearly broke my head tumbling over her. Get her moved away, can't 
you!' 

The yard-porter went to see about it... but the washerwoman was dead. That is what my 
friend told me. It may be thought that I am selecting the facts - my meeting with the 
fifteen year - old prostitute and the story of this washer-woman but do not let that be 
supposed; it happened just so, in one night - I do not remember the date, but in March 
1884 . 

And then having heard my friend's account I went to the police station, meaning to go 
from there to Rzhanov House to get further details about the washerwoman. The weather 
was fine, sunny, and in the shade between the frost-crystals the night frost had formed, 
running water was again visible, while in the blaze of the sun on the Khamovniki square 
everything was thawing and the water was running. One heard a noise from the river. The 
trees of the Sans-Souci gardens showed up blue across the river, the browned sparrows, 
unnoticed in winter, caught one's eye by their merriment; and men too seemed to wish to 
be merry, but they all had too many cares. The sound of the church bells was heard, and 


1 About Is. 3d. 



What Then Must We Do? 


91 


Leo Tolstoy 


against a background of these mingling sounds one heard that of firing in the barracks; 
the whistle of bullets and their smack against a target. 

I came to the police station. In it were several armed men - they took me to their chief. 
He, too, was armed with a sword and pistol, and was busy giving directions about a 
ragged shivering old man who stood before him and was too feeble to answer clearly the 
questions put to him. When he had finished with the old man he turned to me. I asked 
about yesterday's girl. At first he listened to me attentively, but then smiled at my not 
knowing the regulations or why they are taken to the police-station, 1 and especially at my 
being surprised at her youth. 

'Why really, there are some twelve-year-old ones, and lots of thirteen and fourteen,' said 
he cheerfully. 

In reply to my question about yesterday's girl, he explained that she had probably been 
sent to the Committee. (I think that was what he said.) And he replied vaguely when I 
asked where she had spent the night. He did not remember the particular girl I was asking 
about. There were so many of them every day. 

At Rzhanov House, in Number 32, I found a church chanter already reading the Psalms 
over the deceased woman. She had been placed on what had been her bunk, and the 
lodgers (all quite poor people) had collected among themselves enough money to pay for 
the prayers, a coffin, and a shroud, and the old women had dressed her and laid her out. 
The church chanter was reading in the dim light, a woman in a cloak was standing with a 
wax taper in her hand, and another such taper was held by a man (a gentleman, I should 
say) who was standing in a clean overcoat with a good astrakhan collar, shining goloshes, 
and a starched shirt. This was her brother. They had traced and found him. 

I went past the deceased woman to the mistress's comer and asked her all about it. She 
was frightened at my questions; she evidently feared she might be accused of something; 
but after a while she began to speak freely and told me everything. As I went out I looked 
at the dead woman. There is a beauty about all dead people, but this one was specially 
beautiful and touching in her coffin: her face clean and pale, with prominent closed eyes, 
sunken cheeks, and soft flaxen hair above the high brows; a tired kindly face, and not sad 
but surprised. And indeed, if the living do not see, the dead must be surprised. 

The day I wrote this down, there was a great ball given in Moscow. 

That evening I left home after eight o'clock. I live in a place surrounded by factories, and 
I left the house after the factory whistles had sounded, which after a week's incessant 
work let the men out for a holiday. 

I passed, and was passed by, workmen making for the dram-shops and taverns. Many 
were already drunk and many had women with them. 

I live amid factories. Every morning at five a whistle is heard, then a second, a third, a 
tenth, and others farther and farther away. This means that work has begun for women, 
children, and old men. At eight o'clock the whistle sounds again for half an hour's 
interval. At noon there is a third: this is an hour for dinner; and at eight a fourth sounds, 
for closing. 


1 For medical examination, as prostitutes. -A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


92 


What Then Must We Do? 


Curiously enough all the three factories around me produce exclusively articles needed 
for balls. 

In the nearest one stockings are made; at another, silk stuffs; in the third, perfumery and 
pomades. 

It is possible to hear those whistles and to attach to them no idea but that of time. 'Ah, 
there's the whistle already, so it is time for my walk'; but it is also possible to realize what 
really is the case: that the first whistle at five in the morning means that people - sleeping 
in a damp basement, often men and women side by side - get up in the dark and are 
hurrying to the buildings where the machines drone and taking their places at work to 
which they foresee no end and for themselves no use; and so they work, often in hot, 
stuffy, dirty rooms, with very short intervals, for one, two, three... twelve and more hours 
a day. They sleep and again get up, and again and again continue the same work - which 
has no meaning for them and to which they are driven by sheer necessity. 

And so week passes after week, with the intervention of holidays, and here I saw these 
workers let out for one of these holidays. They come out into the street: everywhere 
taverns, Imperial dram-shops, and wenches. And tipsily they drag one another along by 
the arm, and drag with them girls such as the one that was taken to the police station, and 
hire sledges , 1 and drive or walk from tavern to tavern, swearing and staggering and 
saying they know not what. Formerly I had seen such staggering factory-hands and 
fastidiously avoided them and almost blamed them; but since I have heard those whistles 
every day and know their meaning, I am only surprised that all these men do not become 
roughs such as those of whom Moscow is full, and not all the women come to be like the 
girl I saw near my house. 

So I walked about, watching these workmen making turmoil in the streets till about 
eleven o'clock. Then their movement began to quiet down. Only a few drunken ones 
remained, and here and there men and women who were being taken to the police station. 
And now from all sides carriages began to appear all driving in one direction. 

On the boxes were coachmen and footmen well-dressed and wearing cockades. The well- 
fed caparisoned trotters flew over the snow at fourteen miles an hour, and in the carriages 
were ladies wrapped in warm cloaks and careful of their flowers and coiffures. 
Everything - from the horses' harness, the carriages, the rubber tyres, and the cloth of the 
coachmen's warm coats, to the stockings, shoes, flowers, velvet, gloves, and perfumes - 
was made by those people some of whom are sprawling drunk in their bunks in the 
dormitories, some are with prostitutes in the dosshouses, or distributed in the lock-ups. 
Past them on what was all theirs and in what was all theirs drive those going to the ball; 
and it never enters their heads that there is any connexion between the ball to which they 
are going and those drunkards at whom their coachmen shout so sternly. 

These people with quiet consciences - in full confidence that they are doing nothing bad 
but something very good - amuse themselves at the ball. 

Amuse themselves! Amuse themselves from eleven till six in the morning, through the 
very middle of the night, while others are tossing with empty stomachs in doss-houses, 
and some are dying like the washerwoman. 

1 These could often be hired for short distances for two or three pence a ride. -A. M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


93 


Leo Tolstoy 


The amusement consists in married women and girls baring their breasts, padding 
themselves out behind, and showing themselves in this unseemly condition in which an 
unperverted girl or woman would not for the world wish to exhibit herself to a man; and 
in that semi-nude condition, with bare breasts protruding and arms uncovered to the 
shoulder, with bustles behind and dresses drawn tight to their hips, in the strongest 
illumination, women and girls, whose chief virtue has always been modesty, appear 
among strange men similarly clad in improperly close-fitting garments, whom to the 
sound of intoxicating music they embrace, and with whom they whirl around. The old 
women, often exposing their persons as much as the young ones, sit, look on, and eat and 
drink things that taste nice; the old men doing the same. No wonder this is done at night 
when the common people, being all asleep, do not see it. But that is not done to hide it; it 
seems to the doers that there is nothing it is necessary to hide, that it is very good, and 
that by this amusement in which they consume the painful labour of thousands, they not 
only injure no one, but actually feed the poor. 

It may be very merry at balls. But how does this happen? When among ourselves we see 
that some one has not eaten or is cold, we are ashamed to be merry, and cannot be merry 
till he has been fed and warmed; and we do not understand people making merry with 
sports that cause others to suffer. We dislike and do not understand the mirth of cruel 
boys who squeeze a dog's tail in a cleft stick and make merry over it. 

Then how is it that here in these amusements of ours blindness has befallen us, and we do 
not see the cleft stick in which we squeeze the tails of those who suffer for our 
amusement? 

Not one of the women who drove to this ball in a one hundred and fifty ruble dress was 
bom at the ball, or at Madame Minanquoit's , 1 and each of them has lived in the country 
and seen peasants, and knows her own nurse and lady's-maid who have poor fathers or 
brothers for whom to save a hundred and fifty rubles to build a hut is the aim of a long 
and laborious life. She knows this - how then can she be merry, knowing that at this ball 
she wears on her half-naked body the hut that is the dream of her good maid's brother? 
But granting that this may not have struck her the fact that velvet, silk, sweets, flowers, 
laces, and dresses do not grow of themselves but are made by people, is one that it would 
seem she cannot but know - or what kind of people make these things, and under what 
conditions they make them, and why. She must know that the seamstress she scolded did 
not make that dress for her at all out of love of her, and so she cannot help knowing that it 
was all made for her under compulsion, and that, like her dress, the lace and flowers and 
velvet were made for the same reason. Perhaps, however, they are so befogged that they 
do not see even that. But the fact that five or six people, old, decent, often infirm, 
footmen and maids have missed their sleep and been put to trouble on her account she 
cannot help knowing. She has seen their weary, gloomy faces. She cannot but know also 
that the frost that night reached thirty-one degrees below zero Fahrenheit? and that in that 
frost the old coachman sat on his box all night. But I know that they really do not see this. 
And if the young married women and girls from the hypnotism produced on them by the 
ball, do not see it, they must not be condemned. They, poor things, are doing what their 
elders consider right; but can one explain the cruelty shown by those elders? 


1 A fashionable Moscow dressmaker. 



Leo Tolstoy 


94 


What Then Must We Do? 


The elders always give one and the same explanation: I do not force anyone; I buy the 
things and hire people - the maids and the coachmen. There is nothing wrong in buying 
and hiring. I do not force anyone, I hire them; what is wrong in that?' 

The other day I called on an acquaintance of mine. Passing through the first room, I was 
surprised to see two women there at the table for I knew my acquaintance was a bachelor. 
A lean, sallow, old-looking woman of about thirty, wearing a kerchief, was doing 
something very rapidly with her hands and fingers under the table and was twitching 
nervously as if in a fit. Sideways to her sat a little girl who was doing something and 
twitching in just the same way. Both women seemed as if subject to St. Vitus's dance. I 
went to them and looked at what they were doing. They glanced up at me and continued 
their work with the same concentration. Before them lay some loose tobacco and paper 
cartridges. They were making Cigarettes. The woman rubbed the tobacco between her 
hands, placed it in a machine, drew on the cartridge, pressed it home, and threw It to !he 
girl. The girl rolled up a piece of paper, pushing a wad into the Cigarette, threw it aside, 
and started on another. This all was done with such rapidity and with such tension that it 
is impossible to describe it to a man who has not seen it. I expressed surprise at their 
rapidity. 

'Have been doing nothing else for fourteen years,' said the woman. 

'Is it hard?' 

'Yes one's chest hurts and it is hard to breathe.' Indeed she need not have said so. One had 
only to look at her and at the little girl. The girl has been working for over two years, and 
anyone seeing her at it would say that she had a strong constitution but was already 
beginning to break up. My acquaintance, a kindly and. liberal minded man, had hired 
them to fill cigarettes at two rubles fifty kopeks 1 a thousand. He has money and gives it 
them for their work - what harm is there in that? He gets up about noon; spends his 
evenings from six till two in the morning at cards or at the piano, and eats tasty and sweet 
food; other people do all his work for him. He devised a new pleasure - smoking. I 
remember when he began it. 

Here are a woman and a girl who by making machines of themselves can barely manage 
to support themselves, and who spend their whole lives inhaling tobacco, and so ruin 
their health. He has money which he did not earn, and he prefers to play bridge 2 to 
making cigarettes for himself. He gives money to these women only on condition that 
they continue to live as wretchedly as before, that is, that they make cigarettes for him. 

I like cleanliness, and give my money only on condition that a laundress washes the shirt 
I change twice a day, and this work has drained her last strength and she has died. 

'What is there bad in it? People buy and hire whether I do or not, and will go on compel- 
ling others to make velvet and sweets and will buy them, and will go on hiring people to 
make cigarettes and to wash shirts, even if I don't. So why should I deprive myself of 
velvet and sweets and cigarettes and clean shirts, if things are so arranged?' I often, 
almost always, hear this argument. It is the same that is used by a maddened crowd that is 
destroying something. It is the same that dogs are guided by when one of them flies at 


1 About 5s. 

2 The game actually mentioned in the Russian is vint, which much resembles bridge. 



What Then Must We Do? 


95 


Leo Tolstoy 


another and overthrows it, and the rest rush at it and tear it to pieces. Once it has been 
started and injury has been done, why should not I share in it? 'Well, what good will it do 
if I wear a dirty shirt and make my own cigarettes? Would anyone be the better for it?' 
ask those who wish to justify themselves. Were we not so far from the truth one would be 
ashamed to reply to such a question, but we are so entangled that this question seems 
natural to us, and, ashamed as one is to answer it, it must be met. 

What difference will it make if I wear my shirt for a week instead of a day and make my 
cigarettes myself, or do not smoke at all? 

This difference, that some washerwoman and some cigarette-maker will strain her 
strength less, and the money I should have paid for the washing and cigarette-making I 
shall be able to give to that washerwoman, or even to quite other washerwomen and 
workers who are weary of work, and who, instead of working beyond their strength, may 
then rest and drink tea. But to this I hear a reply (so reluctant are the rich, luxurious 
people to understand their position). They reply: 'Even if I wear dirty linen and stop 
smoking and give this money to the poor instead, all the same the poor will have 
everything taken from them, and my drop in the ocean will not help matters.' 

One feels still more ashamed to reply to this retort, but it must be answered. It is such a 
common rejoinder and the answer is so simple. 

If I visit savages and they treat me to tasty cutlets, and next day I learn (or perhaps see) 
that these tasty cutlets are made of a prisoner whom they have killed to make them; then 
if I do not think it right to eat people, however tasty the cutlets may be and however 
general the practice of eating men may be among those I am living with, and however 
little the prisoners who are kept to serve as food may gain by my refusal to eat the cutlets, 
still I shall not and cannot eat them again. Perhaps I might even eat human flesh if 
compelled by hunger, but I should not entertain others at, or take part in, feasts where 
human flesh was eaten, and should not seek such feasts or feel proud of taking part in 
them. 


CHAPTER XXV 

'WELL, what must we do? We didn't make things so.' But if not we, who did? We say: 
we did not do it, it has just done itself, as children when they have broken something say 
it broke itself. We say that once the towns exist we, living in them, support people by 
buying their labour . 

But it is not true, and we need only consider how we live in the country and support 
people there. 

The winter is past in town, and Easter Week comes. In town that same orgy of the rich 
continues; on the boulevards, in the gardens, in the parks and on the river, are music, 
theatres, rides, promenades, all kinds of illuminations and fireworks, but in the country 
there are still better things - the air is better, the trees, the meadows, and the flowers are 
fresher. We must go where all this is budding and flowering. And so most rich people, 
utilizing the labour of others, go to the country to breathe this better air and to see these 
still better meadows and woods. 



Leo Tolstoy 


96 


What Then Must We Do? 


And so the rich people settle down in the country amid the rough peasants who live on 
rye bread and onion, work eighteen hours a day, do not get enough sleep at night, and 
wear tattered clothes. Here at least no one has tempted these people: there are no mills or 
factories here, and no idle hands of whom there are so many in town, and whom we are 
supposed to feed by giving them work. Here during the whole summer the people are 
unable to keep up with their work, and not only are there no unemployed hands but 
quantities of things perish for lack of labour, and many people, children, old men, and 
women with child, perish by overstraining themselves. How do the rich folk arrange their 
lives here? 

Why... in this way. If there is an old house built in the days of serfdom, it is renovated 
and ornamented; or if there is none, a new one is built - two or three stories high, with 
from twelve to twenty or more rooms all about fourteen feet high. 

Parquet floors are laid, the windows have large glass panes, there are costly carpets, ex- 
pensive furniture, with a sideboard costing from two hundred to six hundred rubles. 

The paths near the house are made of gravel, the ground is levelled, flower-beds are set 
out, a croquet-ground is arranged, a giant-stride is put up, reflecting globes are set up, and 
often conservatories, hot-houses, and high stables, always with ornamented ridge-pieces. 
It is all painted with oil-colours - made with the oil the old peasants and their children do 
not get in their porridge. If the rich man is able he settles down in such a house, or if he 
cannot afford that, he hires such a house; but however poor and liberal minded a man of 
our circle may be, when he settles in the country he settles in a house for the building and 
cleaning of which dozens of working people have to be taken from the village where they 
are unable to cope with the work needed for growing grain for their own sustenance. 

There at least one cannot say that factories exist and it will be all the same whether I do 
or do not make use of them; here it cannot be said that I feed idle hands; here we directly 
introduce the manufacture of things we want and directly exploit the needs of those 
around us, tearing them away from work necessary for them, for us, and for everybody, 
and we thus pervert some and ruin the life and the health of others. 

An educated and honourable family let us say, of the gentry or official class, is living in 
the country. 

All the members of the family and their guests gather there in the middle of June, for till 
then they have been studying and passing their examinations - that is, they arrive at the 
beginning of the mowing and stay there till September, that is, till the harvest and the 
sowing of the winter corn. The members of this family (like almost all people of that 
circle) remain in the country from the beginning of the busy season of urgent work - not 
to the end of it, for in September the sowing of the winter corn and the stacking of 
potatoes is still in progress, but - till the work is slackening. 

All the time they are in the country the peasants' summer work goes on around them and 
beside them, of the intensity of which, however much we may have heard or read or 
witnessed it, we can form no conception unless we try it ourselves. 

And the members of the family, some ten people, live just as they did in town or worse if 
possible than in town, for here in the country it is considered that the family are resting 



What Then Must We Do? 


97 


Leo Tolstoy 


(from doing nothing), and so they have no longer any semblance of work or any excuse 
for their idleness. 

During the Petrov fast 1 - the strict fast, when the peasants' food is kvas, rye-bread, and 
onions - mowing begins. The gentlefolk living in the country see this work, to some 
extent they give orders for it, to some extent admire it, are pleased by the odour of the 
wilting hay, the sound of the women's songs, the clanging of the scythes, and the sight of 
the rows of mowers and the women raking the hay. 

They see this near the house, and then the young people and children, having done 
nothing all day, have to be driven half a verst for their bathe. 

The work done at hay-making is one of the most important undertakings in the world. Al- 
most every year, from lack of labourers and time, the meadows may be drenched with 
rain before the mowing is completed, and the greater or lesser intensity of the work 
decides whether twenty or more per cent, of hay shall be added to the peoples' wealth or 
shall rot and perish on its roots. If more hay is gathered there will be more meat for the 
old men and more milk for the children. So it is in general; but for each of the mowers in 
particular the question of bread and of milk for himself and his children for the winter is 
here being decided. Each of the men and women knows this and even the children know 
that this work is important and that one must work to the limit of one's strength, carrying 
the jug of kvas to father in the field and, changing the heavy jug from hand to hand, 
running barefoot as fast as possible a mile and a half from the village to be in time for his 
dinner and that daddy may not scold. Everyone knows that from hay-time till harvest 
there will be no break in the work and no time for resting. 

It is not the hay-making alone; everyone has work to do besides the mowing: there is land 
to turn up and harrow, the women have to bleach the linen and attend to the bread and the 
washing, and the men have to drive to the mill and to town, look after the village 
communal affairs, attend the law courts, see the rural police-officer, and do the carting, 
and at night feed the horses; and all - old, young, and sick - work to the limit of their 
strength. The peasants work so that always, before the end of each turn of work the weak, 
the striplings, and the old men, tottering, hardly manage to do the last rows, and can 
scarcely rise again after the pause; and so do the women work, though they are often 
pregnant or nursing. 

The work is intense and ceaseless. All work with their utmost strength and during this 
work eats up not only all their scanty supplies of food but also any reserves they may 
have had: never too stout, they grow leaner by the end of the harvest work. 

Here is a small group engaged on mowing: three peasants - one an old man, another his 
nephew (a young married lad), and a boot-maker, a sinewy fellow who has been a 
domestic serf - this hay-harvest decides their fate for the coming winter for them all: 
whether they can keep a cow and pay the taxes. They have already worked unceasingly 
and continuously for two weeks. Rain has hindered the work. After the rain, when the 
wind has dried the grass, they decide to finish the work, and to get on more quickly they 
decide each to bring two women to it. With the old man comes his wife, a woman of fifty 
worn out by hard work and eleven childbirths, and deaf but still a good worker, and his 


1 


The fast of St. Peter and St. Paul, from the ninth week after Easter till the 29th June, old style. -A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


98 


What Then Must We Do? 


thirteen-year-old daughter, a small girl but strong and quick. With the nephew comes his 
wife, a woman as strong and tall as a man, and his sister-in-law the pregnant wife of a 
soldier. With the boot maker comes his wife, a good worker, and her mother, an old 
woman finishing her eighth decade and who usually goes out begging. They all line up, 
and work from morning till evening in the sweltering blaze of the June sun. It is steaming 
and the rain threatens. Every hour of work is precious. They grudge the time to fetch 
water or kvas. 

A tiny boy, the old woman's grandson, fetches some water for them. The old woman, 
evidently only anxious not to be driven away from the work, does not let the rake out of 
her hands, though she can hardly, with effort, move along. The lad, all bent up and taking 
short steps with his bare little feet, brings along the jug of water which is heavier than 
himself, changing it from hand to hand. The girl shoulders a load of hay which is also 
heavier than she; she takes a few steps, stops, and throws it down unable to carry it 
farther. The old woman of fifty rakes unceasingly and, with her kerchief brushed to one 
side, drags the hay along, breathing heavily and tottering in her walk; the woman of 
eighty does nothing but rake, but even that is beyond her strength: she slowly drags her 
feet in their bark shoes, and with wrinkled brows looks sombrely before her like one who 
is seriously ill or is dying. The old man purposely sends her farther away from the others 
to rake near the hay-cocks so that she should not have to keep up with them, but without 
pause and with the same death-like sombre face she works on as long as the others do. 

The sun is already setting behind the woods and the hay-cocks are not yet all cleared 
away and much remains to be done. 

All feel it is time to knock off. but no one speaks waiting for the others to do so. At last 
the boot maker, feeling that he has no strength left, proposes to the old man to leave the 
cocks till tomorrow and the old man agrees, and the women at once run for their clothes, 
for the jugs, for the hay-forks, and the old woman sits down immediately where she 
stands, and then lies down still looking straight before her with the same deathlike face. 
But the women are going, and she gets up groaning and drags herself away after them. 

But here is the proprietor's house. That same evening when from the village is heard the 
clang of the whetstones of the exhausted hay-makers returning from the fields, the sounds 
of the hammers straightening out the dents in the scythe blades, the shouts of women and 
girls who, having just had time to put down their rakes are already running to drive in the 
cattle - from the proprietor’s house other sounds are heard; drin, drin, drin! goes the 
piano, and an Hungarian song rings out, and amid those songs occasionally comes the 
sound of the knock of croquet-mallets on the balls. Near the stable stands a carriage to 
which four well-fed horses are harnessed. It is a smart hired carriage. 

Guests have arrived who have paid ten rubles to be driven ten miles. The horses 
harnessed to the carriage are making their bells tinkle. There is hay in their trough and 
they trample it underfoot - the very hay that there in the hay field is collected with such 
effort. At the proprietor s house there is movement - a healthy well-fed lad in a pink shirt 
(given him for his services as yard porter is calling the coachmen to harness and saddle 
some horses. Two peasants who live here as coachmen come out of the coachmen's room 
and go leisurely to saddle the horses for the gentlefolk. 



What Then Must We Do? 


99 


Leo Tolstoy 


Still nearer to the proprietor's house one hears the sounds of another piano. This is a 
young lady student of the Conservatoire, who lives here to teach the children and is 
practicing Schumann. The sounds of the one piano break in on those of the other. Close 
to the house two nurses are passing: one of them is young, the other old. They are taking 
and carrying children - of the same age as those who had run from the village with the 
jugs - to put them to bed. One of the nurses is English and cannot speak Russian. She was 
imported from England not for any known qualities, but only because she could not talk 
Russian. Farther off a peasant and two peasant women are watering flowers near the 
house, while another is cleaning a gun for the young master. 

And here are two women carrying a basket with clean clothes; they have washed the 
linen for the gentry and for the English and French teachers. In that house two women 
hardly manage to wash up all the crockery for the gentlefolk who have just had a meal, 
and two peasants in dress coats are running up and down stairs serving coffee, tea, wine, 
and seltzer water. Upstairs a table is spread: they have just finished eating and will soon 
eat again till midnight, till three o'clock, often till cock-crow. 

Some of them sit smoking and playing cards, others sit and smoke talking liberalism; 
others move about from place to place, eat, smoke, and not knowing what to do decide to 
go out for a drive. There are some fifteen healthy men and women there and some thirty 
able-bodied men and women servants working for them. 

And this is happening where every hour and every boy is precious. And it will continue 
in July when the peasants, going short of sleep, will mow the oats by night not to let them 
shack, and the women will rise while it is still dark to thrash straw for sheaf-bands, and 
when that old woman by then quite worn out with the harvest work, and the woman with 
child, and the young lads, overstrain themselves and get ill from drinking too much 
water; and when there is a shortage of bands and horses and carts to carry to the stacks 
the corn which feeds everyone, and of which millions of puds 1 are needed every day in 
Russia that people may not die; and all this time the gentlefolk will continue the same 
way of life there will be theatricals, picnics, hunts, drinking, eating, piano-playing, 
singing, dancing, in an unceasing orgy. 

Here it is no longer possible to make the excuse that such is the order of things; none of it 
was prearranged. We ourselves carefully arrange this way of life, taking grain and labour 
away from the overburdened peasant folk. We live as though we had no connexion with 
the dying washerwoman, the fifteen-year-old prostitute, the woman fagged out by 
cigarette-making, and the strained, excessive labour of the old women and children 
around us who lack a sufficiency of food; we live - enjoying ourselves in luxury - as if 
there were no connexion between those things and our life; we do not wish to see that 
were it not for our idle, luxurious and depraved way of life, there would also not be this 
excessive toil, and that without this excessive toil such lives as ours would be impossible. 

We imagine that their sufferings are one thing and our life another, and that we, living as 
we do, are as innocent and pure as doves. 

We read descriptions of the lives of the Romans and marvel at the inhumanity of the 
soulless Luculli glutting themselves on delicacies and costly drinks while people died of 


1 The pud is about 36 lbs. avoirdupois. -A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


100 


What Then Must We Do? 


hunger; we shake our heads and marvel at the savagery of our grandfathers, the serf- 
owners who organized domestic orchestras and theatres and allotted whole villages for 
the upkeep of their gardens, and from the height of our humanitarianism we wonder at 
them. 

We read the words of Isaiah, Chapter V: 

'8. Woe unto them that join house to house, that lay field to field, till there be no place, 
that they may be placed alone in the midst of the earth. 

'll. Woe unto them that rise up early in the morning, that they may follow strong drink; 
that continue until night, till wine inflame them! 

'12. And the harp, and the viol, the tabret, and pipe, and wine, are in their feasts: but they 
regard not the work of the Lord, neither consider the operation of his hands. 

'18. Woe unto them that draw iniquity with cords of vanity, and sin as it were with a cart 
rope: 

'20. Woe unto them that call evil good and good evil; that put darkness for light, and light 
for darkness; that put bitter for sweet, and sweet for bitter! 

'21. Woe unto them that are wise in their own eyes, and prudent in their own sight! 

'22. Woe unto them that are mighty to drink wine, and men of strength to mingle strong 
drink: 

'23. Which justify the wicked for reward, and take away the righteousness of the 
righteous from him!' 

We read these words, and it seems to us that it does not refer to us. 

We read in the Gospels: Matthew iii. 10: 

'And now also the axe is laid unto the root of the trees: therefore every tree that bringeth 
not forth good fruit is hewn down, and cast into the fire.' 

And we are fully convinced that we are just the good tree that brings forth fruit, and that 
these words are not addressed to us, but to some others, to bad people. 

We read the words of Isaiah, vi: 

'10. Make the heart of this people fat, and make their ears heavy, and shut their eyes; lest 
they see with their eyes, and hear with their ears, and understand with their hearts, and 
convert and be healed. 

'll. Then said I, Lord, how long? And he answered, Until the cities be wasted without in- 
habitant, and the houses without man, and the land be utterly desolate.' 

We read this and are fully persuaded that this wonderful thing is not done to us, but to 
some other people. But the reason why we see nothing is just because this wonderful 
work is being done to us: we do not hear, nor see, nor understand with our hearts. How 
did this come about? 



What Then Must We Do? 


101 


Leo Tolstoy 


CHAPTER XXVI 

How can one who considers himself, I will not say a Christian or even a cultured or 
humane man, but simply a man with some traces of reason and conscience, live in such a 
way so that, without taking part in the struggle of all humanity for life, he devours the 
labour of those who do struggle and increases by his demands the burden of the smug- 
glers and the number of those who perish in that struggle? Yet our so-called Christian and 
cultured world is full of such people. Not only is our world full of such, but the ideal of 
people of our Christian and cultured world is to acquire the greatest possible fortune - 
that is, riches affording comfort and idleness: in other words, liberation from the struggle 
for life and opportunity to avail oneself fully of the labour of one's brethren, who are 
perishing in that struggle. How could people fall into such an amazing error? 

How could they come to the pass of not seeing, nor hearing, nor understanding with their 
hearts, what is so clear, obvious, and indubitable? 

One need but reflect for a moment, to be horrified at the amazing contradiction between 
our life and what we - 1 will not say Christian, but humane and cultured people - profess. 

Whether well or ill arranged by the God, or the law of nature, by which the world and 
mankind exist - the position of man in the world from the time we first know it, has been 
and is, that men are naked, without wool on their bodies, without burrows in which to 
shelter, without food they can find in the fields like Robinson Crusoe on his island, and 
they are all so placed as to have constantly and ceaselessly to struggle with nature in 
order to cover their bodies, make themselves clothes, fence themselves in, have a roof 
over their heads, and produce their food, so as two or three times' a day to satisfy their 
hunger and that of their children and old folk who cannot work. 

Wherever, at whatever period and in whatever number, we observe the life of men, in 
Europe, China, America, or Russia, and whether we observe the whole of humanity or 
only some small part of it, in ancient times in the nomad state or in our times with steam- 
engines, sewing machines, electric lights, and improved agricultural methods, we see one 
and the same thing: that people, working incessantly and intensely, are unable to secure 
sufficient food, clothing, and shelter for themselves and their children and old people, and 
that a considerable number, now as in earlier ages, perish from lack of sufficient means 
of life and from excessive labour to obtain those means. 

Live where we may, if we draw a circle around us of a hundred thousand, of a thousand, 
of ten miles, or of one mile, and observe the lives of those whom our circle encloses, we 
shall see in it starveling children, old men and old women, women in confinement, the 
sick and the weak, who have not sufficient food or rest and who therefore die 
prematurely, and we shall see men in their prime who are simply killed by dangerous and 
harmful work. 

Since the world began we see that men have struggled with their common need and 
despite terrible efforts, deprivations, and sufferings, have not been able to vanquish it. 
We also know that each of us, wherever he may be and however he may live, every day 
and every hour, voluntarily or not, consumes part of the produce the labour of humanity 
has produced. Wherever and however he lives, the house and the roof over his head did 
not grow of their own accord. The wood in his stove did not walk in of itself, nor did the 



Leo Tolstoy 


102 


What Then Must We Do? 


water; neither did the baked bread, the dinner, the clothes, and his boots, fall from the 
sky; but it has all been made not by men of the past alone, who are already dead, but has 
been, and is being, made for him now by people hundreds and thousands of whom wither 
up and die in unavailing efforts to obtain for themselves and their children the essentials 
of life-shelter, food, and clothing - the means to save themselves and their children from 
suffering and premature death. They all struggle against want: struggle with such tension 
that every moment their brethren perish around them: fathers, mothers, and children. 

People in this world, like men on a waterlogged vessel with a small supply of food, are 
placed by God or by Nature so that they must spare the food and unceasingly exert 
themselves to avoid a calamity. Every stoppage of that work by any of us, every 
consumption by us of the work of others, that is not necessary for the common aim, is 
ruinous for ourselves and for our fellow-men. 

How has it happened that the majority of the educated people of our time, without 
themselves labouring, calmly consume other people's labours which are necessary for the 
maintenance of life, and consider that to do so is quite natural and reasonable? 

To free ourselves from the toil proper and natural to all and to lay it on others without 
considering ourselves traitors and thieves, only two assumptions are possible: first, that 
we - those who do not share in the common toil - are beings distinct from the working 
people and have a special function in society, like the drones or queen bees that have a 
different function from working bees; and secondly, that what we, who are freed from the 
struggle for life, are doing for the others is so useful for all men that it certainly compen- 
sates for the harm we do by making their burden heavier. 

In former times people who exploited the labour of others asserted, first that they were a 
special breed, and secondly that they were specially appointed by God to care for the 
welfare of the others, that is to govern them and teach them, and so they assured others, 
and often themselves believed, that what they were doing was more necessary and 
important for the people than was the labour they consumed. And that justification 
sufficed as long as people doubted neither the direct intervention of the Divinity in 
human affairs nor the distinction between different breeds. But with the coming of Chris- 
tianity and the consciousness of the equality and unity of all men that flows from it, this 
justification could no longer be presented in that form. It was no longer possible to assert 
that people are born of different breeds and distinctions and with different functions, and 
the old justification, though still maintained by some people, was gradually abolished and 
now hardly exists. 

The justification of the difference between various human breeds has disappeared, but the 
fact of the emancipation of self from toil and the consumption of the labour of others by 
those who have power to do so, remains as before, and new justifications for the existing 
fact have continually been devised, so that even without acknowledging a special breed 
of people it should seem right for those who can manage it to exempt themselves from 
labour. Very many such justifications have been devised. Strange as it may appear, the 
chief occupation of the activity that at a particular period was called science-the thing that 
constituted the ruling tendency of science-was, and still continues to be, the discovery of 
such justifications. That was the aim of the activity of the theological and of the juridical 
sciences, it was the aim of so-called philosophy, and it has latterly become (strange as 



What Then Must We Do? 


103 


Leo Tolstoy 


this appears to contemporaries who employ this justification) the aim of present-day 
experimental science. 

All the theological subtlety that tried to prove that a certain church is the only true 
successor of Christ and that therefore it alone has full and unlimited power over the 
people's souls and even over their bodies has that for its chief aim. 

The juridical sciences: political, criminal, civil, ,and international law, all have that one 
purpose; most philosophic theories, especially the Hegelian theory that so long prevailed, 
with its assertion that whatever exists is reasonable and that the State is a form necessary 
for the perfecting of personality, have solely that aim. 

A very inferior English publicist, whose other works have all been forgotten and 
acknowledged to be insignificant among the insignificant, writes a treatise on population 
in which he invents a pseudo-law about the increase of population disproportionately to 
the increase in means of subsistence. He sets out his pseudo-law in baseless mathematical 
formulae and publishes it to the world. From the levity and lack of talent of this work one 
would expect it not to attract anyone's attention and to be forgotten like all the same 
author's subsequent writings; but what happened was just the opposite. The publicist who 
wrote that treatise at once became a scientific authority, and remained so for nearly half a 
century. Malthus! Malthus's theory - the law of the increase of population in geometrical, 
and of the means of subsistence in arithmetical, progression, and of the natural and 
rational methods of limiting population, all became scientific, indubitable truths, which 
were not verified but were employed as axioms from which to deduce further 
conclusions. That was how learned, educated- people behaved; and among the masses of 
idle people there was respectful faith in the great law discovered by Malthus. 

Why did this happen? These seem to be scientific deductions which have nothing in 
common with the instincts of the herd. 

But that only appears so to one who believes that science is something self-existent, like 
the Church, which is not subject to error; and not simply the thoughts of weak and erring 
men who just for importance' sake call their thoughts and words 'science'. 

It was only necessary to make practical deductions from the theory of Malthus to see that 
that theory was a very human one with very definite aims. 

The deductions that flowed directly from that theory were as follows: the wretched 
condition of the working people is not due to cruelty, egotism, or lack of understanding, 
on the part of the rich and powerful, but is what it is by an immutable law not dependent 
on man, and if anyone is to blame for it, it is the hungry workmen themselves: why have 
they been so stupid as to be born when they know they will have nothing to eat? And so 
the rich and powerful classes are not to blame for anything and may quietly continue to 
live as before. 

And this deduction was so valuable for the crowd of idle people, that all the learned 
people overlooked the lack of proof, the incorrectness, and the completely arbitrary 
nature of this proposition, and the crowd of educated, that is to say idle, people, scenting 
what these propositions led to, enthusiastically acclaimed it, stamped it with the seal of 
truth, that is of science, and made much of it for half a century. 



Leo Tolstoy 


104 


What Then Must We Do? 


The positivist philosophy of Comte and the I doctrine deduced from it that humanity is an 
organism, and Darwin's doctrine of a law of the struggle for existence that is supposed to 
govern life, with the differentiation of various breeds of people which follows from it, 
and the anthropology, biology, and sociology of which people are now so fond-all have 
the same aim. These have all become favourite sciences because they serve to justify the 
way in which people free themselves from the human obligation to labour, while 
consuming the fruits of other people's labour. 

All these theories, as is always the case, are first formulated in the secret sanctuaries of 
the priests, and are diffused among the masses in indefinite, obscure expressions, and are 
so adopted by them. As in olden times all the theological subtleties justifying the violence 
committed by the Church and the State remained the special knowledge of the priests, 
while among the masses readymade conclusions circulated that were accepted on faith, to 
the effect that the power of the kings, the priests, and the nobles, was sacred; so later on 
the philosophic and juridical subtleties of so called science were the possession of the 
priests of science, while among the masses only conclusions accepted on faith were 
current, to the effect that the organization of society should be such as it is, and that it 
cannot be otherwise. 

And so now, it is only in the sanctuaries of the priests of science that the laws of life and 
the evolution of organisms are analysed, while among the masses conclusions are 
accepted on faith, to the effect that the division of labour is a law confirmed by science 
and that things should be so: some should work and die of hunger, while others must 
everlastingly make holiday; and that just this very perdition of some and banqueting of 
others is an indubitable law of human life to which we ought to submit. 

The current justification of this idleness among the mass of the so-called educated people, 
with their various activities, from railway officials to writers and artists, is now this: 

We people who have emancipated ourselves from the duty common to humanity of 
taking part in the struggle for existence, are serving progress and thereby render service 
to the whole of society which compensates for all the harm we do to people by 
consuming their labour. 

That reasoning appears to men of our time quite unlike that by which people who did not 
work used to justify themselves formerly; just as the reasoning of the Roman emperors 
and citizens that without them the cultured world would perish, seemed to them quite 
apart from the reasoning of the Egyptians and the Persians, and just as similar reasoning 
seemed to the medieval knights and clergy to be quite distinct from the reasoning of the 
Romans. 

But that only seems so; it is only necessary to examine the essence of our present 
justification to become convinced that there is nothing new in it. 

It is only a little disguised, but is the same, for it is founded on the same thing. Every 
justification of man for consuming the labour of others without himself working-the 
justification of Pharaoh and the priests, of the Roman and medieval emperors, and of the 
knights, priests, and clerics - was always constructed on two assumptions: (1) We take 
the labour of the common people because we are a special kind of people destined by 
God to rule the common folk and teach them divine truths; (2) members of the common 



What Then Must We Do? 


105 


Leo Tolstoy 


people cannot be judges of the amount of labour we take from the common people, 
because, as was said already by the Pharisees (John vii. 49), This multitude which 
knoweth not the law are accursed. The people do not understand what is good for them, 
and cannot therefore be the judge of the benefits conferred on them. 

The justification employed in our time, despite its apparent difference, is constructed 
essentially of those same two fundamental propositions: (1) We are special people, we 
educated people who serve progress and civilization and thereby confer great benefit on 
the common folk; (2) the common uneducated people do not understand the benefit we 
confer on them and therefore cannot be judges of it. 

We free ourselves from toil, and use up the toil of others and thereby make their 
condition more burdensome, and we affirm that in exchange for this we render them great 
service of which, from their ignorance, they cannot be the judges. 

Is not this the same? The difference is only in the fact that formerly the right to other 
people's work belonged to the Roman citizens, priests, knights, and nobles, but now to 
one caste of people who call themselves the educated classes. The falsehood is the same, 
for the false position of the people justifying themselves is the same. That falsehood lies 
in the fact that before reasoning about the advantage rendered to the people by those who 
free themselves from toil, certain people, the Pharaohs, the priests, or we educated 
people, occupy that position, maintain it, and then devise a justification for it. 

That position of some people coercing others, both in former times and in the present, 
serves as the basis of it all. 

The only difference between our justification and the most ancient one is that ours is 
more fallacious and has less basis than the former. 

The ancient emperors and popes if they themselves and the people believed in their 
divine appointment, could explain simply why they were the people who should have the 
use of other people's labour: they said they were appointed thereto by God himself, and 
that God destined them to transmit to the people the divine truths which had been 
revealed to them, and to govern the people. 

But educated people of our times who do not work with their hands, acknowledging the 
equality of man, can no longer explain why just they and their children (for education 
also is only obtained by money, that is by power) are the chosen, fortunate people 
ordained to confer a certain easy benefit, and not others from among the millions who 
perish by hundreds and thousands while rendering education for the few possible. 

Their only justification is that they - those who are there now - in exchange for the evil 
they do to people by avoiding work and consuming the labour of others confer on the 
people a benefit the people do dot understand, but which compensates for all the harm 
they do. 


CHAPTER XXVII 

THE proposition by which people who have emancipated themselves from labour justify 
their emancipation, in its simplest and at the same time its most exact expression is this: 
We, people who, having emancipated ourselves from labour, are able by violence to 



Leo Tolstoy 


106 


What Then Must We Do? 


make use of other people s work as a result of this position of ours confer benefits on 
those other people; or in other words, certain people in exchange for palpable and 
comprehensible harm they inflict on the masses by forcibly taking their labour and thus 
augmenting the hardship of their struggle with nature, confer a benefit on the masses 
which is impalpable and incomprehensible to them. This proposition is a very strange 
one, but like the people of former times those of the present who sit on the backs of the 
working folk believe in it and relieve their consciences by it. 

Let us see how this proposition is in our times justified among the various classes that 
have emancipated themselves from labour. 

I serve people by my official or ecclesiastical activity, as a king, a minister of state, or a 
prelate; I serve people by my commercial, or industrial activity, I serve people by my 
scientific or artistic activity. All our activities are as necessary to the people as their work 
is to us. 

So say the various kinds of people of our day who have exempted themselves from 
labour. 

Let us examine in succession each of the grounds on which they affirm the utility of their 
activities. 

There can only be two tests of the utility of one man's activity for another: the external, 
consisting in the recognition of this utility by him who is benefited, and the internal, a 
desire to benefit another which lies at the root of the activity of him who confers the 
benefit. 

The government people (I include among them the ecclesiastics of the Church established 
by the State) confer benefit on those whom they rule. 

An emperor, king, president of a republic, prime minister, minister of justice, minister of 
war of education, a bishop, and all their subordinates who serve the State, live exempting 
themselves from the struggle of humanity for life and leaving the whole burden of that 
struggle to other people, on the ground that their activity compensates for this. . 

Let us apply the first test: is the benefit conferred by this activity recognized by the 
working men upon whom the activity of the governing class is directly exerted? 

Yes, it is acknowledged: the majority of men consider the governmental activity to be 
necessary for them - the majority acknowledges the usefulness of this activity in 
principle; but in all its known manifestations, in all particular cases known to us, each of 
the institutions and acts of that activity encounters in the circle of those for whose benefit 
it is done not merely a denial of benefit received, but assertion that this activity is harmful 
and disastrous. 

There is no State or social activity which is not considered to be harmful by very many 
people; there is no institution which is not considered harmful: the courts, banks, county 
councils, district, councils, the police, the clergy, every State activity from the highest 
authorities down to the town and rural police, from the bishops to the sextons, IS by some 
people considered to be beneficial and by others harmful. And this is so not in Russia 
only, but in the whole world also - in France, and in America. 



What Then Must We Do? 


107 


Leo Tolstoy 


The whole activity of the Republican party is considered harmful by the Democratic 
party, and vice, versa; the whole activity of the Democratic party, if it is in power, is 
considered harmful by the Republican party and by others. 

But not only is the activity of the government people in general never considered useful 
by all men - that activity has also this characteristic that it always has to be enforced by 
violence, and that to attain its benefit murders executions jails, forcibly collected taxes 
and so forth, are necessary. 

It turns out, therefore, that besides the fact that the advantage of government activity is 
not acknowledged by all men and is always denied by part of the people, this benefit is 
characterized by always manifesting itself by means of violence. And so the benefit of 
political activity cannot be confirmed on the ground that it is acknowledged by those 
people for whom it is carried on. 

Let us apply the second test. Let us question the government people themselves, from 
king to policeman, from president to office-clerk, and from patriarch to sexton, asking 
them to reply sincerely: Have they all of them in view, when occupying their positions, 
the benefit they wish to confer on the people, or some other aim? Are they prompted in 
their wish to occupy the post of king, president, minister, rural policeman, sexton, or 
schoolmaster, by a striving for other people's benefit or for their own personal advantage? 

And the reply of conscientious men will be, that their chief impulse is their own personal 
advantage. 

And so it appears that one class of people availing themselves of the work of others, who 
perish at their labour, redeem the indubitable harm they cause, by an activity which is 
always considered by very many people to be not a benefit but an injury, and is not 
accepted voluntarily but must always be enforced by violence, and the aim of which is 
not the benefit of others but the personal advantage of those who exert it. 

What then confirms the supposition, that governmental activity is beneficial to the 
people? 

Only this, that those who carry it on are firmly convinced that it is useful, and that this 
activity has always existed. But institutions have always existed which were not merely 
useless but even harmful, such as slavery, prostitution, and wars. Industrialists - including 
under that heading traders, manufacturers, railroad men, bankers, and landowners-believe 
that they confer benefits which redeem the unquestionable harm they do. 

On what grounds do they think so? 

To the question, who and what sort of people acknowledge the usefulness of their 
activity, the participants in government, including the ecclesiastics, could point to 
thousands and millions of working people who in principle acknowledge the utility of 
governmental and clerical activity; but to whom will the bankers and the manufacturers 
of vodka, velvet, bronzes, and mirrors, to say nothing of cannon, refer us? To whom will 
the traders and land-owners refer us when we ask them whether the benefits which they 
confer are admitted by public opinion? If some people are found who consider the 
production of chintz, rails, beer, and similar articles, to be useful, others in greater 
numbers can be found who consider the production of these articles harmful. No one will 
defend the activity of landowners and of traders who raise the price of commodities. 



Leo Tolstoy 


108 


What Then Must We Do? 


Besides this, such activity is always connected with harm to the labourers and violence, 
which though less direct than the violence of government is equally cruel in its 
consequences, since industrial and commercial activities are all founded on taking 
advantage of want in every form: taking advantage of it to compel the workers to do hard 
and undesirable labour; taking advantage of it again to purchase materials at cheap prices 
and to sell things the people need at the highest possible prices; and taking advantage of it 
to exact interest for money lent. From whatever side we view their activity, we see that 
the benefit rendered by the industrialists is not acknowledged by those for whom it is 
exerted, either in principle or in particular cases, and for the most part is considered 
simply harmful. 

If we apply the second test and ask what is the impelling motive of the activity of the 
industrialists, we receive a yet more definite answer than on the activity of those who 
govern. 

If a man employed by government says that besides his personal advantage he has the 
public welfare in view, one has to believe him, and we all know such men; but an 
industrialist by the very raison d'etre of his business cannot have the public welfare for 
his aim, but will appear ridiculous to his fellows if in his business he pursues any other 
aim than the increase or maintenance of his wealth. 

So the working people do not consider the activity of the industrialists useful to them. 

That activity is accompanied by violence employed against the workers, and its aim is not 
to benefit the working people but is always personal advantage; and yet - strange to say - 
these industrialists are so convinced of the benefit they confer on people by their activity, 
that for the sake of that imaginary benefit they inflict undoubted and obvious harm on the 
workers by exempting themselves from labour and consuming what the workers produce 
by labour. 

The scientists and artists have exempted themselves from labour and have imposed that 
labour on others, and live with calm consciences, firmly convinced that they confer on 
others benefits compensating for all that. 

On what is their conviction based? 

Let us ask them as we asked the government men and the industrialists: do all or even a 
majority of working folk acknowledge the benefit science and art confers on them? 

The reply will be a most lamentable one. 

The activity of the rulers and the Church people is, in principle, considered useful by 
nearly everybody and in its application is so considered by more than half the working 
people on whom it is directed; the activity of the industrialists is considered useful by a 
small number of working people; but the activity of the men of science and art is not 
recognized as useful by any working people. The utility of that activity is recognized only 
by those who carry it on or wish to carry it on. The working people - those who bear on 
their shoulders the whole labour of life, and feed and clothe the scientists and artists - 
cannot recognize the activity of those men as being of use to them, for they cannot even 
have any conception of this activity which is so useful to them. That activity appears to 
the working folk to be useless and even corrupting. 



What Then Must We Do? 


109 


Leo Tolstoy 


That is how all working folk regard the universities, libraries, conservatories, picture - 
and sculpture - galleries, and the theatres, which are built at their expense. A labouring 
man so definitely regards this activity as an evil that he does not send his children to 
school, and to compel the masses to accept this activity it has everywhere been necessary 
to pass laws to compel school attendance. A labouring man always regards this activity 
with hostility, and will only cease so to regard it when he himself ceases to be a labourer 
and, by gain and afterwards by what is called education, passes from the ranks, of labour 
into the ranks of those who live on the backs of others. Yet despite the fact that the 
activity of the scientists and artists is not recognized and cannot be recognized by any of 
the workers, the latter are nevertheless compelled to make sacrifices for the benefit of 
that activity. 

A man of the executive sends another directly to the guillotine or to jail; a trader 
exploiting the labour of another takes all he possesses from him, leaving him to choose 
between starvation or pernicious work; but a scientist or artist does not seem to compel 
others, he only offers his wares to those who wish to take them; but to produce his wares, 
which the working man does not want, he takes from them by force, through government 
agents, a large part of their labour for the erection and maintenance of academies, 
universities, high schools, primary schools, museums, libraries, conservatories, and for 
the support of the scientists and artists. 

If we ask the scientists and artists about the aim they pursue in their activities, we get 
most remarkable replies. A man belonging to the government can reply that his aim is the 
common good, and in such a reply there is a measure of truth confirmed by public 
opinion. In the reply of an industrialist that his aim is the common good there would be 
less probability, but even that might be affirmed. 

But the reply made by the scientists and artists is startlingly unproven and audacious. 

The scientists and artists, without offering any proofs of it, say just what the priests of old 
said, that their activity is most important and necessary for all men and that without this 
activity all humanity would perish. They affirm this although no one but they understands 
or recognizes their activity and despite the fact that true science and true art, by their own 
definition, ought not to aim at utility. And scientists and artists devote themselves to their 
favourite occupation regardless of what benefit people may derive from it, and are always 
convinced that they are doing most important and necessary work for humanity. So that 
while a sincere man engaged in the government, acknowledging the chief motive of his 
activity to be a personal impulse, tries as far as possible to be useful to the working 
people, and an industrialist, admitting the selfishness of his activity, tries to give it a 
character of public utility, scientists and artists do not even consider it necessary to 
appear to try to be useful, and even reject the aim of utility, so confident are they not 
merely of the utility but even of the sanctity of their avocations. 

And so it turns out that a third division people, having exempted themselves from labour 
and imposed it on others, are busying themselves with things quite incomprehensible to 
the workers, which the latter regard as rubbish and often as harmful rubbish; and they 
busy themselves with these things without any thought of being useful to the people, 
merely for their own pleasure, being for some reason fully convinced that their activity 
will always be such as is essential for the life of the working folk. 



Leo Tolstoy 


110 


What Then Must We Do? 


Men have exempted themselves from labour for life and have thrown that work onto 
others who perish in their toil. They exploit such labour, and assert that their own 
occupations, incomprehensible to the people and not directed towards the service of 
others, redeem all the harm they inflict by exempting themselves from labour for the 
maintenance of life and by consuming the labour of others. 

The men engaged in the government, to compensate for the 'undoubted and evident evil 
they inflict by exploiting other people's work and exempting themselves from the 
struggle with nature, add another evident and undoubted evil-that of inflicting all sorts of 
violence. 

The industrialists, to redeem the undoubted and evident evil they cause by using up the 
fruits of their toil, strive to obtain for themselves and consequently to take from others as 
much wealth as possible, that is, as much of people's labour as possible. 

Scientists and artists, in return for the unquestionable and obvious harm they do to the 
labouring people, occupy themselves with things that are incomprehensible to the 
labourers and which, on their own assertion, to be real must not aim at utility - but to 
which they feel drawn. And so all these people are quite convinced that their right to 
consume other people's labour is impregnable. 

It would seem obvious that all these people who have exempted themselves from labour 
to maintain life, have no ground for this. But amazing to say, they firmly behave in their 
own integrity and live as they do with a calm conscience. 

There must be some ground - there must be some false doctrine - underlying such a 
terrible delusion! 


CHAPTER XXVIII 

AND indeed, underlying the position of people who live on work done by others there 
lies not only a belief but a whole doctrine, and not one doctrine but three, which during 
ages have grown up one on the other and solidified into one monstrous deception - or 
humbug, as the English expression has it - which hides their injustice. 

The most ancient doctrine in our world justifying people’s neglect of the fundamental 
duty of working for their living was the Church-Christian doctrine, according to which 
men are differentiated one from another by God's will, as the sun differs from the moon 
and stars, and the stars from one another: some men being appointed by God to rule over 
all the rest, others over many, others again over a few, and the rest being appointed to 
obey. 

That doctrine, though now shaken to its foundations, still continues by inertia to act on 
people, so that many without accepting the teaching and often without being acquainted 
with it are still guided by it. 

The second justificatory doctrine in our world is one I do not know how to describe 
otherwise than as the State-philosophic. According to that doctrine, fully expressed by 
Hegel, all that exists is reasonable, and the order of life people have set up and are 
maintaining is not established and maintained by men but is the only possible form for 
the manifestation of the spirit, or in general for the life of humanity. This doctrine, too, is 



What Then Must We Do? 


Ill 


Leo Tolstoy 


no longer held by those who guide public opinion in our day, but only maintains itself by 
force of inertia. 

The third and now dominant doctrine - on which is based the justification now adopted 
alike by scientific and artistic people - is not a scientific doctrine in the simple meaning 
of that word as indicating knowledge in general, but in the sense of one kind of 
knowledge special both in form and in matter. 

This new doctrine, called scientific, is what in our day chiefly supports the justification 
that hides from idle people their neglect of their duty. 

This doctrine made its appearance in Europe contemporaneously with a large class of rich 
and idle people who served neither Church nor State and were in want of a justification 
corresponding to their position. 

Not very long ago, up to the time of the French revolution, all in Europe who were not 
workers, in order to have a right to appropriate other people's work had to have some 
very definite occupation in the service of the Church, the Government, or the Army. The 
men who served the Government ruled the people, those who served the Church taught 
people divine truths, while those who served in the Army defended the people. 

Only three classes - the clergy, the rulers, and the military - considered themselves to 
have a right to appropriate the labour of the workers, and they could always adduce the 
services they rendered to the people: other rich men who had not that justification were 
despised and, conscious of their fault, felt ashamed of their wealth and idleness. 

But a time came when this class of rich people not belonging to the clergy, the 
government, or the army, multiplied and became powerful thanks to the defects of those 
three classes, and these new people needed a justification. And the justification was 
produced. 

Not a century passed before all these people, not serving State or Church and taking no 
part in their affairs, had not only obtained the same right to appropriate other people's 
labour as the former classes, and ceased to be ashamed of their wealth and idleness, but 
had come to consider their position fully justified. And an enormous number of such 
people have arisen in our times and their number continually increases. And what is sur- 
prising is that these new people, the very ones the justice of whose exemption from toil 
was so recently not acknowledged, now consider that they alone are fully justified, and 
attack the three earlier classes - the servants of the Church, the State and the Army - 
considering their exemption from toil to be unjust and even considering their activity 
harmful. 

And what is still more surprising is that the former servants of the State, the Church, and 
the Army, no longer rely on their divine vocation, nor even on the philosophic 
importance of the State as necessary for the manifestation of individuality, but they 
abandon these supports which so long maintained them, and now seek the support on 
which the new dominant class stands headed by scientists and artists-which has now 
found a fresh justification. If a man of the government now sometimes by old habit 
defends his position on the ground that he was set in it by God, or that the State is a form 
of the development of personality, this indicates that he lags behind the age, and he feels 
that no one believes him. To defend himself effectively he must now no longer produce 



Leo Tolstoy 


112 


What Then Must We Do? 


theological or philosophic supports, but other, new, scientific ones. He has to put forward 
the principle of national or organic development, and has to curry favour with the 
dominant order, as in the Middle Ages it was necessary to curry favour with the 
churchmen, and at the end of the eighteenth century with the philosophers, as was done 
by Frederick and Catherine the Great. 

If now a rich man sometimes, by old habit, speaks of the divine will that chose him to be 
rich, or of the importance of an aristocracy for the nation's good, he does so because he 
lags behind the times. To justify himself effectively he ought to put forward the 
assistance he renders to the progress of civilization by improvement in methods of 
production, cheapening articles of consumption, or promoting international intercourse. A 
rich man should talk the language of science and should offer sacrifices to the dominant 
order, as was formerly done to ecclesiastics; he should publish newspapers and books, 
arrange a picture, gallery, musical societies, a kindergarten, or technical schools. 

The dominant order consists of the scientists and artists of a certain tendency: they 
possess a complete justification of their avoidance of toil, and on their justification, as 
formerly on the theological and afterwards on the philosophic, all justification now rests, 
and it is these men who now issue diplomas of exemption to other classes. 

The class that now has a complete justification for its avoidance of toil is that of 
scientists, and especially experimental, positive, critical, evolutionary scientists, and the 
class of artists who follow the same tendency. 

If a scientist or artist, by old association, now speaks about prophecy, revelation, or the 
manifestation of the spirit, he does so because he lags behind the age, and he fails to 
justify himself: to stand firmly he must somehow associate his activity with experimental, 
positive, critical science, and must put that science at the base of his activity. 

Only then will the science or art he is occupied with be real, and only then will he, in our 
day, stand on unshakable foundations and be certain of the benefit he confers on 
humanity. 

On experimental, critical, positive science the justification of all who have exempted 
themselves from labour now rests. 

The theological and philosophic justifications are obsolete, announce themselves timidly 
and shamefacedly, and try to transform themselves into the scientific justification; while 
the scientific justification boldly upsets and destroys the remains of the former 
justifications, ousts them everywhere, and lifts its head high, assured of its own 
invincibility. 

The theological justification said that people by their vocation were called - some to 
command, others to obey, some to live sumptuously, others to live in want; and therefore 
those who believed in the revelation of God could not doubt the justice of the position of 
those who by the will of God were called to command and be rich. 

The State-philosophic justification said that the State, with all its institutions and grades 
differing in property and rights, is that historic form which is essential for the due 
manifestation of the spirit in mankind, and that therefore the position each one occupies 
in the State and in society in respect of property and rights, should be what it is for the 
due life of mankind. 



What Then Must We Do? 


113 


Leo Tolstoy 


The scientific theory says that the others are all nonsense and superstition: the one the 
fruit of thought of the theological period, the other of the metaphysical period. For the 
study of the laws of the life of human societies there is only one sure method - that of 
positive, experimental, critical science. Only sociology, based on biology, based on all 
the other positive sciences, can give us the laws of the life of humanity. Humanity, or 
human society, is an organism, formed or still in process of formation and subject to all 
the laws of the evolution of organisms. One of the chief of these laws is division of 
labour among the parts of the organism. If some people command and others obey, if 
some live in opulence and others in want, this occurs, not by the will of God, and not be- 
cause the State is a form of the manifestation of personality, but because in societies as in 
organisms a division of labour occurs which is necessary for the life of the whole: some 
people in society perform the muscular work, others the brain work. 

On that doctrine in our times the dominant excuse is built. 


CHAPTER XXIX 

A NEW teaching is preached by Christ and recorded in the Gospels. This teaching is 
persecuted and not accepted, and a story is invented of the fall of the first man and of the 
first angel and this invention is accepted as being the teaching of Christ. This invention is 
absurd and quite unfounded, but from it the deduction naturally flows that man may live 
badly and yet consider himself justified by Christ, and this deduction is so convenient for 
the crowd of weak people who dislike moral exertion that it is at once accepted as the 
truth, and even as divine revealed truth, though nowhere in what is called revelation is 
there even a hint of it - and for a thousand years this invention is made the basis of the 
labours of the learned theologians on which they construct their theories. 

The learned theologians split up into sects, begin to deny each other's constructions, and 
themselves begin to feel that they are confused and no longer understand what they are 
saying; but the crowd demands of them confirmation of the favourite doctrine and they 
pretend that they understand and believe what they say, and continue to preach it. But a 
time comes when the deductions prove unnecessary, the crowd peeps into the sanctuaries 
of the priests, and to its astonishment, instead of the solemn undoubted truths the 
mysteries of theology had appeared to it to be, sees that there is and has been nothing 
there except the grossest deception, and it marvels at its own blindness. 

The same thing happened with philosophy, not philosophy in the sense of the wisdom of 
a Confucius, a Socrates, or an Epictetus, but with proffessorial philosophy, when it 
pandered to the instincts of the idle rich. 

Not long ago in the learned educated world the philosophy of the spirit reigned, 
according to which it appeared that all that exists is reasonable, that there is no evil and 
no good, and that man need riot struggle with evil but need only manifest the spirit: one 
man in military service, another in the law-courts, and a third on a fiddle. 

There have been many different expressions of human wisdom and those expressions 
were known to the men of the nineteenth century. Rousseau and Pascal and Lessing and 
Spinoza were known, as well 'as all the wisdom of antiquity, but no one else's wisdom 
captured the crowd. Nor can it be said that Hegel's success depended on the symmetry of 



Leo Tolstoy 


114 


What Then Must We Do? 


his theories. There were other equally symmetrical theories: Fichte's, and Schopenhauer's. 
There was only one cause of that theory having become, for a short time, the belief of the 
whole world; the cause was the same as that of the success of the theory of the fall and 
redemption of man, namely that the deductions flowing from this philosophic theory 
pandered to men's weaknesses. They said: everything is reasonable, everything is good, 
no one is to blame for anything. And just as the theologians had built on the theory of 
redemption, so the philosophers built their tower of Babel on Hegelian foundations (and 
some backward people still sit in it even now) and their tongues became similarly 
confused, and similarly they felt that they did not themselves know what they were 
saying, and in the same way, without sweeping the rubbish out of their house, they 
laboriously strove to maintain their authority with the crowd and, as before, the crowd 
demanded confirmation of what suited it and believed that what to it seemed obscure and 
contradictory was all clear as day there, on the philosophic heights. And again, in the 
same way, a time came when that theory was worn out and a new one appeared in its 
place; the old one became useless, the crowd peeped into the secret sanctuaries of the 
priests and saw that there was nothing there and never had been anything but very 
obscure and senseless words. That happened within my own recollection. 

When I started life Hegelianism was the basis of everything: it was in the air, found 
expression in magazine and newspaper articles, in novels and essays, in art, in histories, 
in sermons, and in conversation. A man unacquainted with Hegel had no right to speak: 
he who wished to know the truth studied Hegel. Everything rested on him; and suddenly 
forty years have gone by and there is nothing left of him, he is not even mentioned - as 
though he had never existed. And what is most remarkable is that, like pseudo- 
Christianity, Hegelianism fell not because anyone refuted it, but because it suddenly 
became evident that neither the one nor the other was needed by our learned, educated 
world. 

If we now speak to a modern educated man about the fall of the angel and of Adam, or 
about redemption, he will not attempt to argue or to prove the falsity of it, but will ask 
with perplexity: 

What angel? Why Adam? What redemption? What use is it to me? Similarly with 
Hegelianism, a man of our time will not argue about it but will only be surprised. What 
spirit? Where does it come from? Why does it manifest itself? What use is it to me? 

'Yes, that came about' - say the present-day scientists - 'because of the ravings of the 
theological and the metaphysical periods; now we have critical, positive science which 
does not deceive because it is based on induction and experiment. Now our knowledge is 
not shaky, as that was, and only along our path lie the answers to all the questions of 
mankind.' 

But then that is just what the theologians said, and they were certainly not fools, for we 
know that among them were men of immense intellect; and within my own recollection 
the Hegelians spoke with no less confidence, and were not less accepted by the crowd of 
so-called educated people. And they - our Herzens, Stankeviches, and Belinskis, for 
instance - were not fools either. Why then did this surprising phenomenon occur that 
clever people should preach with the greatest confidence, and the crowd should 



What Then Must We Do? 


115 


Leo Tolstoy 


reverently accept, such unfounded and empty doctrines? The reason is the same, namely - 
that the doctrines justify people in their bad lives. 

Is not the reason of the confidence of the positive, critical, experimental scientists, and of 
the reverent attitude of the crowd towards their doctrines, still the same? At first it seems 
strange how the theory of evolution (which, like the redemption in theology, serves the 
majority as a popular expression of the whole new creed) can justify people in their 
injustice, and it seems as if the scientific theory dealt only with facts and did nothing but 
observe facts. 

But that only seems so. It seemed just the same in the case of theological doctrine: 
theology, it seemed, was only occupied with dogmas and had no relation to people's lives, 
and it seemed the same with regard to philosophy, which appeared to be occupied solely 
with transcendental reasonings. 

But that only seemed so. It was just the same with the Hegelian doctrine on a large scale 
and with the particular case of the Malthusian teaching. 

Hegelianism seemed to be concerned only with its logical constructions and to have no 
relation to people's lives; and this seemed to be the case with the Malthusian theory also- 
it seemed solely occupied with statistical facts. But that only seemed to be so. 

Contemporary science investigates facts. 

But what facts? Why those particular facts and not others? 

Scientists of to-day are very fond of saying solemnly and confidently: 'We only 
investigate facts,' imagining these words to have some meaning. 

One cannot possibly only investigate facts for the number of facts available for 
investigation is innumerable (in the exact sense of that word). Before investigating the 
facts one must have a theory on the basis of which such or such facts are selected from 
among the innumerable quantity. And such a theory exists and is even very definitely ex- 
pressed, though many of those engaged on contemporary science either ignore it, that is, 
do not wish to know it, or actually do not know it, or pretend not to. So it has always 
been with all reigning, guiding creeds-both theological and philosophic. 

The foundations of every creed are always contained in the theory, and the so-called 
learned people only devise further deductions from the given data, sometimes without 
knowing them. But there always is a fundamental theory. So now, contemporary science 
chooses its facts on the basis of a very definite theory which it sometimes knows, 
sometimes does not wish to know, and sometimes really does not know, though that 
theory exists. 

The theory is this: all mankind is an undying organism, men are the particles of this 
organism and each of them has his special vocation in the service of the whole. 

Just as the cells composing an organism divide among themselves the labour needed for 
the struggle for the existence of the whole organism strengthen one quality and weaken 
another, and coalesce with one organ the better to satisfy the needs of the whole 
organism: and just as among social animals - ants and bees - separate individuals divide 
the work among themselves: the queen lays eggs, the drone fertilizes her, and the workers 



Leo Tolstoy 


116 


What Then Must We Do? 


labour for the life of the whole - so in humanity and human societies the same differen- 
tiation and integration of parts occurs. 

And therefore to discover the law of man's life it is necessary to study the laws of the life 
and development of organisms; in the life and development of organisms we find the 
following laws: a law that every phenomenon is accompanied by other consequences 
besides its immediate one, another law of the frailty of the undifferentiated, and a third 
law of heterogeneity and homogeneity, and so forth. All this seems very innocent, but it 
is only necessary to draw deductions from all these observed facts in order to see at once 
whither they tend. They all tend to one thing, namely, to the recognition of humanity or 
human society as an organism, and so to a recognition of the division of activities that 
exists in human societies as organic, that is to say, as necessary; and as in human 
societies very many cruelties and abominations are perceptible, these phenomena must 
not be regarded as cruel or abominable but must be regarded as indubitable facts 
confirming a general law - namely, the law of the division of labour. 

The philosophy of the spirit also justified every cruelty and abomination, but there it was 
philosophic and is therefore considered questionable; but in science it all turns out to be 
scientific and therefore indubitable. 

How can one help accepting so admirable a theory! One has only to regard human society 
as an object of observation and one can calmly devour the labour of others who are 
perishing, comforting oneself with the reflection that one's activity as a dancer, lawyer, 
doctor, philosopher, actor, investigator of mediumism, or of the form); of atoms, is a 
functional activity of the human organism, so that there can be no question of whether it 
is just that I should make use of the labour of others (I only do what pleases me) as there 
can be no question of the justice of the activity of a brain-cell which avails itself of the 
work of the cells in the muscles. 

How can we help accepting such a practical theory enabling us to pocket our conscience 
for ever and quietly live an unrestrained animal life, feeling under our feet the unshakable 
support of modern science? And it is on this new creed that the justification of the 
idleness and cruelty of men is now built. 


CHAPTER XXX 

THIS creed began but recently - some fifty years ago. Its chief founder was the French 
savant, A. Comte. Under the influence of Bichat's physiological researches, which were 
then new, he, a systematizer and a religious man, was struck by the old idea expressed 
long ago by Menenius Agrippa, that human societies and even all humanity may be 
regarded as one whole, as an organism, and men may be regarded as the living cells of 
separate organs each having its definite function in the service of the whole organism. 
This thought so pleased Comte that he began to construct a philosophic theory on it, and 
he was so carried away by this theory that he quite forgot that his starting-point was 
merely a nice little analogy, suitable in a fable but quite unsuitable for the foundation of a 
science. As often happens, he regarded his favourite supposition as an axiom and 
imagined that his whole theory was based on the firmest experimental foundations. 
According to his theory it appeared that as humanity is an organism, the knowledge of 



What Then Must We Do? 


117 


Leo Tolstoy 


what man is and what his relations to the universe should be can be attained only by 
studying the properties of this organism. In order to learn these properties man can make 
observations on other - lower - organisms and draw inferences from the facts of their life. 

In the first place, the only true and scientific method according to Comte is therefore the 
inductive method and science is only such as is based on experiment. Secondly, the aim 
and apex of science is the new science of the imaginary organism of humanity or of the 
super-organic being-humanity: this new imaginary science being sociology. From this 
view of science in general it appeared that all former knowledge was false, and the whole 
history of humanity's knowledge of itself fell into three, or really two, periods: 

(1) The theological and metaphysical periods, lasting from the commencement of the 
world until Comte, and (2) the present period of true science - positivism - which began 
with Comte. 

This was all very nice; there was only one error, namely, that the whole edifice was built 
on the sand - on the arbitrary assertion that humanity is an organism. 

That assertion was arbitrary because we have no more right to acknowledge the existence 
of an organism of humanity not subject to observation than we have to acknowledge the 
existence of a triune God and similar theological propositions. 

That assertion was fallacious because to the conception of humanity, that is, of men, the 
definition of an organism was incorrectly affixed despite the fact that humanity lacks the 
essential sign of an organism, namely a centre of sensation and consciousness. We only 
call an elephant or a bacterium an 'organism' because, by analogy we attribute to those 
beings a similar unification of sensation and of consciousness to that we are conscious of 
in ourselves; but in human societies and in humanity this essential indication is lacking, 
and therefore, however many other indications we may detect that are common to 
humanity and to an organism, in the absence of that essential indication, the 
acknowledgement of humanity as an organism is incorrect. 

But despite the arbitrariness and incorrectness of its fundamental basis the positive 
philosophy was accepted most cordially by the so-called educated world, so important for 
that world was the justification this philosophy afforded to the existing order of things by 
regarding the present rule of violence among men as Just. What is remarkable in this 
connexion is that of Comte's works which consist of two parts - the positive philosophy 
and the positive politics - the learned world only accepted the first: the part which, on the 
new experimental basis, offered a justification for the existing evil of human societies; 
but the second part, dealing with the moral obligations of altruism resulting from 
acknowledging humanity as an organism, was considered not merely unimportant but 
even insignificant and unscientific. 

What had occurred with the two parts of Kant's philosophy was repeated. The criticism of 
pure reason was accepted by the learned crowd, but the criticism of practical reason - the 
part which contained the essence of his moral teaching - was rejected. In Comte's 
teaching I they accepted as scientific what pandered to the prevailing evil. But the 
positive philosophy accepted by the crowd, being based on an arbitrary and unsound 
proposition, was itself so unfounded and therefore so unstable that it could not be 
maintained by itself. And then among the many idle speculations of so -called science 



Leo Tolstoy 


118 


What Then Must We Do? 


there appears an assertion - lacking equally in novelty and in truth - to the effect that 
living creatures, that is organisms, have been derived from one another - not only one 
organism from another but one organism from many: that is, that in a very long period of 
time, in a million years, a fish and a duck, for instance, may not merely have come from 
one and the same ancestor but that one organism may have come from many separate 
organisms, so that, for instance, a single animal might be produced from a swarm of bees. 
And this arbitrary and incorrect assertion was accepted by the learned world with yet 
greater sympathy. This assertion was arbitrary because no one has ever seen how some 
organisms are produced from others, and so the assumption about the origin of species 
always remains an assumption and not a fact of experience. And the assumption was 
incorrect because the solution of the question of the origin of species by the assertion that 
they were produced in accordance with a law of heredity and adaptation during an 
infinitely long period of time is not at all a solution, but only the repetition of the question 
in a new form. 

According to the solution of the question by Moses (in a polemic with whom lies the 
whole importance of the theory) it appears that the diversity of the species of living 
beings is due to God's will and infinite power, but according to the theory of evolution it 
turns out that the diversity of living beings came about of itself in consequence of 
endlessly varied conditions of heredity and environment during an infinite period of time. 
The theory of evolution, put into plain words, only asserts that in infinite time anything 
you please may originate from anything you please. 

There is no reply to the question but the same statement is differently put: instead of a 
will, accident is predicated, and the coefficient of infinity is transferred from power to 
time. But this new assertion (made still more arbitrary and incorrect by Darwin's 
followers) supported the former assertion of Comte, and so became the revelation of our 
age and the basis of all the sciences, even of history, philology, and religion, and more 
than that, according to the naive confession of the founder of the theory - Darwin his idea 
was suggested by Malthus's law and therefore put forward the theory of the struggle of 
living beings and of men for existence as a fundamental law of all life. And one sees that 
that was just what the crowd of idle people needed for their justification. 

Two unstable theories which did not stand I firmly on their own feet, supported one 
another and obtained a semblance of stability. Both theories contained within them the 
meaning so precious to the crowd - that men are not to blame for the existing evil in 
human societies but that the existing order is just the one that ought to exist; and the new 
theory was accepted by the crowd, in the sense in which it was needed, with full faith and 
unheard-of enthusiasm. And on these two arbitrary and incorrect propositions, accepted 
as articles of faith, the new scientific creed was consolidated. 

Both in subject and in form this new creed is extraordinarily like the Church-Christian 
creed. 

As to the subject, the resemblance consists in the fact that in both of them an unreal 
fantastic meaning is ascribed to something real and this unreal meaning is made the 
subject of investigation. 



What Then Must We Do? 


119 


Leo Tolstoy 


In the Church-Christian creed to Christ who really existed is attached the fantastic 
meaning of God Himself, while in the positivist creed, to mankind which really exists is 
attached the fantastic meaning of an organism. 

In form, the resemblance of the two creeds is striking, for both in the one and in the other 
a certain conception held by some people is accepted as the one infallibly true 
conception. 

In Church-Christianity the conception of a divine revelation to men who call themselves 
the Church is accepted as being sacred and exclusively true; according to the Positivist 
creed the comprehension of science by the men who call themselves scientific is accepted 
as indubitable and true. Just as the Church-Christians acknowledged a beginning of true 
knowledge of God only from the institution of their Church, and merely as it were out of 
civility said that earlier believers were also a Church; so also positivist science, according 
to its assertion, began only with Comte, and these scientists, again merely out of civility, 
admit a previous existence of science, and that only in certain representatives such as 
Aristotle. Just like the Church, positivist science excludes the knowledge possessed by all 
the rest of humanity, treating all knowledge outside its own as an error. 

The resemblance goes farther: just as to aid the fundamental dogma of theology - the 
divinity of Christ and the Trinity - there came the old dogma, which received a new 
meaning, of the fall of man and his redemption by Christ's death, and out of these two 
dogmas the popular Church doctrine was composed - so in our time, to the aid of Comte's 
fundamental dogma about the organism of humanity, came the old dogma of evolution 
but with a new meaning, and out of them both the popular scientific creed was composed. 

In both creeds the new dogma was necessary for the support of the old one and is 
intelligible only in connexion with the fundamental dogma. If to a believer in the divinity 
of Christ it is not clear or intelligible why God came down to earth, the dogma of the 
redemption supplies an explanation. 

If to a believer in the organism of humanity it is not clear why an aggregate of individuals 
should be considered an organism, the dogma of evolution furnishes this explanation. 

The dogma of the redemption is needed to reconcile the contradiction between the first 
dogma and reality. 

God came to earth to save men but men have not been saved-how reconcile this 
contradiction? The dogma of the redemption says: 'He has saved those who believe in the 
redemption: if you believe in it you are saved.' 

Similarly the dogma of evolution is needed to solve the contradiction between reality and 
the previous dogma: humanity is an organism yet we see that it does not respond to the 
chief sign of an organism - how is this to be harmonized? Then the dogma of evolution 
says: 'Humanity is an organism in process of formation. If you believe this you can 
regard humanity as an organism.' 

And as it is impossible for a man free from superstitious belief in a Trinity and the 
divinity of Christ even to understand wherein the interest and meaning of the doctrine of 
the redemption lies, and that meaning is explained only by recognizing the fundamental 
dogma about Christ being God Himself - so also to humanity free from the positivist 
superstition it is impossible even to understand wherein lies the interest of the teaching 



Leo Tolstoy 


120 


What Then Must We Do? 


about the origin of species, and this interest is explained only when one knows the funda- 
mental dogma that humanity is an organism. 

And just as all the refinements of theology are intelligible only to him who believes in the 
basic dogmas, so also all the refinements of sociology, which now occupy the minds of 
all the very latest and profoundest scientists, are intelligible only to believers. 

The resemblance of the two creeds lies also in this, that propositions once accepted on 
faith and no longer subject to investigation serve as basis for the strangest theories, and 
the preachers of these theories, having adopted a method of asserting their right to 
consider themselves holy in theology and scientific in knowledge - that is to say, 
infallible-arrive at most arbitrary, improbable, and quite unfounded assertions, which 
they express most solemnly and. seriously, and the details of which are disputed with 
similar seriousness and solemnity by those who disagree on particular points but equally 
accept the basic dogmas. 

The Basil the Great of this creed, Herbert Spencer, for example, in one of his first works 
expresses it thus: Society and organisms resemble one another in the following: 

(1) That beginning as small aggregates, they imperceptibly grow in mass till they 
sometimes reach dimensions ten thousand times greater than their original size; 

(2) That whereas at first they are of such simple structure that they may be regarded as 
deprived of all structure, during their growth they acquire a continually increasing 
complexity; 

(3) That though in their early, undeveloped period there hardly exists any 
interdependence of parts, their parts gradually acquire a mutual interdependence, which 
at last becomes so strong that the activity and life of each part is only made possible by 
the activity and life of the rest; 

(4) That the life and development of society are independent of, and more prolonged 
than, the life and development of any of its component units, which are born, grow, act, 
reproduce, and die, while the body politic they form continues to live generation after 
generation and increases in size owing to the perfection of its structure and functional 
activity. 

After that follow points of difference between organisms and societies, and it is shown 
that these differences are only apparently so, but that organisms and societies are 
completely alike. 

To a new observer the question plainly presents itself: 'What are you talking about? Why 
is humanity an organism? Or how does it resemble one? 

'You say that societies according to these four indications resemble organisms, but 
nothing of the kind is true. You only take a few signs of an organism and place human 
societies under those signs. 

'You adduce four signs of resemblance, then take signs of differences, but these (in your 
opinion) are so only in appearance, and you conclude that human societies may be 
regarded as organisms. But that is nothing but an idle play of dialectics. On such a basis 
anything you please can be brought under the signs of an organism.' 



What Then Must We Do? 


121 


Leo Tolstoy 


I take the first thing that occurs to me, say, for instance, a wood as it is sown in the field 
and grows up: 

(1) 'Beginning as small aggregates,' etc., just the same occurs in the fields when the seeds 
gradually take root in them and the fields become overgrown with trees'. 

(2) 'At first the structure is simple, afterwards the complexity increases,' &c.; just the 
same occurs with the wood: first there are only birch trees, then willows and hazel 
bushes; at first they all grow straight, afterwards their branches intertwine. 

(3) 'The interdependence of the parts increases so that the life of each part depends on the 
life and activity of the rest'; it is just the same with the trees: the hazel bushes warm the 
trunks (cut them out and the other trees will freeze), the outskirts of the wood protect it 
from the wind, the seed trees continue the species, tall and leafy trees give shade, and the 
life of one tree depends on another. 

(4) 'The separate parts may die, but the whole lives'; the same is true of a wood. As the 
proverb says: 'The wood does not weep for a tree.' 

It is just the same with the example usually adduced by defenders of the theory: that if 
you cut off an arm the 'arm perishes. Transplant a tree beyond the shade and the forest- 
soil, and it dies. 

There is also a remarkable resemblance between this creed and the Church-Christian 
creed and all other creeds founded on dogmas that are accepted on faith, in its 
imperviousness to logical arguments. Having shown that on their theory you have a right 
to consider a wood to be an organism, you think you have shown them the incorrectness 
of their definition - but not at, all! 

The definition they give to an organism is so inexact and elastic that they can bring 
anything they please in under it. 

'Yes,' they will say, 'a wood may also be regarded as an organism. A wood is a peaceful 
interaction of individual parts which do not destroy one another - an aggregate - whose 
parts can come into closer connexion and like a swarm of bees may become an organism.' 

Then you remark that, if so, then the birds and insects and grasses of that wood, which 
interact and do not destroy one another, together with the trees may also be regarded as 
an organism. 

They will agree even to that. Every aggregate of living things interacting and not 
destroying one another may, according to their theory be regarded as an organism. You 
may assert a connexion and co-operation between any things you please, and you may 
say that by evolution from anything you please may be produced anything you please m a 
very great length of time. 

To believers in the triune nature of God it is impossible to prove that it is not so but it is 
possible to show them that their assertion is an assertion not of knowledge but of belief, 
and that If they assert that there are three Gods I with equal right may assert that there are 
seventeen and a half. Gods, and the adherents of positive and evolutionary science may 
be met similarly and yet more indubitably. On the basis of that science I will undertake to 
prove anything you please. And what is most remarkable is that this same positive 
science recognizes the scientific method as a sign of true knowledge and has itself 



Leo Tolstoy 


122 


What Then Must We Do? 


defined what it calls ‘the scientific method’. What it calls ‘the scientific method’ is 
common sense. And just this common sense exposes it at every step. 

As soon as those who occupied the seats of the Saints felt that there was nothing saintly 
left in them and that they were all accused, they immediately (like the Pope and our 
Synod) called themselves not merely Holy but Most Holy. And as soon as science felt 
that nothing reasonable was left in it, it called itself reasonable, that is, ‘scientific’ 
science. 


CHAPTER XXXI 

DIVISION of labour is the law of all that exists, and so it must exist in human societies. 
Very likely that is so, but the question still remains: Is the division of labour now existing 
in human societies quite the division which should exist? For if a certain division of 
labour appears to men unreasonable and unjust, no science can prove to them that what 
they consider unreasonable and unjust ought to prevail. 

Theological theory proved that power is ordained by God and very likely it is so, but the 
question remained: Whose power is from God - Catherine’s or Pugachev’s ? 1 And no 
finesse of theology has been able to solve that doubt. 

The philosophy of the Spirit showed the State to be a form of the development of 
personality, but the question remained: Should the State of a Nero or Genghis Khan be 
considered a form of the development of personality? And no transcendental words could 
solve that problem. 

The same applies to the science of the scientists. 

Division of labour is a condition of the life of organisms and of human societies; but what 
are we to consider an organic division of labour in human societies? However much 
science may study the division of labour among the cells of the tapeworm, such 
observations will fail to induce a man to consider a division of labour just which his 
reason and conscience repudiate. 

However convincing may be the proofs of the division of labour among the cells of the 
organisms we investigate, man, as long as he is not deprived of reason, will still say that 
no one ought to have to weave cotton cloth all his life long, and that such an employment 
is not a division of labour but an oppression of men. 

Spencer and others say there are whole populations of weavers and that therefore the 
weaver's activity is an organic division of labour - but in saying this they are in fact 
saying precisely what the theologians said. 

There is a power and therefore it is from God no matter what it may be like. There are 
weavers, so such is the proper division of labour. It would be all right to say so if the 
power and the population of weavers had resulted of themselves, but we know that they 
do not come of themselves but that we produced them. So we have to know whether we 


1 Catherine II (the Great) of Russia reigned from 1761 to 1796. Pugachev was leader of a very serious 
peasant revolt from 1773 to 1775; he captured several towns and overran several provinces. - A. M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


123 


Leo Tolstoy 


produced that power by God's will or by our own, and whether we made these weavers 
by an organic law or by something else? 

Men live and support themselves by agriculture as is proper for all men: one man puts up 
a forge and mends his plough, and his neighbour comes and asks him to mend his and 
promises to pay him with work or with money. A third and a fourth come and among 
these people there is a division of labour: a blacksmith is set up. Another man teaches his 
children well and his neighbour brings his children to him and asks him to teach them - a 
teacher has been set up. But both the smith and the teacher became and remain such 
because they were asked, and they remain such only so long as they are asked to be smith 
or teacher. But should it happen that many smiths or teachers appear or that their work is 
not wanted, they would, as common sense demands and as always happens where there 
are no causes infringing the proper division of labour - at once give up those occupations 
and return to agriculture. 

People who act so are guided by their reason and their conscience, and therefore we, men 
endowed with reason and conscience, declare such division of labour to be proper. But if 
it happened that blacksmiths were able to compel others to work for them and continued 
to make horseshoes when these were not wanted, and that teachers taught when there was 
no one to teach, it would be plain to every new-comer endowed with reason and 
conscience that this was not a division but an exploitation of other men's labour, for such 
activity would infringe the only standard by which a fair division of labour can be 
known-a demand made for such labour by others, and a voluntary offer of remuneration 
for it. And yet it is just such an exploitation that the scientists' science calls 'the division 
of labour'. 

People make things that others do not think of asking for, and demand to be fed for doing 
so and say that this is proper because it is a division of labour. 

What constitutes the chief public evil the people suffer from - not in our country alone - 
is the Government, the innumerable quantity of officials; and the cause of the economic 
distress of our time is what the English call over-production: the making of a quantity of 
goods no one wants or knows what to do with, and all this results from the strange 
conception people have of the division of labour. 

It would be strange to find a shoemaker who considered that people were bound to feed 
him because he unceasingly made boots that had long since ceased to be wanted by 
anyone; but what are we to say of those occupied with Government, the Church, science, 
and art, who produce nothing palpable or useful to the people, and whose goods find no 
demand, but who yet (pleading the division of labour) boldly demand to be well fed and 
well dressed? 

There may be wizards whose activity meets a demand and to whom cakes and ale are' 
given, but it is difficult to imagine that there can be wizards whose witchery nobody 
wants but who yet boldly demand to be well fed for their performances. 

Yet that is just what is happening in our world among those employed in Government, 
and in the Church, and on science and art. 



Leo Tolstoy 


124 


What Then Must We Do? 


And all this results from a false understanding of the division of labour, defined not by 
man's conscience but by the investigations that are announced with such unanimity by the 
men of science. 

A division of labour always has existed and does exist, but it is only justified when man's 
conscience and reason decide what it should be, and not when man merely observes that 
it does exist. And the conscience and reason of all men decide this question very simply, 
indubitably, and unanimously. 

They decide that the division of labour is fair only when a man's special activity is so 
needed by others that they, asking him to serve them, willingly offer him support in 
return for what he does for them. 

But when a man can live on the backs of others from childhood till he is thirty, promising 
when he has finished his education to do something useful, that no one asks him to do, 
and when from the age of thirty till death he can go on living in the same way, still 
promising to do something no one asks him to do, this cannot be, and in our society is 
not, a division of labour, but simply a seizure by the strong of the fruits of the labour of 
others: ‘it is the very robbery theologians used to speak of as a 'divine dispensation', and 
philosophers afterwards declared to be 'a necessary form of life', and the scientists' 
science now calls 'the organic division of labour'. 

The whole significance of the reigning science lies simply in that. 

It has now become the granter of diplomas for idleness, for it alone in its sanctuaries 
examines and decides what is a parasitic and what an organic activity in the social 
organism - as if every man cannot recognize that much more truly and quickly by 
consulting his reason and conscience. 

And as formerly for the priesthood and afterwards for the government, there could be no 
doubt as to who were the people others most needed, so now to the scientists' science it 
seems there can be no doubt that its activity is unquestionably organic: they, the scientists 
and artists, are the most precious brain-cells of the organism. But God be with them! Let 
them reign, eat and drink well, and live idly, as the priests and the sophists of old lived 
and reigned, if only they did not, like those priests and sophists, pervert people. 

Since men, rational beings, existed they have discriminated between good and evil and 
have made use of the distinctions those who went before them had made in this respect. 
They have striven against evil, sought the true and best path, and slowly but steadily 
advanced along it. And, obstructing that path, various deceptions have always been set in 
their way in order to show that this should not be done, but that men should go on living 
as of old. The terrible old deceptions of the Church arose, with fearful struggles and 
labour men gradually freed themselves from these, but before they were completely free 
there arose a new - State-philosophic - fraud to replace the old one. Men broke through 
that also. And now a new and yet worse fraud has grown up obstructing man's path: the 
scientific fraud. 

This new fraud is just like the old ones: its essence lies in substituting something external 
for the use of our own reason and conscience and that of our predecessors: in the Church 
teaching this external thing was revelation, in the scientific teaching it is observation. 



What Then Must We Do? 


125 


Leo Tolstoy 


The trick played by this science is to destroy man's faith in reason and conscience by 
directing attention to the grossest deviations from the use of human reason and 
conscience, and having clothed the deception in a scientific theory, to assure them that by 
acquiring knowledge of external phenomena they will get to know indubitable facts 
which will reveal to them the law of man's life. And the mental demoralization consists in 
this, that coming to believe that things which should be decided by conscience and reason 
are decided by observation, these people lose their consciousness of good and evil and 
become incapable of understanding the expression and definitions of good and evil that 
have been formed by the whole preceding life of humanity. All this, in their jargon, is 
conditional and subjective. It must all be abandoned - they say - the truth cannot be 
understood by one's reason, for one may err, but there is another path which is infallible 
and almost mechanical: one must study facts. And facts must be studied on the basis of 
the scientists' science, that is, on the basis of two unfounded propositions: positivism and 
evolution which are put forward as indubitable truths. 

And the reigning science, with not less misleading solemnity than the Church, announces 
that the solution of all questions of life is only possible by the study of the facts of nature, 
and especially of organisms. 

A frivolous crowd of youths mastered by the novelty of this authority, which is as yet not 
merely not destroyed but not even touched by criticism, throws itself into the study of 
these facts of natural science as the sole path which, according to the assertions of the 
prevailing doctrine, can lead to the elucidation of the questions of life. 

But the further these disciples advance in this study the further and further are they 
removed not only from the possibility but even from the very thought of solving life's 
problems, and the more they become accustomed not so much to observe as to take on 
trust what they are told of the observations of others (to believe in cells, in protoplasm, in 
the fourth state of matter , 1 &c.), the more and more does the form hide the contents from 
them; the more and more do they lose consciousness of good and evil and capacity to 
understand the expressions and definitions of good and evil worked out by the whole 
preceding life of humanity; the more and more do they adopt the specialized scientific 
jargon of conventional expressions which have no general human significance; the farther 
and farther do they wander among the debris of quite unilluminated observations; the 
more and more do they lose capacity not only to think independently but even to under- 
stand another man's fresh human thought lying outside their Talmud; and, what is most 
important, they pass their best years in growing unaccustomed to life, that is, to labour, 
and grow accustomed to consider their condition justified, while they become physically 
good-for-nothing parasites. And just like the theologians and the Talmudists they 
completely castrate their brains and become eunuchs of thought. And just like them, to 
the degree to which they become stupefied, they acquire a self-confidence which deprives 
them for ever of the possibility of returning to a simple clear and human way of thinking. 


1 A reference to Sir Wm. Crookes' theory of the 'fourth state of matter', a novelty at the time Tolstoy wrote 
this work.-A.M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


126 


What Then Must We Do? 


CHAPTER XXXII 

DIVISION of labour has always existed in human society, and probably always will; but 
the question for us is not whether it exists and will exist, but what we must be guided by 
to see that the division shall be a fair one. If we take observation for our standard we 
thereby renounce all standards, and any division of labour we see existing that seems to 
us suitable, we shall accept as right, and this is what the reigning science leads us to. 

Division of labour! Some are occupied with mental and spiritual, others with muscular 
physical work. With what assurance people say that! They wish to believe so, and it 
seems to them that in fact a perfectly correct exchange of services occurs, whereas what 
exists is really only a simple and very old form of coercion. 

'Thou, or rather you' (for it always takes many to feed one), 'feed me, clothe me, and do 
all that rough work for me which I demand and to your performance of which I have been 
accustomed from childhood, and I will do for you the mental work of which I am capable 
and to which I am accustomed. You give me bodily food and I will give you spiritual 
food.' (The account seems quite correct, and would be correct if this exchange of services 
were voluntary; if those who supply the bodily food were not obliged to furnish it before 
they receive the spiritual food.) 

The producer of spiritual food says: 'In order that I may give you spiritual food, feed me, 
clothe me, and clean up all the dirt I make.' But the producer of bodily food has to do all 
this without presenting any demands, and must deliver the bodily food even if he does not 
receive any spiritual food. If the exchange were voluntary the conditions of the two 
would be alike. 

We agree that spiritual food is as necessary for man as bodily food. The savant and the 
artist say: 'Before we can begin to serve men with spiritual food we require them to 
supply us with bodily food.' But why does not the producer of bodily food say that before 
he serves them with bodily food he needs spiritual food, and unless he receives it he 
cannot work? 

You say: 'I need the work of a ploughman, blacksmith, boot maker, carpenter, bricklayer, 
privy-cleaner, and others, in order that I may prepare my spiritual food.' Every labourer 
ought equally to say: 'Before I go to work to prepare bodily food for you, I must first 
have the fruits of your spiritual work. To have strength for my work I need religious 
teaching, good order in social life, applications of science to my work, and the 
enjoyments and consolations afforded by art. I have not time to work out my own 
explanation of the meaning of life-furnish me with it. I have not time to devise 
regulations for social life which would prevent infringements of justice - furnish me with 
them. I have not time to busy myself with mechanics, physics, chemistry, and technology 
- give me books which show how to improve my tools, my methods of work, my 
dwelling, my heating, and my lighting. I have not time to busy myself with poetry, plastic 
art, and music - furnish me with the stimulations and consolations that life requires; 
supply me with the products of art. You say you cannot occupy yourself with your 
important and necessary affairs if you are deprived of the work done for you by the 
labouring people, but I say,' the labourer remarks, 'that I cannot occupy myself with my 
not less important and necessary labours - ploughing, carting manure, and cleaning up 
your dirt - if I am deprived of religious guidance adapted to the demands of my reason 



What Then Must We Do? 


127 


Leo Tolstoy 


and conscience, of wise government to make my labour secure, of indications supplied by 
knowledge to facilitate my work, and of the joys of art to ennoble my toil. All that you 
have as yet offered me as spiritual food does not suit me, I cannot even understand what 
good it can be to anyone. And till I receive food suitable for me, as for every man, I 
cannot feed you with the bodily food that I produce.' What will happen if the labourer 
says that? 

If he should, you know it will not be a joke but the simplest justice. 

If a labourer should say that, justice will be far more on his side than on that of the mental 
worker. Justice will be more on his side because the work supplied by the labourer is 
more important, more indispensable, than the work of the mental worker, and because 
nothing prevents the mental worker from giving the labourer the spiritual food promised 
him; while the labourer is hindered from supplying bodily food by the fact that he himself 
has not enough of it. 

What shall we, mental workers, reply if such simple and legitimate demands are 
presented to us? How shall we satisfy them? With Filaret's Catechism , Sokolov's Sacred 
Stories, and with leaflets issued by various monasteries and from St. Isaac's Cathedral - to 
satisfy his religious needs; with the Code of Laws, decisions of the various Departments 
of the Court of Appeal and the statutes of various Committees and Commissions - to 
satisfy his demands for social justice; with spectral analysis, measurements of the Milky 
Way, abstract geometry, microscopic investigations, disputes about spiritualism and 
mediumism, the proceedings of the Academy of Science - to satisfy his demands for 
knowledge? With what shall we satisfy his artistic demands? With Pushkin, Dostoevski, 
Turgenev, L. Tolstoy, with pictures from the French Salon and by our own artists, 
representing naked women, satin, velvet, landscapes, and genre pictures, with Wagner's 
music and that of our own composers? None of these things suits him or can suit him, for 
we with our right to make use of the labour of the people and the absence of any 
obligation as to our production of spiritual food have entirely lost sight of the one 
purpose our activity should have. We do not even know what the working-folk need, we 
have forgotten their manner of life, their view of things, and their way of speaking; we 
have even forgotten the labouring man himself, and study, him as an ethnographic rarity 
or as a newly discovered America. 

So we demanding bodily food for ourselves, have undertaken to supply spiritual food, but 
as a result of an imaginary division of labour allowing us not only to dine first and then 
work, but allowing whole generations to eat well without producing anything-we have 
prepared as payment to the people for our sustenance something that is only suitable, or it 
appears to us suitable, for science and art - but unsuitable and (like Limburg cheese) quite 
incomprehensible and repulsive to the very people whose labour we have devoured on 
the pretext that we would supply them with spiritual food. 

We in our blindness have to such an extent lost sight of the obligation we had taken upon 
ourselves, that we have even forgotten the purpose for which our work is done and have 
made the very people we had undertaken to serve a subject for our scientific and artistic 
activity. 

We study and depict them for our own amusement and distraction, and have quite 
forgotten that we should not study and depict them - but should serve them. 



Leo Tolstoy 


128 


What Then Must We Do? 


To such an extent have we lost sight of the obligation we took upon ourselves, that we do 
not even notice that what we had undertaken to do in the sphere of science and art has 
been done not by us but by others, and that our place has been occupied. It turns out that 
while we were disputing - as the theologians disputed about the Immaculate Conception - 
now about the spontaneous generation of organisms, now about spiritualism, now about 
the form of atoms, now about pangenesis, and now about what there is in protoplasm, and 
so on - the people all the same required spiritual food, and men who were the failures and 
outcasts of science and art began, at the order of business men anxious solely for profit, 
to supply the masses with spiritual food, and have supplied it. For some forty years else- 
where in Europe, and for some ten years past in Russia, millions of books and pictures 
and song-books have been circulated, and shows have been opened, and the people look 
on, and sing, and receive their spiritual food, but not from us who had undertaken to 
supply it - while we who justify our idleness by the spiritual food we are supposed to 
supply, sit and gape. But we must not gape, for our last justification is slipping from 
under our feet. 

We have specialized. We have our special functional activity. We are the brain of the 
people. They feed us, and we have undertaken to instruct them. Only on that account 
have we emancipated ourselves from labour. What have we taught the labourers and what 
are we teaching them? They have waited one year, ten years, hundreds of years. And still 
we discuss and teach and entertain one another, but have forgotten them. To such an 
extent have we forgotten them that others have started to teach and entertain them and we 
did not even notice it, so little was our talk of the division of labour serious, and so evi- 
dent is it that what we say of the benefit we confer on the masses is merely a shameless 
pretence. 


CHAPTER XXXIII 

THERE was a time when the Church guided the spiritual life of the people of our world; 
the Church promised people welfare and on that score excused itself from participation in 
humanity's struggle for life. And as soon as it did that it went astray from its vocation and 
the people turned away from it. It was not the errors of the Church that ruined it but the 
abandonment of the law of labour by its servants, secured by the aid of the government in 
the time of Constantine; their privilege of idleness and luxury begot the errors of the 
Church. With that privilege began the Church's care for the Church and not for the people 
whom it had undertaken to serve. And the servants of the Church abandoned themselves 
to idleness and depravity. 

The State undertook to guide the lives of men. The State promised men justice, 
tranquility, security, order, the satisfaction of their general spiritual and material needs, 
and on this account the men who served the State emancipated themselves from 
participation in humanity's struggle for life. And the servants of the State, as soon as ever 
it was possible for them to exploit the labour of others, did what the servants of the 
Church had done. Their aim became not the people but the State, and the servants of the 
State - from kings down to the lowest officials and employees - in Rome, France, 
England, Russia, and America, abandoned themselves to idleness and depravity. 



What Then Must We Do? 


129 


Leo Tolstoy 


And people ceased to believe in the State, and anarchy is already consciously presented 
as an ideal. 

The State lost its fascination for people only because its servants considered that they had 
a right to exploit the people's labour. 

The same thing has been done by science and art with the help of the State authorities 
whom they have undertaken to support. They too stipulated for the right to idleness and 
to the use of other people's labour, and have similarly been false to their vocation. 

And they too ran into error only because the servants of science, having adopted the 
wrongly understood principle of division of labour, allowed themselves the right to 
appropriate other people's labour and lost the meaning of their own vocation, taking for 
their aim not the benefit of the people but the mystic benefit of science and art; like their 
predecessors they yielded to idleness and depravity, not so much sensuous as intellectual. 

It is said that science and art have given much to humanity. That is perfectly true. 

The Church and the State gave much to humanity, not because they misused their power 
and their servants neglected the eternal obligation of man to labour for his livelihood - 
which applies to all men - but in spite of it. 

So also science and art have given much to humanity, not because the scientists and 
artists on the plea of a division of labour live on the back of the working class but despite 
that fact. The Roman republic was strong not because its citizens were able to lead 
depraved lives, but because there were among them some worthy citizens. And it is the 
same with science and art. 

Science and art have given much to humanity not because their servants sometimes 
formerly had, and now always have, opportunity to emancipate themselves from labour, 
but because there were men of genius who, not availing themselves of that opportunity, 
moved humanity forward. 

The class of the learned and of artists who on the ground of a false division of labour 
demand the right to exploit the labour of others cannot contribute to the success of true 
science and true art, for falsehood cannot produce truth. 

We are so accustomed to our pampered, fat, or enfeebled representatives of mental work, 
that it seems to us barbarous that a learned man or an artist should plough or cart manure. 
It seems to us as if all his wisdom would perish or be shaken to pieces on the cart, and the 
manure would soil the grand artistic images he carries in his breast; but we are so 
accustomed to it that it does not seem strange when a servant of science, that is a servant 
and teacher of truth, compelling others to do for him what he could do for himself, spends 
half his time in eating tasty food, in smoking, gossip, or liberal tittle-tattle, reading the 
papers and novels, and visiting the theatres. It does not surprise us to see our philosopher 
at a restaurant, a theatre, or a ball; nor does it seem strange to us to learn that those artists 
who delight and ennoble our souls spend their lives in drunkenness, card playing, or with 
wenches-if not doing something worse... 

Science and art are beautiful things, but just because they are beautiful they should not be 
spoilt by joining depravity to them, that is, by freeing oneself from a man's obligation to 
support his own and other people's lives by labour. 



Leo Tolstoy 


130 


What Then Must We Do? 


Science and art have advanced humanity, yes! but not because the men of science and art, 
on the plea of a division of labour, by word and above all by deed have taught people to 
avail themselves of violence, and of the poverty and suffering of others, to free 
themselves from the first and most unquestionable human obligation of working with 
their own hands in the struggle with nature that is common to all humanity. 


CHAPTER XXXIV 

'BUT it is only the division of labour, and the emancipation of the men of science and art 
from the necessity of producing their own food, that has made possible the extraordinary 
progress of science that we see in our time,' is what people, say to this. 

'If everyone had to plough, those enormous results could not have been attained that have 
been attained in our time; there would not have been the striking progress which has so 
increased man's power over nature, nor those astronomical discoveries which have so 
impressed man's mind and made navigation safer, nor those steamers, railroads, 
marvellous bridges, tunnels, steam engines, telegraphs, photographs, telephones, sewing- 
machines, phonographs, electricity, telescopes, spectroscopes, microscopes, chloroform, 
antiseptics, and carbolic acid.' 

I cannot enumerate all the things our age so prides itself on. That enumeration, and the 
raptures over ourselves and over our achievements, can be found in almost any 
newspaper or popular book. Those raptures over ourselves are so often repeated, we are 
so overjoyed at ourselves, that we are seriously convinced, with Jules Verne, that science 
and art never made such progress as in our time. 

And we owe all this wonderful success to the division of labour, so how can we fail to 
acknowledge it? 

Let us grant that the successes achieved in our age are really striking, wonderful, and 
extraordinary. Let us admit that we are such peculiarly fortunate people as to live in such 
an extraordinary time. But let us try to value these successes not by our self-satisfaction 
but by that same principle of division of labour in defence of which they are quoted: that 
is by the mental work of the men of science for the benefit of the people, which is to pay 
for the scientists' and artists' emancipation from labour. All these successes are very 
wonderful, but by some unfortunate accident admitted by scientists themselves - up to 
now these successes have not improved the condition of the labourer but rather have 
made it worse. 

If a workman instead of walking can go by train, on the other hand the railroad has 
consumed his forest, carried away the grain from under his nose, and brought him to a 
condition not far removed from slavery to those who own the railroad. 

If, thanks to the steam-engines and machines, the labourer can buy wretched cotton 
prints, those steam-engines and machines have deprived him on the other hand of 
earnings at home, and have reduced him to a condition of complete slavery to the 
manufacturer. 

If there are telegraph stations which he is not forbidden to use but which his means do not 
allow him to use, on the other hand his produce, as soon as the price is rising, thanks to 



What Then Must We Do? 


131 


Leo Tolstoy 


the telegraph system gets bought up from under his nose by capitalists before the labourer 
hears of the demand there is for it. 

If there are telephones and telescopes, verses, novels, theatres, ballets, symphonies, 
operas, picture galleries, and so forth, the workman's life is not improved by all this, for 
by the same unfortunate accident it is beyond his reach. So that in general up to now-as 
men of science admit-all these extraordinary inventions and productions of art, if they 
have not injured have quite failed to improve the labourer's life. 

So that if the question of the reality of the successes achieved by science and art is 
measured not by our raptures over ourselves, but by the same standard by which the 
division of labour is defended - namely that of advantage to the labouring people, we 
shall see that we have as yet no firm basis for the self-satisfaction to which we so 
willingly yield. 

A peasant goes by rail, his wife buys cotton prints, they have a lamp in their hut instead 
of a wooden torch, and the man lights his pipe with a match-that is convenient; but what 
right have I to say that the railroad and factories have benefited the people? 

If the peasant travels on the railroad and buys a lamp, cotton prints, and matches, this is 
only because it is impossible to forbid him to do so, but we all know that the railroads 
and the factories were not built for the benefit of the labouring people, so why bring 
forward accidental conveniences, of which the peasants chance to be able to avail 
themselves, as proofs of the utility of those institutions to the people? 

For we all know that if the technicians and capitalists who built the railroads and the 
factories thought about the workers, it was only of how to squeeze the last bit of work out 
of them. And as we have seen, both among ourselves and in Europe and America, they 
have fully succeeded in doing this. 

In all harmful things there is some good. After a conflagration we can warm ourselves 
and light our pipes with the glowing charcoal; but why say that the conflagration is 
useful? 

Let us at least not deceive ourselves. We all know the motives which prompt the building 
of railroads and factories and the production of kerosene and matches. 

The engineer builds the railroad either for the government for military purposes or for 
capitalists for financial purposes. He makes machinery for the factory-owner for his own 
profit and for that of the capitalist. All that he makes and devises he makes and devises 
for the purposes of the government or of the capitalist and the rich people. The most 
cunning of his inventions are directly aimed either at injuring the people - as with cannon, 
torpedoes, solitary confinement cells, apparatus for the spirit - monopoly, telegraphs, and 
so forth, or for producing things that not only are not useful but are quite beyond the 
reach of the people, such as electric light, telephones, and all the innumerable appliances 
for the increase of comfort - or, finally, for things by which people can be corrupted and 
induced to part with the last of their money - that is, their last labour-such as, first of all 
vodka, spirits, beer, opium, and tobacco, then cotton prints, kerchiefs, and all sorts of 
trifles. 

If it happens that the inventions of men of science and the work of engineers sometimes 
is of use to the people, as with railroads, cotton prints, iron pots, and scythes, that only 



Leo Tolstoy 


132 


What Then Must We Do? 


proves that everything in the world is connected, and from any harmful activity some 
chance advantage may accrue even to those for whom the activity is generally harmful. 

The scientists and artists could only say that their activity was useful to the people if they 
made it their aim to serve the labourers as they now make it their aim to serve the 
governments and the capitalists. 

We could say it if scientists and artists set themselves the aim of serving the people's 
needs, but there are none who do so. 

All the learned people are absorbed with their priestly occupations, from which result the 
investigations of protoplasm, spectral analyses of the stars, and so forth. But with what 
kind of axe and what kind of axe-handle it is best to chop, what sort of saw works best, 
how best to knead bread, what flour to use, how to set it, how to make a fire, and how to 
build the stove, what food, what drink, and what dishes, to use, which mushrooms should 
be eaten and how best to prepare them - about these things science never reflects. Yet it is 
all matter for science to deal with. 

I know that by its definition science should be useless, but that is an obvious and too 
impudent excuse. The business of science is to serve men. We have invented telegraphs, 
telephones, and phonographs; but in real life, in the people's work, what progress have we 
made? We have enumerated two million insects! But have we domesticated a single new 
animal since Biblical times when the animals we now have, had already long been 
domesticated? The elk, the stag, the partridge, the quail, and the grouse, are all still wild. 
Our botanists have discovered the cell, and in the cell protoplasm, and in protoplasm 
something else, and in that again something else. These occupations will evidently not 
end for a long time -because there can be no end to them; and so they have no time to 
occupy themselves with what people need. And then again, since Egyptian and Jewish 
antiquity, when wheat and lentil were already cultivated, down to our own time, not a 
single plant has been added to the food of the people except potatoes, and it was not 
science that gave us them. 

They have invented torpedoes, appliances for the use of the spirit - monopoly, and for 
privies, but our spinning-wheel, peasant-woman's loom, village plough, hatchet, flail, 
rake, and the yoke and bucket, are still the same that they were in the times of Rurik, 1 2 or 
if they have been altered it has not been done by scientists. 

The same is true in regard to art. We have raised a multitude of men to the rank of great 
writers, have analysed them minutely, and written mountains of criticisms, and criticisms 
of those criticisms, and criticisms of the criticisms of the criticisms, and have collected 
galleries of pictures, and have studied all the schools of art acutely, and we have such 
symphonies and operas that it becomes hard for us ourselves to listen to them. But what 
have we added to the folk-tales and legends and stories and songs? What pictures have 
we given to the people and what music? In Nikolski-strcct” books and pictures for the 
people are produced, and in Tula concertinas are made, but in neither have we taken any 
part. 


1 The first Russian Prince (830 to 879 A.D.).-A. M. 

2 A street in the centre of Moscow, where cheap chapbooks for the peasants were sold. -A. M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


133 


Leo Tolstoy 


Most striking and obvious is the false direction of our science and art in the very branches 
which, one would think, should by their very purpose be of use to the people, but which 
in consequence of the false direction appear harmful rather than useful. 

The engineer, doctor, teacher, artist, author, by the very purpose of their calling, one 
would imagine, should serve the people-and what happens? Under the present tendency 
they can bring nothing but harm to the people. 

An engineer, a mechanic, must work with capital. Without capital he is useless. All his 
knowledge is such that, to apply it, he needs capital and the exploitation of labour on a 
large scale, and not to mention that he is himself accustomed to spend at least fifteen 
hundred to two thousand rubles a year, and therefore cannot live in a village, where no 
one could give him such a remuneration, his occupation itself prevents his serving the 
people. He can by higher mathematics reckon the span of a bridge, calculate the power 
and efficiency of a motor, and so forth, but faced by the simple problems of peasant-toil 
he sticks fast. How to improve the village plough or cart, how to make the streams 
fordable - of all this, in the conditions in which the peasants live, he knows and under- 
stands less than the meanest peasant. Give him workshops, all the various kinds of people 
he needs, import machines for him from abroad, and then he will arrange matters. But in 
the existing conditions of labour of millions of people, he is quite unable to find ways of 
lightening their toil, and his own occupations, habits, and needs, render him unsuited for 
such an affair. 

The doctor is in a still worse position. His pseudo-science is all so arranged that he can 
only cure those who do nothing and can command the labour of others. He needs an 
endless number of expensive appliances, instruments, medicaments, and hygienically 
arranged rooms, food, and water-closets, to enable him to act scientifically; besides his 
own salary he needs such expenses that to cure one patient he has to starve hundreds of 
others who bear those expenses. He has studied in the capitals under celebrities who only 
take patients who can be treated in hospitals, or who while being treated can purchase the 
apparatus needed for the treatment, and can even travel immediately from the north to the 
south, or to such and such watering-places. 

Their science is of such a kind that every Zemstvo - 1 doctor, complains of not having the 
means to treat the labourers - that they are so poor that it is impossible to place the 
patients in hygienic conditions; and at the same time that doctor complains that there are 
no hospitals, that he cannot manage all the work, and that he needs more assistants, 
doctors, and trained helpers. What does this mean? It means that the chief calamity of the 
people, causing illnesses to arise and spread and remain untreated, is the insufficiency of 
their means of livelihood. 

And science, under the banner of a division of labour, calls its combatants to help these 
people. Science has adapted itself entirely to the wealthy classes and accordingly has set 
itself to heal those who can afford everything, and it prescribes the same methods for 
those who have nothing to spare. 


1 The Zemstvos resembled our County Councils, and had charge of the medical service in country districts. - 
A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


134 


What Then Must We Do? 


But the means are lacking, and therefore they must be taken from the peasants who fall ill 
and become infected and are not cured from lack of means. 

The defenders of medicine for the people are always saying that, as yet, this business is 
but little developed. 

Evidently it is little developed, for if - which God forbid - it should be developed, and on 
the people's backs instead of two doctors, midwives and trained female assistants to a 
District, there were twenty such - as is proposed - there would soon be no one left to heal. 
Scientific assistance for the people, of which the defenders of science talk, should be of 
quite a different kind. And the kind of assistance that should be given has not yet been 
begun. It will begin when the man of science, the technician, or the doctor, will not 
consider permissible the division - which is to say, the seizure - of the labour of other 
people which now exists; will not consider himself to have a right to take from people, I 
will not say hundreds of thousands, but even a modest one thousand or five hundred 
rubles for the aid he renders them, but will live among the labouring people under the 
same conditions as they do and as they do, and will then apply his knowledge to the 
labouring people's problems of mechanics, engineering, hygiene, and medicine. But now 
science, fed by the labour of the working folk, has completely forgotten the conditions of 
those people's lives, ignores those conditions, and is seriously offended because its 
pseudo-knowledge finds no application among them. 

The sphere of medicine, like that of engineering, lies as yet untouched. All the questions 
of how best to divide the work time, how best to nourish oneself, on what and in what 
form, when and how it is best to clothe oneself, to cover one's feet, to resist dampness 
and cold, how best to wash and feed the children, swaddle them, and so forth, in the 
actual circumstances in which the working people live-all these questions have not yet 
been put. So it is, too, with the scientific, pedagogic, teachers' activity. Science has, in 
just the same way, so managed that, in accord with pedagogic science, only rich people 
can be taught, and the teachers, like the engineers and doctors, involuntarily pay court to 
money and among us especially to the government 

And this cannot be otherwise, for a school with model arrangements (as a general rule the 
more scientifically arranged a school the more expensive it is), with adjustable benches, 
globes and maps, and libraries, and methodics for teachers and for pupils, is such as 
would involve the doubling of the rates in each village. Such is the demand of science. 

The people need their children for work, and the poorer the people the more they need 
them. The defenders of science say: pedagogy even now benefits the people, but when it 
is developed things will be still better. But if it develops and instead of twenty schools to 
a district there are a hundred and all of them scientific, and the people have to pay for 
those schools, they will be more and more impoverished and will be yet more in need of 
their children's work. 

What, then, is to be done? say people in reply to this. 

The government will establish schools and make education compulsory as is done in 
Europe; but the money will again be taken from the people, who will be worked yet 
harder and will have yet less leisure, and compulsory education will not act. Again the 



What Then Must We Do? 


135 


Leo Tolstoy 


only salvation is for the teacher to live the life of a labourer and teach for such remu- 
neration as may be freely and willingly given him. 

Such is the false tendency of science, which deprives it of the possibility of fulfilling its 
duty, which is to serve the people. But this false tendency of our intellectuals is yet more 
evident in the activity of art, which by its very nature should be accessible to the people. 

Science may fall back on its stupid excuse that science works for science, and that when 
it has been developed by the scientists it will become accessible to the people also; but 
art, if it be art, should be accessible to all, and particularly to those for whom it is 
produced. And the position of our art strikingly arraigns the producers of art for not 
wishing, not knowing how, and being unable, to serve the people. 

For the preparation of his great works, an artist who is a painter must have a studio in 
which an association of at least forty carpenters or boot makers could work who now 
freeze or stifle in a slum. Nor is that enough; he needs nature, costumes, travel. The 
Academy of Arts has expended millions of rubles, collected from the people, on the 
encouragement of art, and the productions of this art are to be found in palaces and are 
not understood or wanted by the masses. 

To express their great ideas musicians have to collect some two hundred men in white 
neckties or in costumes, and to expend hundreds of thousands of rubles on producing an 
opera. And the productions of this art could produce nothing but perplexity and weariness 
among the people, were they ever able to hear them. 

Authors and writers of stories, one would think, do not need special surroundings, 
studios, nature, orchestras, and actors; but here, too, it appears that for the preparation of 
his great works a writer besides comfortable lodgings and all the pleasures of life, needs 
travel, palaces, studies, the pleasures of art, and visits to theatres, concerts, watering 
places, &c. If he does not himself earn money he is given a pension to enable him to 
write better. And again these writings, so much esteemed by us, remain rubbish for the 
people, who do not want them at all. 

What if, as the men engaged on science and art desire, yet more of these producers of 
spiritual food are reared and it becomes necessary in each village to build a studio and 
introduce an orchestra and maintain an author in such conditions as artists consider 
essential? 

I imagine that the working people would sooner pledge themselves never to see a picture, 
or hear a symphony, or read any poem or story, than be obliged to feed all those drones. 

But why, one would ask, should artists not serve the people? In every hut there are icons 
and pictures; every peasant and every peasant woman sings; many of them have musical 
instruments, and they all tell stories and recite verses, while many of them read. How is it 
that these two things-made for one another like lock and key - have gone so far apart that 
there seems no possibility of bringing them together? 

Tell a painter that without studios, nude models, and costumes, he should paint penny 
pictures, and he will tell you that this would be to abandon art as he understands it: tell a 
musician that he should play on a balalayka, a concertina, or a guitar, and should teach 
the peasant women to sing songs: tell a poet or an author that he should abandon his 
poems, his novels, his satires, and should compose songs, books, stories and fairy tales, 



Leo Tolstoy 


136 


What Then Must We Do? 


which unlettered folk could understand - and they will tell you that you are mad. But is it 
not a worse madness that people who have emancipated themselves from labour on the 
plea that they would provide spiritual food for those who have reared them and who feed 
and clothe them, should afterwards have so forgotten this obligation that they do not 
know how to prepare food fit for the people, and should consider this abandonment of 
their duty a merit? 

'But it is so everywhere,' is what is said in reply. It is very irrational everywhere; and it 
will remain irrational as long as people, under the pretext of a division of labour and a 
promise to serve the people with spiritual food, continue merely to devour the people's 
labour. Service of the people by sciences and arts will only exist when men live with the 
people and as the people live, and without presenting any claims will offer their scientific 
and artistic services, which the people will be free to accept or decline as they please. 


CHAPTER XXXV 

To say that the activity of science and art helps humanity's progress, if by that activity we 
mean the activity which now calls itself by those names, is as though one said that the 
clumsy, obstructive splashing of oars in a boat moving down stream assists the boat's 
progress. It only hinders it. 

The so-called division of labour, that is, the seizure of the labour of others which in our 
time has become a usual condition of the activity of men of science and art, has been and 
still remains the chief cause of the slowness of humanity's forward movement. The proof 
of this is seen in the confession made by men of science that the achievements of the arts 
and sciences are inaccessible to the labouring masses on account of the unequal 
distribution of wealth. 

And the unfairness of this distribution is not diminished in proportion to the successes 
achieved by the sciences and arts, but is only increased. Nor is it surprising that this is so, 
for this unjust distribution of wealth results simply from the theory of the division of 
labour which is preached by the men of science and art for their personal selfish ends. 
Science defends the division of labour as an immutable law, sees that the division of 
wealth based on the division of labour is unjust and pernicious, and asserts that its 
activity, which accepts the division of labour, will result in benefit to mankind. It appears 
that some men make use of the labours of others, but that if they go on for a very long 
time and to a still greater extent making use of the labour of others, then this un-just 
distribution of wealth - that is, this exploitation of other people's work - will come to an 
end. 

Men are standing at an ever-increasing spring of water and are busy diverting it from 
thirsty people, but assert that it is they who produce the water and that very soon so much 
of it will be collected that there will be enough for everybody. But this water, which has 
flowed and flows unceasingly and supplies drink to all humanity, is not only not the 
result of the activity of these men who standing round the spring turn the water aside but 
on the contrary, flows and spreads despite their efforts to prevent its flowing. 

There always was a true church, in the sense of people united in the highest truth 
accessible to man at any given period, and this has always been other than the church 



What Then Must We Do? 


137 


Leo Tolstoy 


which called itself so; and there have always been science and art, but they have not been 
the activities that called themselves by those names. 

To those who regard themselves as the representatives of the science and art of a 
particular period, it always seems as though they had done and were doing, and above all 
were Just about to do wonderful miracles; and that apart from them no real science or art 
has existed or does exist. So it seemed to the Sophists, the Schoolmen, the Alchemists, 
the Cabalists, the Talmudists, and so it seems to our scientific scientists and art-for-art's 
sakists. 


CHAPTER XXXVI 

'BUT science and art! You are denying science and art: that is you are denying that by 
which humanity lives.' People constantly make this rejoinder to me, and they employ: this 
method in order to reject my arguments without examination. 

'He rejects science and art, he wishes man to revert to a state of savagery - why listen to 
him or discuss with him?' 

But this is unjust. Not only do I not repudiate science, that is, the reasonable activity of 
humanity, and art - the expression of that reasonable activity - but it is just on behalf of 
that reasonable activity and its expression that I speak, only that It may be possible for 
mankind to escape from the savage state into which it is rapidly lapsing thanks to the 
false teaching of our time. It is only on that account that I speak as I do. 

Science and art are as necessary to man as food and drink and clothing - even more 
necessary but they become so not because we decide that what we cal science and art are 
essential, but only because Science and art really are essential to humanity. 

If people prepared hay for man's bodily food, no conviction of mine that hay is human 
food would cause it to become so. I must not say: 'Why do you not eat hay when it is 
your necessary food?' Food is necessary, but perhaps what I am offering is not food. 

And this is just what has happened with our Science and art. It seems to us that if we add 
the termination logy to some Greek word and call it a science, it will be a science; and if 
some nastiness, such as the dancing of naked women, is called by a Greek word, and we 
say it is an art, it will be art. But however much we may say this, the things we occupy 
ourselves with - counting up the beetles, investigating the chemical constituents of the 
Milky Way, painting water-nymphs and historical pictures, or composing stories and 
symphonies - will not become either science or art till it is willingly accepted by those for 
whom it is being done. And up to the present it is not so accepted. 

If certain people had the exclusive right to produce food and all others were forbidden to 
do so, or it were made impossible for them to do so, I imagine that the quality of our food 
would deteriorate. If the people who had the monopoly of food production were Russian 
peasants, there would be no other food than rye-bread, kvas, potatoes, and onions-the 
food they are fond of, the food which pleases them. And this would happen to the highest 
human activity - science and art - if a single caste were to monopolize it, - but with this 
difference, that in bodily food there can be no great deviation from what is natural: both 
rye-bread and onion, though not very tasty foods are nevertheless wholesome; but in 



Leo Tolstoy 


138 


What Then Must We Do? 


mental food there may be very great deviations and some men may feed for a long time 
on mental food that is quite unnecessary for them, or is even harmful and poisonous. 
They may slowly kill themselves with opium and spirits and may offer this same food to 
the masses. 

That is what has happened among us. And it has happened because scientists and artists 
occupy a privileged position, and because science and art in our world are not the whole 
reasonable activity of the whole of mankind without exception, devoting its best strength 
to the service of science and art, but are the activity of a small circle of people having a 
monopoly of these occupations and calling themselves scientists and artists, and who, 
therefore, having perverted the very conception of science and art, have lost the very 
meaning of their calling and are merely occupied in amusing a small circle of idle 
consumers and saving them from the ennui that oppresses them. 

Since men first existed they have always had science in the plainest and widest sense of 
the word. Science, in the sense of all man's knowledge, always has existed and does exist 
and life is inconceivable without it: it calls neither for attack nor for defence. But the 
point is that the domain of knowledge is so various, so much information of all kinds is 
included in it-from the knowledge of how to obtain iron, to the knowledge of the 
movements of the celestial bodies - that man loses himself amid these various kinds of 
knowledge unless he has a clue to enable him to decide which of them all is most 
important for him, and which is less so. 

And therefore the highest aim of human wisdom has always been to find that clue, and to 
show the sequence in which our knowledge should rank: what of it is of the first and what 
is of lesser importance. 

And just this knowledge, that guides all other knowledge, is what men have always 
spoken of as science in the strict sense. And right down to our own times such science 
has always existed in human societies after they have emerged from the primeval, savage 
conditions. 

Since humanity existed always among all peoples teachers have appeared who have pro- 
duced science in that strict sense - the knowledge of what it is most necessary for man to 
know. 

That science has always dealt with the knowledge of what is the destiny, and therefore 
the true welfare, of each man and of mankind. And that science has served as the clue in 
determining the importance of all other knowledge, and of the activity which gives it 
expression, namely, art. 

Those kinds of knowledge which aided and came nearest to the fundamental science of 
the destiny and welfare of all men, stood highest in general esteem, and those least useful 
stood lowest. Such was the science of Confucius, Buddha, Moses, Socrates, Christ, 
Mohammed: such is science, and so it has been and is understood by everybody, except 
by our circle of so-called educated people. 

Such science has always not merely occupied the first place, but has alone determined the 
importance of all the other sciences. 

And this occurred not at all, as is supposed by the so-called learned men of to-day, 
because deceivers - the priests and teachers of that science gave it that importance, but 



What Then Must We Do? 


139 


Leo Tolstoy 


because indeed, as everyone can learn by his inner experience, without a science of man's 
destiny and welfare there can be no evaluation or choice of any science or art, and 
therefore there can be no study of science: for the subjects for science to deal with are in- 
numerable', I underline the word 'innumerable', because I use it in its literal meaning. 

Without knowledge of what constitutes the destiny and welfare of all men, all other 
science and art becomes, as they have become among us, an idle and pernicious 
amusement. Mankind has lived long, but never without a science to show wherein its 
destiny and welfare lie. It is true that the science of the welfare of man appears on super- 
ficial observation to differ among the Buddhists, Brahminists, Jews, Christians, 
Confucians, and the followers of Lao- Tsze (though it is only necessary to consider these 
teachings, to find one and the same essence), but wherever we know of men who have 
emerged from the state of savagery, we find this science, and now suddenly it seems that 
people to-day have decided that it is just this very science - which has hitherto guided all 
human knowledge - which hinders everything. 

People build an edifice, and one architect draws up one set of plans, another - another, 
and a third - a third. The plans vary somewhat, but are correct in that everyone sees that if 
all is carried out according to the plan the edifice will get built. 

Such architects were Confucius, Buddha, Moses, and Christ. 

Suddenly people come and assure us that the chief thing is not to have any plans at all, 
but to build anyhow, by the look of the thing. And this 'anyhow' these people call the 
most exact scientific science, as the Pope terms himself the 'Most Holy'. People deny 
every science, the very essence of science - the ascertaining of the destiny and welfare of 
man, and this denial of science they call 'science'. Since men first appeared, great intel- 
lects have arisen among them who in struggle with the demands of their reason and 
conscience have asked themselves what our destiny and welfare consist in-not mine only 
but every man's. 

What does that Power which produced and guides us demand of me and of every man? 
What must I do to satisfy the craving implanted in me for my personal welfare and that of 
the world in general? 

They have said to themselves: 'I am a whole, and I am a particle of something 
immeasurable and unending. What are my relations to other particles similar to myself-to 
individuals and to that whole?' 

And from the voice of conscience and reason, and from consideration of what has been 
said by predecessors and contemporaries who set themselves those same questions, these 
great teachers have deduced a doctrine - plain, clear, and intelligible to all men, and 
always such as could be practised. There have been such men of first-rate, second-rate, 
third-rate, and of quite minor greatness. The world is full of them. 

All living men put to themselves the question: How reconcile our desires for personal 
welfare with the general welfare of mankind demanded by conscience and reason? And 
from this general travail, new forms of life nearer to the demands of reason and 
conscience are slowly but unceasingly evolved. 

Suddenly a new caste of men appear who say: This is all rubbish, it must all be 
abandoned. This is the deductive method of thought (though what the difference is 



Leo Tolstoy 


140 


What Then Must We Do? 


between the deductive and the inductive methods, nobody has ever been able to 
understand), it is the method of the theological and metaphysical periods. All that men 
have discovered by inner experience, and communicate to one another, concerning 
consciousness of the law of their life (functional activity, in the new jargon), all that from 
the commencement of the world has been accomplished in that direction by the greatest 
intellects of mankind, is rubbish and of no importance. 

According to this new teaching it seems that you are a cell of an organism, and the aim of 
your reasonable activity is to ascertain your functional activity; and in order to do that 
you need only observe things outside yourself. That you are a cell that thinks, suffers, 
speaks, understands, and that you can therefore ask another similar speaking cell whether, 
like you, it suffers, rejoices, and feels, and so can verify your own experience; that you 
can avail yourself of what cells that lived, suffered, thought, and spoke, before you did 
have written about the matter; that millions of other cells confirm your observations by 
their agreement with those who have: recorded their thoughts; and above all, that you 
yourselves are living cells always by direct experience recognizing the justice or injustice 
of your functional activities - all this means nothing at all, it is all a bad, false method. 
The true scientific method is this: if you wish to know what your functional activity 
consists in, that is to say, what is your vocation and welfare and those of humanity and of 
the whole world, you must first of all cease to listen to the voice and demands of the 
conscience and reason that manifest themselves within you and in your fellow-men; you 
must cease to believe what the great teachers of mankind have said about their reason and 
conscience, and must consider all these to be trifles, and begin all over again. And to 
begin from the beginning you must look through a microscope at the movements of 
amoebas and at the cells of tapeworms, or easier still, must believe everything that may 
be told you about them by people who have the diploma of infallibility. And observing 
the movements of these amoebas and cells, or reading what others have seen, you must 
attribute to these cells your own human feelings and calculations as to what they desire, 
what they strive for, their reflections and calculations, and what they are accustomed to; 
and from these observations (in which every word is an error in thought or expression) 
you must by analogy decide what you are, what your vocation is, and wherein lies your 
own welfare and that of other cells similar to yourself. To understand yourself you must 
not only study tapeworms which you can see, but also microscopic beings you can hardly 
see, and the transformations from one being into another which no one has ever seen and 
which you will certainly never see. 

It is the same with art. Wherever there has been a true science, art has always been an 
expression of the knowledge of man's vocation and welfare. 

Since the time that men first existed, from amid the whole activity which presents various 
kinds of knowledge they have selected the principal kind, that which presented man's 
vocation and welfare, and the expression of the results of that knowledge has been art in 
the restricted sense of the word. Since men first existed there have been persons specially 
sensitive and responsive to the teaching of man's welfare and vocation, who on psaltery 
and cymbals, by imagery and by words, have expressed their human struggle against de- 
ceptions which drew them from their vocation, expressed their sufferings in this struggle, 
their hopes for the triumph of goodness, their despair at the triumph of evil, and their 
rapture at the expectation of approaching blessedness. 



What Then Must We Do? 


141 


Leo Tolstoy 


Since man existed, true art which was highly esteemed has had no other purpose than to 
express man's vocation and welfare. Always till recent times, art has served the teaching 
of life which was afterwards called 'religion' - and only such art has been held in high 
esteem. But simultaneously with the appearance, in place of a science of man's vocation 
and welfare, of the science of whatever comes to hand - since science has lost its meaning 
and purpose, and true science has come to be contemptuously called ’religion’ from that 
very time art as an important human activity has disappeared. 

As long as the church existed as a teaching of our vocation and welfare, art served the 
church and was true art, but since art left the church and began to serve science, while 
science served anything that came to hand, art has lost its importance and, in spite of its 
traditional claims and the absurd assertion that 'art serves art' (which only shows that it 
has lost its purpose), it has become a trade supplying people with what is agreeable, and 
has inevitably mingled with the choreographic, culinary, tonsorial, and cosmetic arts, 
whose producers call themselves artists with the same right as do the poets, painters, and 
musicians of our day. 

We look back and see that during thousands of years, out of milliards of people a few 
dozen stand out, such as Confucius, Buddha, Solon, Socrates, Solomon, Homer, Isaiah, 
and David. Evidently such men were seldom to be met with, though in those days they 
were drawn not from a single caste but from among the whole people; evidently such true 
scientific and artistic producers of spiritual food were rare. And it is not for nothing that 
humanity so highly esteemed and esteems them. But now it turns out that all these great 
moving spirits in science and art are no longer of any use to us. To-day producers of 
science and art can by the law of division of labour be produced on the factory system, 
and in a single decade we can turn out more great scientists and artists than had appeared 
among mankind from the commencement of the world. 

There is now a guild of scientists and artists, and by a perfect method they prepare all the 
spiritual food needed by mankind. 

And they have prepared so much of it that the old, the former, geniuses, both the ancients 
and those nearer to ourselves, need no longer be held in remembrance - that was all an 
activity of the theological and metaphysical period, it all has to be wiped out; but real 
reasonable activity began about fifty years ago. And in these fifty years we have 
produced so many great men that in a single German university there are now more of 
them than there had been in the whole world; and we have produced so many sciences - 
fortunately they are easy to produce (one has only to add logy to a Greek noun and 
classify it among the ready-made tables, and a science is ready) - that not only can no 
man know them all, but no one man can even remember the names of them all their 
names alone fill a stout dictionary and new Sciences are coming into existence everyday. 

They have made many that remind one of the story of the Finnish tutor who taught a 
landowner's children Finnish instead of French. They have taught it all beautifully; the 
only pity is that nobody, except themselves, understands any of it everyone else regards it 
as worthless rubbish. 

But of this too there is an explanation: people do not understand all the utility of scientific 
science because they are still under the influence of the theological period of knowledge - 



Leo Tolstoy 


142 


What Then Must We Do? 


that stupid period when the whole people, both among the Hebrews, the Chinese, the 
Hindus and the Greeks, understood all that their great teachers said to them. 

But however it happened, the fact is that both Science and art have always existed among 
men and when they were real they were wanted by and were comprehensible to the whole 
people. 

We are busy with something we call science and art, but it turns out that what we are 
doing as no right to be called either science or art. 


CHAPTER XXXVII 

'BUT you are merely giving another, narrower definition of science and art - which 
science does not agree with,’ people say to me in reply. 'But this does not exclude the 
rest, and there still remains the scientific and artistic activity of the Galileos, Brunos, 
Homers, Michael Angelos, Beethovens, Wagners, and all the scientists and artists of 
lesser magnitude who have devoted their whole lives to the service of science and art.' 
This they usually say in order to establish a succession (which at other times they 
disavow) between the former scientists and artists and the present ones, trying also to 
forget that special new principle of the division of labour on the basis of which science 
and art now occupy their privileged position. 

But first of all it is impossible to establish such a succession between the former workers 
and the present ones - as the holy life of the first Christians has nothing in common with 
the lives of the Popes, so the activity of men like Galileo, Shakespeare, and Beethoven 
has nothing in common with the activities of men like Tyndall, Victor Hugo, and 
Wagner. As the holy Fathers would have repudiated connexion with the Popes, so the 
former leaders in science would have repudiated connexion with those of to-day. 

And secondly, thanks to the importance science and art now attribute to themselves, we 
have a very clear standard set by science itself, by which to determine whether or not 
they fulfil their purpose, and so to decide not arbitrarily but according to an accepted 
standard, whether the activity calling itself science and art has a right to do so. 

When Egyptian and Grecian priests performed mysteries which were concealed from 
everybody, and said that these mysteries contained all science and all art-we could not on 
the score of benefits conferred by them on the people verify the validity of their science, 
for they alleged it to be super-natural; but now we all have a very clear and simple 
standard excluding everything supernatural: science and art undertake to perform the 
brain- work of humanity for the benefit of society or of mankind. And therefore we have a 
right to call only such activity 'science and art' as has that aim in view and attains it. 

And therefore, however those learned men and artists call themselves who excogitate the 
theory of penal, civil, and international law, who invent new guns and explosives, who 
compose obscene operas and operettas or similarly obscene novels, we have no right to 
call such activity science and art; for that activity has not the welfare of society or of 
mankind in view, but is on the contrary directed to the injury of man. All this therefore is 
not science or art. In the same way, however learned men may call themselves who in 
their simplicity devote their whole lives to the study of microscopic animalculae and of 
telescopic and spectral phenomena, or those artists who after a laborious study of the 



What Then Must We Do? 


143 


Leo Tolstoy 


memorials of antiquity are busy writing historical novels, painting pictures, or composing 
symphonies and beautiful verses all these men, despite their zeal, cannot, on the basis of 
the scientific definition itself, be called men of science and art: first, because their activity 
of science for science's sake and art for art's sake has not human welfare in view; and 
secondly, because we do not see the results of their activity in the welfare of society and 
of humanity. The fact that from their activity something pleasant and profitable for 
certain people sometimes results, by no means allows us, according to their own 
scientific definition, to consider them scientists and artists. 

Just in the same way, however people may call themselves who devise applications of 
electricity to lighting or heating or the transmission of power, or new chemical 
combinations yielding dynamite or fine colours, or play Beethoven's symphonies 
correctly, or perform in theatres and paint good portraits, genre paintings, landscapes or 
other pictures, or write interesting novels - the aim of which is merely to relieve the 
dullness of the wealthy classes-these people's activity cannot be called science and art, 
because it is not directed, like the brain- activity of an organism, to the welfare of the 
whole, but is guided merely by personal profit, privileges, and money, received for the 
inventions and productions of so-called art; and therefore this activity can in no way be 
separated from every other kind of interested personal activity adding to the pleasure of 
life, like the activity of restaurant-keepers, jockeys, milliners, prostitutes, and so forth; for 
the activity of the first, the second, and the third, of these does not come under the 
definition of science and art which promise on the basis of a division of labour to serve 
the welfare of mankind or of society. 

The definition of science and art given by science is quite correct, but unfortunately the 
activity of present-day science and art does not come under it. Some of its representatives 
are doing what is directly harmful, others what is useless, and again others what is 
insignificant and available only for rich people. 

They, are all perhaps very good people, but they do not do what by their own definition 
they have undertaken to do, and therefore they have as little right to consider themselves 
scientists and artists as the clergy of to-day, who do not fulfil the duties they have 
undertaken, have a right to claim to be the bearers and teachers of divine truth. 

And it is not difficult to understand why those who are active in science and art to-day do 
not fulfil, and cannot fulfil, their calling. They do not fulfil it because they have 
converted their duties into rights. 

Scientific and artistic activity in its real sense is only fruitful when it ignores rights and 
knows only duties. Only because it is always of that kind and its nature is to be self- 
sacrificing, does humanity value this activity so highly. 

Men who are really called to serve others by mental labour will always suffer in 
performing that service, for only by sufferings as by birth pangs, is the spiritual world 
brought to birth. 

Self-sacrifice and suffering will be the lot of a thinker and an artist because their aim is 
the welfare of man. People are unhappy, they suffer and perish. There is no time to wait 
and refresh oneself. 



Leo Tolstoy 


144 


What Then Must We Do? 


The thinker and artist will never sit on Olympian heights as we are apt to imagine; he will 
always be in a state of anxiety and agitation; he might discover and utter what would 
bring blessings to people, might save them from sufferings, but he has not discovered it 
and has not uttered it, and to-morrow it may be too late-he may have died. 

Not that man will be a thinker and artist who is educated in an institution where they 
profess to produce learned men and artists (but really produce destroyers of science and 
art) and who obtains a diploma and a competence, but he who would be glad not to think 
and not to express what is implanted in his soul, but cannot help doing what he is 
impelled to by two irresistible forces - an inner necessity and the demands of men. 

Plump self-satisfied thinkers and artists, enjoying themselves, do not exist. 

Mental activity and its expression, of a kind really needed by others, is the hardest and 
most painful calling for a man - his cross, as the Gospel expresses it. And the sole and 
indubitable indication of a man's vocation for it is self-denial, a sacrifice of himself for 
the manifestation of the power implanted in him for the benefit of others. 

One can teach how many insects there are in the world and examine the spots on the sun 
and write novels and operas, without suffering; but to teach men their welfare, which lies 
in denying oneself and serving others, and to express this teaching powerfully, is 
impossible without suffering. 

The church existed as long as its teachers endured and suffered, but as soon as they 
became fat their teaching activity ended. 

'There used to be golden priests and wooden chalices; but now the chalices are golden 
and priests wooden,' as the peasants say. 

There was reason for Christ to die on the cross: the sacrifice of suffering conquers all. 

Our science and art are provided for and diplomaed and people are only concerned how 
to provide for them still better, that is, make it impossible for them to serve mankind. 

True science and true art have two indubitable indications: the first internal-that a 
minister of science or art fulfils his calling not for gain but with self-sacrifice; and the 
second external - that his productions are intelligible to all men whose welfare he has in 
view. 

Whatever it may be that men regard as representing their vocation and welfare, science 
will teach that vocation and welfare, and art will express that teaching. The laws of Solon 
and Confucius are science; the teachings of Moses and of Christ are science; buildings in 
Athens, the psalms of David, the church service, are art; but studying the fourth 
dimension of matter and tabulating chemical compounds and so forth-never has been and 
never will be science. The place of real science is occupied in our time by theology and 
jurisprudence, and the place of real art is occupied by church and state ceremonies, in 
neither of which do people believe and which no one regards seriously; but what among 
us is called science and art is a production of idle thought and feeling which aims at 
tickling similarly idle minds and feelings, and it is unintelligible and inarticulate to the 
people because it has not their welfare in view. 

From the time we know anything of the life of man we everywhere and always find a 
dominant teaching falsely calling itself science, and not revealing to people, but 



What Then Must We Do? 


145 


Leo Tolstoy 


concealing from them, the meaning of life. So it was among the Egyptians, the Hindus, 
the Chinese, and to some extent among the Greeks (the sophists), and later among the 
mystics, gnostics, and cabalists, and in the Middle Ages among the schoolmen and 
alchemists, and so on, everywhere, down to our own day. 

What peculiar luck is ours that we live just at the particular time when the mental activity 
calling itself science not only does not err, but is (as we are constantly assured) 
extraordinarily successful! Does not this peculiarly good fortune result from the fact that 
man cannot and will not recognize his own deformity? How is it that of those other 
sciences, theological and cabalistic, nothing but words remain, while we are so peculiarly 
lucky? 

Notice that the indications are exactly the same: the same self-satisfaction and blind 
assurance that we, just we and only we, are on the real path and are the first to tread it: 
the self-same expectation that there - directly - we shall discover something 
extraordinary; and above all the same sign exposing us, namely, that all our wisdom 
remains with us while the mass of the people neither understand, nor accept, nor need it. 
Our position is a very sad one, but why not face it as it is? 

It is time to come to our senses and look around us. 

For we are indeed nothing but scribes and Pharisees who have seated ourselves in Moses' 
seat and taken the keys of the kingdom of heaven, neither entering in ourselves nor 
allowing others to enter. We priests of science and art are the most worthless frauds, with 
far less right to our position than the most cunning and depraved Church priests. For we 
have absolutely no right to our privileged position, we obtained it by guile and keep it by 
fraud. 

The pagan priests and the clergy of our own and of the Catholic Church, however 
depraved they may be, or have been, had this right to their position - that they at least 
proposed to teach life and salvation to the people. We have undermined them and proved 
that they deceived, and have taken their place, but we do not teach people how to live: we 
even admit that it is no use trying to leam this. Yet we suck the juice out of the people, 
and in return teach our children our Talmud of Greek and Fatin grammar, that they in 
their turn may continue to lead the same parasitic life as we do. 

We say, there used to be castes but we have none. But how is it that some people and 
their children work while other people and their children do not? Bring a Hindu who does 
not know our language and show him our life as it has gone on for generations, and he 
will recognize the same two chief, distinct castes of workers and non-workers as exist 
among his people. As with them so with us, the right not to work is given by a special 
initiation, which we call science and art and in general - education. 

It is this education, and the whole perversion of reason attached to it, that has brought us 
to the amazing state of insanity which causes us not to see what is so clear and 
indubitable. 

We consume the lives of our brother men, and continue to consider ourselves Christian, 
humane, educated, and perfectly justified. 



Leo Tolstoy 


146 


What Then Must We Do? 


CHAPTER XXXVIII 

'WHAT then must we do? What must we do?' 

This question - including an admission that our way of life is wrong and bad, together 
with a suggestion that all the same it is impossible to change it - this question I hear from 
all sides, and for that reason I chose it as the title of my work. 

I have described my sufferings, my search, and my solution of this question. I am a man 
like everybody else, or if I am at all different from an ordinary man of our circle it is 
chiefly that I have served and connived at the false teaching of our world more than he, 
have been more praised by the men of the dominant school and have therefore been 
perverted and gone astray more than others. 

And therefore I think the solution I have found for myself will be valid for all sincere 
men who set themselves the same question. First of all, to the question: What must we 
do? I replied to myself: I must not lie either to myself or to others, nor fear the truth 
wherever it may lead me. We all know what lying to other people means, and yet we lie 
unceasingly from morning to night: 'Not at home,' when I am at home; 'Very pleased,' 
when I am not at all pleased; 'My respects,' when I do not respect; 'I have no money,' 
when I have some, and so on. We consider lies to other people, especially certain kinds of 
lies, to be bad, but are not afraid of lying to ourselves; yet the very worst, most downright 
and deceptive lie to others, is as nothing in its consequences compared with that lie to 
ourselves on which we have built our whole life. 

That is the lie we must not be guilty of, in order to be able to answer the question: What 
must we do ? 

How can the question be answered when all I do, my whole life, is based on a lie and I 
carefully give out this lie as truth to others and to myself? Not to lie, in that sense, means 
not to fear the truth, not to invent excuses to hide from myself the conclusions of reason 
and conscience, and not to accept such excuses when they are invented by others: not to 
fear to differ from all those around me or to be left alone with reason and conscience, and 
not to fear the position to which truth will lead me, believing firmly that what truth and 
conscience will lead me to, however strange it may be, cannot be worse than what is 
based on falsehood. Not to lie in our position as privileged mental workers, means not to 
fear to make up one's accounts. Perhaps we already owe so much that we cannot meet our 
obligations, but however that may be it is better to face the facts than not to know how 
we stand. However far we may have gone along a false path, it is better to return than to 
continue to go along it. Falsehood to others is simply disadvantageous. Every affair is 
settled more directly and more quickly by truth than by falsehood. Falsehood to others 
only confuses the matter and hinders its solution, but falsehood to oneself presented as 
truth, entirely ruins man's life. 

If a man having started on a wrong road accepts it as the right one, every step he takes 
along that road takes him farther from his aim. If a man who has been going for a long 
time along a false road guesses, or is told, that that road is wrong, but being frightened at 
the thought that he has gone so far astray tries to assure himself that by following this 
road he may still come out on the right one, he will never reach the right road. If a man is 



What Then Must We Do? 


147 


Leo Tolstoy 


frightened of the truth, and on seeing it does not acknowledge it but accepts falsehood for 
truth, he will never know what he should do. 

We, not only rich men but men in a privileged position, so-called educated men, have 
gone so far along a false road that we need either great resolution, or the experience of 
great suffering on our false path, to enable us to come to ourselves and acknowledge the 
lie in which we are living. 

Thanks to the sufferings to which the false path led me, I saw the falsehood of our life, 
and having acknowledged it I had the courage (at first only in thought) to follow reason 
and conscience without considering what they would lead me to. And I was rewarded for 
that courage. All the complex, disjointed, confused, unmeaning phenomena of life around 
me became at once clear, and my position amid those phenomena, which had been a 
strange and burdensome one, suddenly became natural and easy. And in that new 
situation my activity determined itself quite exactly, and was nothing like what I had 
previously imagined it would be, but was a new activity much more tranquil, agreeable, 
and joyous. The very things that formerly frightened me now became attractive. 

And therefore I think that a man who sincerely sets himself the question, What to do ? and 
in answering it does not lie to himself but goes the way his reason leads him, will have 
already answered the question. If only he does not lie to himself he will find out what to 
do, where to go and how to act. The one thing which may hinder his finding the way is a 
false and too high estimate of himself and his position. So it was with me and therefore a 
second reply - which flows from the first - to the question: What to do? consisted for me 
in repenting, in the full significance of that word, that is, completely changing my 
estimate of my own position and activity. Instead of considering our position useful and 
important, we just acknowledge its harmfulness and triviality; instead of priding 
ourselves on our education we must .admit our ignorance; in place of pride in our 
kindness and morality we must acknowledge our immorality and cruelty, and instead of 
our importance admit our insignificance. 

I say that apart from not lying to myself I had also to repent, because, though the one 
flows from the other, a false impression of my high importance had so grown upon me 
that until I sincerely repented and put aside that false estimate of myself, I did not see the 
greater part of the lie I had told myself. Only when I repented, that is, ceased to consider 
myself a special kind of man and began to look on myself as a man like all others -only 
then did my path become plain to me. 

Before that, I could not answer the question: What to do? because I put the very question 
wrongly. Till I repented I put the question thus: What activity shall I - a man with the 
education I have acquired and the talents I possess - what activity shall I choose? 

How am I - by means of this education and these talents - to repay what I have taken and 
still take from the peasants? That question was incorrect because it contained in itself a 
false conception that I was not like other men but was a special kind of man called to 
serve people by the talents and education I had acquired by forty years' exercise. I put the 
question to myself, but in reality I had answered it in advance by fixing beforehand the 
kind of activity agreeable to myself by which I was called upon to serve men. I really 
asked myself: How am I, such an admirable writer, who have acquired so much 
knowledge and possess such talents, to utilize them in the service of mankind? The 



Leo Tolstoy 


148 


What Then Must We Do? 


question should have been put as it should be put to a learned Rabbi who has studied the 
whole Talmud and learned the number of letters in all the sacred books and all the 
subtleties of his science. The question, both for the Rabbi and for me, should have been 
this: What am I, who owing to my unfortunate position, during the best years for study 
have been learning the French language, the piano, grammar, geography, the science of 
jurisprudence, verses, stories and novels, philosophic theories, and military exercises, 
instead of learning to labour, what am I, who have passed the best years of my life in idle 
occupations depraving to the soul - what am I to do despite those unfortunate conditions 
of the past, in order to requite those who have all this time fed me and clothed me and 
who still continue to feed and clothe me? If the question had presented itself as it does to 
me now after I have repented: What must I do, who am such a perverted man? - the 
answer would have been easy: try, first of all, to feed yourself honestly, that is to say, 
learn not to live on the backs of others; and while learning that, and after learning it, take 
every opportunity to serve others with hands, feet, brain, heart, and all the powers you 
possess and on which people make demands. 

And therefore I say that for a man of our circle - besides not lying to himself or to others - 
it is also necessary to repent, to scrape off the pride that has grown upon us; pride of 
education, of refinement, and of talents, and to acknowledge oneself to be not a 
benefactor of others and an advanced man who is willing to share his useful acquisitions 
with the people, but to acknowledge oneself guilty all round, a spoilt, quite good-for 
nothing man, who wishes not to be a benefactor to the people but to reform himself and 
cease to offend and wrong them. 

I often hear questions from good young people who sympathize with the negative part of 
my writings, and ask: 'Then what must I do? What am I to do, who have taken my degree 
at the university, or some other establishment - What am I to do to be of use?' 

These young people ask that, but in the depth of their souls have already decided that in 
the education they have received they possess a great advantage, and that they wish to 
serve the people just by means of that advantage. And therefore the one thing they will on 
no account do is to examine what they call their education honestly and critically and ask 
themselves whether it is a good or bad thing? If they do that, they will inevitably be led to 
repudiate their education and be obliged to begin to learn afresh; and that is just what is 
necessary. 

They are quite unable to decide the question, What to do? because they do not see the 
question in its true light. 

The question should be put thus: How can I, a helpless, useless man, who owing to 
unfortunate circumstances have wasted the best years for learning on studying a scientific 
Talmud pernicious to soul and to body, how can I rectify this mistake and learn to be of 
service to men? But it presents itself to them thus: How am I, who have acquired such 
admirable knowledge, to be of use to people by means of my admirable knowledge? And 
therefore the man will never answer the question: What to do? until he ceases to deceive 
himself, and repents. And repentance is not dreadful, just as the truth is not dreadful, but 
is equally joyous and fruitful. We need only accept the truth completely and repent fully, 
to understand that no one possesses any rights or privileges or can possess them, but has 
only endless and unlimited duties and obligations; and man's first and most 



What Then Must We Do? 


149 


Leo Tolstoy 


unquestionable duty is to participate in the struggle with nature to support his own life 
and that of others. 

And this acknowledgement of a man's duty forms the essence of the third answer to the 
question: What to do? 

I tried not to lie to myself. I tried to extirpate the false conception of the importance of 
my education and talents, and to repent; but on the road to the solution of the question, 
What to do? a new difficulty presented itself: there were so many things to be done that 
one needed an indication just what should be done in particular. And the reply to this 
question was given by sincere repentance of the evil in which I was living. What to do? 
Just what to do? - everyone asks, and I, too, asked it as long as, under the influence of a 
high opinion of my vocation, I did not see that my first and unquestionable business was 
to procure my own food, clothing, heating, and dwelling, and in doing this to serve 
others, because since the beginning of the world that has been the first and surest 
obligation of every man. 

Only in that occupation does a man, if he participates in it, obtain full satisfaction for the 
physical and spiritual demands of his nature: to feed, clothe, and take care of himself and 
of those near to him, satisfies his physical needs, while to do the same for others satisfies 
his spiritual needs. 

All man's other activities become legitimate only when this prime demand is satisfied. 

No matter wherein a man may see his vocation: whether in ruling men, in defending his 
compatriots, in performing Church services, in teaching, in devising means to increase 
the pleasures of life, in discovering the laws of nature, in embodying eternal truths in 
artistic images - for a rational man the duty of taking part in the struggle with nature for 
the maintenance of his own life and the lives of other people, will always be the first and 
most indubitable. This duty will always rank first, because what people most need is life, 
and therefore to defend people and to teach them and to make their lives more agreeable 
it is necessary to preserve life itself, and my neglect to take part in that struggle and my 
consumption of other people's labour destroys people's lives. 

And therefore it is impossible and insane to try to serve men while destroying their lives. 

Man's duty to struggle with nature for the means of livelihood will always be the very 
first and most certain of all duties, because it is the law of life, neglect of which involves 
inevitable punishment by the destruction either of man's physical or rational life. If a man 
living in solitude avoids the struggle with nature he is at once punished by the fact that 
his body perishes. And if in a community a man frees himself from his duty by making 
others do his work for him to the detriment of their lives, he is at once punished by the 
fact that his life becomes unreasonable and unjustifiable. 

So perverted had I been by my past life, and so concealed in our society is that primary 
and unquestionable law of God or of nature, that it seemed to me strange, terrible, and 
even shameful, to obey that law, as though the fulfilment of an eternal and 
unquestionable law, and not its neglect, could be strange, terrible, or shameful. 

At first it seemed to me that in order to do rough manual work some special arrangement 
or organization was necessary: a circle of like-minded men, the consent of my family, or 
residence in the country. Then I felt ashamed to appear to wish to show off by doing 



Leo Tolstoy 


150 


What Then Must We Do? 


something so unusual in our circle as physical work, and I did not know how to set about 
it. 

But I had only to understand that it was not some exceptional activity that had to be 
devised and arranged, but that it was merely returning to a natural position from the false 
one in which I had been - merely rectifying the falsehood in which I had been living-I 
had only to admit this for all difficulties to vanish. 

It was not at all necessary to arrange, to adapt, or to await the consent of others, because 
in whatever condition I might be there were always people who fed, clothed, and attended 
to the heating, not only for themselves but also for me, and I could do this for myself and 
for them everywhere, under any conditions, if I had sufficient time and strength. 

Nor could I feel false shame in the unaccustomed work that seemed to surprise people, 
for while not doing it I already felt not false but real shame. And on arriving at this 
consciousness and at the practical deductions from it, I was fully rewarded for not having 
feared the conclusions of reason and for having gone where they led me. 

On reaching that practical deduction I was surprised at the ease and simplicity with which 
all these questions which had seemed to me so difficult and complex solved themselves. 

In reply to the question: What must I do? I saw that the most indubitable answer was: 
First, do all the things I myself most need - attend to my own room, heat my own stove, 
fetch my water, attend to my clothes, and do all I can for myself I thought this would 
seem strange to the servants, but it turned out that the strangeness only lasted for a week 
and afterwards it would have seemed strange had I resumed my former habits. 

To the question whether this physical work had to be organized, and whether one should 
arrange a village community on the land-it turned out that all that was unnecessary, and 
that work - if its aim is to satisfy one's needs, rather than to make idleness possible and 
utilize other people's toil as is the case with people who are making money - draws one 
naturally from the town to the country, where such labour is most productive and most 
joyful. 

It was unnecessary to arrange any community, because a man who works himself 
naturally joins up with the existing community of working people. 

To the question: Would not this work absorb all my time and prevent my doing the 
mental work I love, to which I am accustomed, and which I sometimes consider useful? I 
received a most unexpected reply. The energy of my mental work increased-and 
increased in proportion to my bodily exertion and to my emancipation from all 
superfluity. 

It turned out that after devoting eight hours to physical toil (the half of the day I had 
formerly passed in arduous efforts to avoid dullness) I still had eight hours left, of which 
I only needed five for mental work. 

It turned out that if I - a very prolific writer who for forty years have done nothing but 
write, and have written some 5,000 pages, - if I had worked all those forty years at a 
peasant's usual work, then, not reckoning winter evenings and workless days, if I had 
read and studied for five hours every day and had written only on holidays two pages a 



What Then Must We Do? 


151 


Leo Tolstoy 


day (and I have sometimes written as much as sixteen pages a day) I should have 
produced those 5,000 pages in fourteen years. 1 

I came upon a wonderful fact - a very simple arithmetical calculation a seven-year-old 
boy could have made, but which I had never made before. There are twenty-four hours in 
the day; we sleep eight, so sixteen remain. If a brainworker devotes five hours a day to 
his work he will get through an immense amount. What becomes of the remaining eleven 
hours? 

It turned out that physical labour, far from rendering mental work impossible, improved 
and aided it. 

To the question whether this physical work would not deprive me of many harmless 
pleasures natural to man, such as enjoyment of the arts, acquisition of knowledge, 
intercourse with people, and the happiness of life in general, the answer is that the 
opposite turned out to be true: the more intensive the labour and the nearer it approached 
to rough work on the land, the more enjoyment and information I obtained and the closer 
and more amiable was the intercourse I had with men, and the more happiness life 
brought me. 

To the question (so often heard by me from people who are not quite sincere) - what 
result could come from such an insignificant drop in the ocean as my own physical work 
in the ocean of labour I consumed, again a very surprising and unexpected reply was 
obtained. 

It turned out that I only needed to make physical labour the customary condition of my 
life, for most of the bad expensive habits and requirements that had accompanied a state 
of physical idleness to drop away of themselves without the least effort on my part. Not 
to speak of the habit of turning night into day and vice versa, and the kind of bedding, 
clothes, and conventional cleanliness, which are simply impossible and irksome when 
one is engaged on physical labour, the quality of food I wanted changed completely. 

Instead of the sweet, rich, delicate, refined, and spicy foods that formerly attracted me, 
the simplest food: cabbage-soup, buckwheat porridge, black bread, and tea, now seemed 
pleasantest. 

So that, not to mention the simple example of the plain peasants with whom I came in 
touch, who satisfied themselves with little, my needs themselves imperceptibly changed 
in consequence of my life of labour, so that in proportion as I accustomed myself to and 
assimilated habits of work, my drop of physical labour became more noticeable; and in 
proportion as my own work became more productive my demands on the labour of others 
became less and less and my life naturally, without effort or deprivation approximated to 
a simplicity of which I could not have dreamed had I not fulfilled the law of labour. It 
turned out that my most expensive demands on life, the demands of vanity and for 
distraction from ennui, were directly due to an idle life. 


1 To get the sum right Tolstoy should. I think, have allowed himself 4 pages a day instead of 2. Taking 90 
Sundays and Saints’ days in the peasants’ year, we get 90 days x 4 pages x 14 years = 5,040, or about what 
Tolstoy says he had actually written. - A.M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


152 


What Then Must We Do? 


With physical labour there was no room for vanity and no need for diversions, as my time 
was pleasantly occupied, and after becoming fatigued a simple rest at tea over a book, or 
in conversation with those near to me, was incomparably more agreeable than a theatre, 
cards a concert or grand society - all of them things that cost a great deal. 

As to whether this unaccustomed labour would not injure the health necessary to enable 
me to be of use to men, it turned out that (despite the positive assertions of leading 
physicians that hard physical exertion, especially at my age, might injure my health, and 
that Swedish gymnastics, massage, and so forth - arrangements to replace the natural 
conditions of man's life - would be preferable) - the harder I worked the stronger, fitter, 
happier, and kindler did I feel. So that it appeared, indubitable that just as all those 
cunning devices: newspapers, theatres, concerts, visits, balls, cards, periodicals, and 
novels, are nothing but means of maintaining man's mental life without the natural 
condition of labour for others, so also are all the ingenious hygienic and medical devices 
for the preparation of food, drink, housing, ventilation, heating, clothing, medicines, 
mineral waters, massage, gymnastics, electrical and other cures - it turned out that all 
these cunning devices are nothing but means of supporting man's physical life when cut 
off from its natural conditions of labour - that it all was like an arrangement by means of 
chemical apparatus in an hermetically closed chamber, to evaporate water and provide 
plants with the kind of air best suited to their breathing - when it is only necessary to 
open the window: only necessary to do what is natural not only for man but for animals, 
namely, to discharge and expend by muscular labour the supply of energy produced by 
swallowing food. 

The profound complexities of medicine and hygiene for people of our class are such as a 
mechanician might devise in order, when he has heated a boiler and screwed down all the 
valves, to prevent the boiler from bursting. 

And when I clearly understood all this, it seemed to me ludicrous. By a long series of 
doubts, searchings, and reflection, I have reached the extraordinary truth that man has 
eyes in order to see with them, ears in order to hear with them, legs in order to walk with 
them, and hands and a back to work with, and that if he does not use them for their 
natural purpose it will be the worse for him. 

I came to the conclusion that with us privileged people the same thing happens as 
occurred with the stallions of an acquaintance of mine. 

His steward, who did not care for horses and did not understand them, having received 
his master's orders to take the best stallions to the horse-market, chose them out of the 
herd and put them in the stalls; he fed them on oats and watered them, but wishing to be 
careful with such expensive horses, he did not allow anyone to ride them or drive them or 
even exercise them. The horses all went wrong in the legs and became worthless. 

The same has happened with us, only with this difference, that it is impossible in any way 
to cheat the horses, and in order that they should not get out they had to be kept tied up, 
whereas we are kept in a similarly unnatural and ruinous condition by the temptations 
which enmesh us and bind us as with chains. We have arranged for ourselves a life 
contrary both to man's moral and physical nature, and we direct all the strength of our 
minds to persuading men that this is just what life should be. All that we call 'culture', our 
sciences and arts and the improvements of life's comforts, are attempts to cheat man's 



What Then Must We Do? 


153 


Leo Tolstoy 


moral and natural demands; all that we call hygiene and medicine is an attempt to cheat 
the natural physical demands of human nature. But these deceptions have their limits and 
we have nearly reached them. 

If such is man's true life it is better not to live at all, says the prevalent most fashionable 
philosophy of Schopenhauer and Hartmann. If such is life it is better not to live, say an 
increasing number of suicides among the privileged classes. If life is such, it is better for 
the coming generation not to live, says medical practice in collusion with science: and the 
devices invented by it for the destruction of woman's fecundity. 

In the Bible it is said that it is a law for human beings to eat bread in the sweat of their 
brow, and in sorrow to bring forth children. 

A peasant, Bondarev, who wrote an article about this, lit up for me the wisdom of that 
saying. (In my whole life two Russian thinkers have had a great moral influence on me, 
enriched my thought, and cleared up my outlook on life. These men were not Russian 
poets, or learned men, or preachers - they were two remarkable men who are still living, 
both of them peasants: Sutaev and Bondarev.) 

But nous avons change tout ca, as a character in Moliere said after having blundered on 
medical matters and said that the liver was on the left side. Nous avons change tout ca: 
men need not work to feed themselves, it will all be done by machines, and women need 
not bear children. Science will teach us various methods and there are too many people as 
it is. 

In the Krapivenski district there is a ragged peasant who wanders about. During the war“ 
he was employed by a commissariat officer in the purchase of grain. Having attached 
himself to this official, the peasant, it seems, went out of his mind with the idea that he, 
like the gentlefolk, need not work but would receive the maintenance due to him from his 
Majesty the Emperor. He now calls himself the Most-Serene-Military Prince Blokhin, 
Contractor for military provisions of all ranks. He says he has 'completed all grades of the 
service', and having 'finished the military profession' he is to receive from the Emperor 
'an open Bank, clothes, uniforms, horses, carriages, tea, peas, servants, and all supplies'. 

To the question: Does he not want some work? he always proudly replies: 'Much obliged 
- that will all be performed by the peasants.' 

If one tells him that the peasants also may not want to work, he replies: 'For the peasants 
the performance of labour presents no difficulty' (he always prefers grandiloquent 
language). 'There is now the invention of machinery for the facilitation of the peasants,' 
he says. 'For them it is not irksome.' When one asks him what he lives for, he replies: 'To 
pass the time.' 

I always look at this man as into a mirror. In him I see myself and our whole class. 

To finish with a rank enabling one to live 'to pass the time', and to receive an 'open Bank', 
while the peasants, as the invention of machinery makes work no longer irksome for 
them, do all the labour, is a complete formulation of the insensate creed of our circle. 


1 The district in which Yasnaya Polyana is situated. -A.M. 

2 The Russo-Turkish war of 1887-8. -A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


154 


What Then Must We Do? 


When we ask: What then must we do? - we do not really ask anything, but merely affirm 
- only not with the frankness of the Most-Serene-Military-Prince Blokhin, who has 
completed all the grades and has lost his reason - that we do not want to do anything. 

He who comes to his senses cannot put the question, because on the one side all that he 
uses has been made and is made by man's hands and on the other side, as soon as a 
healthy man takes up and eats something he feels a need to work with his legs, hands, and 
brain. To find work and to do it he needs only not to hold himself back; only he who 
considers it a shame to work - like a lady who asks her guests not to trouble to open the 
door, but to wait till she calls a servant to do so-only he can put to himself the question, 
what he is to do. 

What is necessary is, not to invent work to do - you can't overtake all the work needed for 
yourself and for others - but what is needed is to get rid of the criminal view of life, that I 
eat and sleep for my pleasure, and to acquire the simple and true view which the peasants 
grow up with and hold, that man is primarily a machine which has to be stoked with food, 
and that it is therefore shameful and uncomfortable and impossible to go on eating and 
not to work; that to eat and not to work is a most dangerous condition, resembling a 
conflagration. If one only has that consciousness, plenty of work will always be at hand 
and it will be joyous and satisfying for the needs of one's body and soul. The case 
presented itself to me like this: our food divides our day into four 'spells', as the peasants 
term it: (1) till breakfast, (2) from breakfast till dinner, (3) from dinner till evening meal, 
(4) and the evening. Man's natural activity is also divided into four kinds: (1) muscular 
activity - work of hands, feet, shoulders, and back-heavy work which makes one sweat; 
(2) the activity of the fingers and wrists - that of craftsmanship; (3) activity of the mind 
and imagination; (4) and the activity of social intercourse. And the blessings men make 
use of can also be divided into four classes. First, the products of heavy labour - grain, 
cattle, buildings, & c.; secondly, the products of craftsmanship clothes, boots, utensils 
and so forth; thirdly, the products of mental activity - the sciences and arts; and fourthly, 
the arrangements for intercourse with people - acquaintanceships, &c. And it seemed to 
me that best of all would be so to vary the day's occupations as to exercise all four human 
faculties and re-create all four kinds of produce we consume, in such a way that the four 
spells should be devoted: the first, to heavy labour; the second, to mental labour; the 
third, to craftsmanship; and the fourth, to intercourse with one's fellows. It would be well 
if one could arrange one's work so, but if not, the one important thing is to retain 
consciousness of one's duty to work - of the duty of employing each spell usefully. 

It seemed to me that only then would the false division of labour that exists in our society 
be abolished, and a just division established which would not infringe man's happiness. 

I, for instance, have occupied myself all my life long with mental work. I said to myself 
that I have so divided labour that writing, that is, mental work, was my special 
occupation, and the other necessary occupations I allowed (or compelled) others to do for 
me. That arrangement, apparently the most advantageous for mental labour, to say 
nothing of its injustice, was after all disadvantageous for mental labour. 

All my life long I had arranged my food, sleep, and amusements with regard to those 
hours of specialized work, and besides that work I had done nothing. 



What Then Must We Do? 


155 


Leo Tolstoy 


The result was: first that I limited my circle of observation and knowledge and often 
lacked a subject of study, and often when setting myself the task of describing the lives of 
men (and the lives of men are the perpetual problem of all mental activity) I felt my 
ignorance and had to learn and inquire about things known to every man who is not 
occupied with specialized work; secondly, it happened that I sat down to write without 
any inner compulsion to write, and no one demanded of me writing for its own sake, that 
is to say for my thoughts, but only wanted my name for journalistic purposes. I tried to 
squeeze what I could out of myself: sometimes nothing could be squeezed out, sometimes 
only something very poor, and I felt dissatisfied and dull. So that very often days and 
weeks passed when I ate and drank, slept and warmed myself, without doing anything, or 
doing only what nobody needed; that is to say, I committed an unquestionable and nasty 
crime of a kind hardly ever committed by a man of the labouring classes. But now after 
having recognized the necessity of physical work, both rough work and handicraft, 
something quite different happened: my time was occupied, however humbly, in a way 
that was certainly useful and joyous and instructive for me. And so I tore myself away 
from that unquestionably useful and joyous occupation to my speciality only when I felt 
an inner need a saw a demand directly addressed to me for my work as a writer. And just 
these demands conditioned the quality, and therefore the value and joyousness of my 
specialized work. 

So it turned out that occupation with the physical work necessary for me as for every 
man, not only did not hinder my specialized activity but was a necessary condition of the 
utility, quality, and pleasurability of that activity. 

A bird is so made that it is necessary for it to fly, walk, peck, and consider, and when it 
does all that it is satisfied and happy, in a word, it is then really a bird. Just so is it with 
man: when he walks, turns about, lifts, draws things along, works with his fingers, eyes, 
ears, tongue, and brain - then and only then is he satisfied and really a man. 

A man conscious that it is his vocation to labour will naturally aim at such a rotation of 
work as is natural for the satisfaction of his internal and external needs, and he will 
change this order only if he feels within him an irresistible vocation for some exceptional 
work and if other people require that work of him. 

The nature of work is such that the satisfaction of all man's needs requires just the change 
to different kinds of work that makes it not burdensome but gladsome. Only a false belief 
that work IS a .curse could bring people to such an emancipation of themselves from 
certain kinds of work - that is, to such a seizure of the work of others - as requires the 
compulsory engagement of others in special occupations, which is called 'the division of 
labour'. 

We are so accustomed to our false conception of the arrangement of work, that it seems 
to us that it will be better for a boot maker, a mechanic, a writer, or a musician, if he 
exempts himself from the labour natural to all men. 

Where there is no violence exercised to seize other people's work and no false faith in the 
pleasure of idleness, no one will free himself from the physical work necessary for the 
satisfaction of his needs, in order to occupy himself with specialized work; for 
specialized work is not an advantage, but a sacrifice a man makes to his special bent and 
to his fellow men. 



Leo Tolstoy 


156 


What Then Must We Do? 


A boot maker in a village tearing himself from his customary and joyous field labour and 
taking to that of mending or making boots for his neighbours, deprives himself of the 
very joyous and useful field-work only because he likes sewing, and knows that no one 
can do it as well as he and that people will be grateful to him for it. But he cannot desire 
to deprive himself for life of joyous change of work. And so it is with a village Elder, a 
mechanic, a writer, or a scholar. It is only we, with our perverted notions, who suppose 
that if a master dismisses a clerk from the counting-house and sends him back to work as 
a peasant, or if a minister is dismissed and deported, that he has been punished and placed 
in a worse position. In truth he has been benefited, that is to say his special oppressive 
and difficult work has been changed for a joyous alteration of labour. 

In a natural society this is quite different. I know of a Commune in which the people 
grew their own food. One of the members of this Commune 1 was more educated than the 
others, and he was required to give lectures, which he had to prepare during the day and 
deliver in the evening. He did this willingly, feeling that he was being of use to others 
and doing good work. But he grew tired of doing exclusively mental work and his health 
suffered, and the members of the Commune took pity on him and invited him to work on 
the land. 

For people who look on labour as the essence and joy of life, the background and basis of 
life will always be the struggle with nature-work on the land, handicraft, mental work, 
and the establishment of intercourse among men. 

A withdrawal from one or several of these kinds of work and a specialization of work 
will only occur when the specialist, loving such work and knowing that he does it better 
than other people, sacrifices his own advantage to satisfy direct demands made on him. 
Only by such an opinion about work and by the natural division of labour that results 
from it, is the curse lifted which in our imagination is laid on work; and all labour 
becomes joyful, because either a man does unquestionably useful and joyful work that is 
not burdensome, or he will be conscious of sacrificing himself in the performance of a 
more difficult and exceptional task done for the good of others. 

'But the subdivision of labour is more advantageous!' For whom is it more advantageous? 

It is advantageous for the production of more boots and cotton-prints. But who will have 
to make those boots and prints? 

People such as those who for generations have made pin-heads and nothing else. Then 
how can it be more profitable for them? 

If the chief thing were to make as many prints and pins as possible, it would be all right; 
but men and their welfare are the chief consideration. And the welfare of men lies in life, 
and their life is in their work. Then how can compulsion to do tormenting and degrading 
work be advantageous? 

If the aim were the advantage of some men regardless of the welfare of all, then the most 
advantageous thing might be for some men to eat others; it is said that they taste nice. But 


1 The Commune in question was the one founded by N. Chaikovsky, in Kansas State, in the eighteen 
seventies; and the man referred to in this passage was V. K. Heins, who changed his name to William Frey. 
He visited Tolstoy at Yasnaya Polyana, and an account of him is given in Chap. VI, Vol. 2 of my Life of 
Tolstoy. -A. M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


157 


Leo Tolstoy 


what is most profitable for all is what I desire for myself: the greatest possible welfare 
and satisfaction of all the needs of body and soul and conscience and reason implanted 
within me. And personally I found that for my welfare and the satisfaction of these needs, 
I only had to be cured of the madness in which I - like the Krapivenski madman - lived, 
believing that gentlefolk ought not to work and that all should be done by others - and, 
without any subtleties, that I had to do only what is natural for a man to do when 
satisfying his needs. And when I found this out, I became convinced that this work for the 
satisfaction of one's needs naturally divides itself into different kinds of work, each of 
which has its charm and not only is not burdensome but serves as a rest from the other 
kinds of labour. 

Roughly (without at all insisting on the correctness of such a division) I divided that 
work, according to the demands I make on life, into four parts corresponding to the four 
spells of work which make up the day, and I endeavour to satisfy those demands. 

So these are the replies I found to my question: What must we do? 

First: not to lie to myself; and - however far my path of life may be from the true path 
disclosed by my reason - not to fear the truth. 

Secondly: to reject the belief in my own righteousness and in privileges and peculiarities 
distinguishing me from others, and to acknowledge myself as being to blame. 

Thirdly: to fulfil the eternal, indubitable law of man, and with the labour of my whole 
being to struggle with nature for the maintenance of my own and other people's lives. 


CHAPTER XXXIX 

I HAVE finished, having said all that relates to myself; but I cannot refrain from a desire 
to say what relates to everyone, and to verify the conclusions I have come to, by general 
considerations. 

I wish to say why it seems to me that very many people of our circle must reach the same 
conclusion that I arrived at; and also what will come of it if even a few people do so. 

I think many will come to the conclusion I came to, because if only men of our circle, of 
our caste, look seriously about them, the young people seeking personal happiness will be 
horrified at the ever-increasing misery of their lives, clearly drawing them towards 
perdition; the conscientious people will be horrified at the cruelty and injustice of their 
lives, and the timid people will be horrified at the danger of their lives. 

The unhappiness of our life ; patch up our false way of life as we will, propping it up by 
the aid of the sciences and arts - that life becomes feebler, sicklier, and more tormenting 
every year; every year the number of suicides and the avoidance of motherhood 
increases; every year the people of that class become feebler; every year we feel the 
increasing gloom of our lives. 

Evidently salvation is not to be found by increasing the comforts and pleasures of life, 
medical treatments, artificial teeth and hair, breathing exercises, massage, and so forth; 
this truth has become so evident that in the newspapers advertisements of stomach- 
powders for the rich are printed under the heading, 'Blessings for the poor', in which it is 



Leo Tolstoy 


158 


What Then Must We Do? 


said that only the poor have good digestions but that the rich need aids, among which are 
these powders. 

It is impossible to remedy this by any amusements, comforts, or powders-it can only be 
remedied by a change of life. 

Discord of our life and our conscience ; try as we may to justify to ourselves our betrayal 
of humanity, all our excuses crumble to dust in face of the obvious facts: people around 
us die from excessive work and from want, while we use up food, clothes and human 
labour, merely to find distraction and change. And therefore the conscience of a man of 
our circle, if he retains but a scrap of it, cannot rest, and poisons all the comforts and 
enjoyments of life supplied to us by the labour of our brothers, who suffer and perish at 
that labour. 

And not only does every conscientious man feel this himself (he would be glad to forget 
it, but cannot do so in our age) but all the best part of science and art - that part which has 
not forgotten the purpose of its vocation - continually reminds us of our cruelty and of 
our unjustifiable position. The old firm justifications are all destroyed; the new ephemeral 
justifications of the progress of science for science's sake and art for art's sake do not 
stand the light of simple common sense. 

Men's consciences cannot be set at rest by new excuses, but only by a change of life 
which will make any justification of oneself unnecessary as there will be nothing needing 
justification. 

The danger of our way of life : try as we may to hide from ourselves, the simple, most 
obvious, danger that the patience of those whom we are stifling may be exhausted; try as 
we may to counteract that danger by all sorts of deception, violence, and cajolery - that 
danger is growing every day and every hour and has long threatened us! but now has 
matured so that we hardly maintain ourselves in our little boat above the roaring sea 
which already washes over us and threatens angrily to swallow and devour us. The 
workers' revolution with horrors of destruction and murder not merely threatens us, but 
we have been living over it for some thirty years already, and only for a while have 
somehow managed by various temporary devices to postpone its eruption. Such is the 
condition of Europe; such is the condition with us, and it is yet worse with us because it 
has no safety-valves. Except the Tsar, the classes that oppress the masses have now no 
justification in the people's eyes; those masses are all held down in their position merely 
by violence, cunning, and opportunism, that is, by agility, but hatred among the worst 
representatives of the people and contempt for us among the best of them, increases hour 
by hour. 

During the last three or four years a new significant word has come into general use 
among our people, which I never heard formerly; it is used opprobriously in the street, 
and defines us as 'drones '. 1 

The hatred and contempt of the oppressed masses are growing and the physical and moral 
forces of the wealthy classes are weakening; the deception on which everything depends 


1 Not finding a new English word with which to translate darmoedy, I have to use 'drones', which is an old 
one. Literally darmoedy means 'people who eat giving nothing in return’. -A. M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


159 


Leo Tolstoy 


is wearing out, and the wealthy classes have nothing to console themselves with in this 
deadly peril. 

To return to the old ways is impossible, to restore the ruined prestige is impossible; only 
one thing is left for those who do not wish to change their way of life, and that is to hope 
that 'things will last my time' - after that let happen what may. 

That is what the blind crowd of the rich are doing, but the danger is ever growing and the 
terrible catastrophe draws nearer. 

Three reasons indicate to people of the wealthy classes the necessity of altering their way 
of life: the need of well-being for themselves and for those near to them, which is not met 
on the path they are following; the need of satisfying the voice of conscience, to do which 
is evidently impossible on the present path; and the menace and ever-growing danger of 
their life, which is not to be avoided by any external means. All three reasons together 
should move men of the wealthy classes to change their lives - to a change satisfying 
their welfare and their conscience, and averting the danger. 

And there is only one such change: to cease to deceive, to repent, and to recognize toil to 
be not a curse but the joyful business of life. 

But of what avail will it be that I do ten, eight, or five hours' physical work which 
thousands of peasants would gladly do for the money I have? - people say in reply to this. 

In the first place the simplest and most certain result will be that you will be merrier, 
healthier, fitter, and kindlier, and will learn what real life is, from which you have been 
hiding yourself or which has been hidden from you. 

In the second place, if you have a conscience, it not only will not suffer as it does now, 
seeing people's labour (the hardship of which from ignorance we always either 
exaggerate or underrate), but you will experience all the time the joyous consciousness 
that every day you satisfy the demands of your conscience more and more, and get away 
from the terrible position of having such an. accumulation of evil in your life as makes it 
impossible to do good to people; you will feel the joy of living freely, with the possibility 
of doing good; you will pierce a window, letting in a chink of light from the sphere of the 
moral world which has hitherto been closed to you. Instead of the constant fear of 
revenge for the evil you do, you will feel that you are saving others from that revenge, 
and above all that you are saving the oppressed from the grievous sensation of hatred and 
vengeance. 

'But really it is ridiculous', people usually say, 'for us, people of our society, with the 
profound problems that confront us - philosophic, scientific, political, artistic, 
ecclesiastical, and social - for us, ministers, senators, academicians, professors, artists, 
and singers; for us, a quarter of an hour of whose time is so highly valued - for us to 
spend our time on what? On cleaning our boots, washing our shirts, digging, planting 
potatoes, or feeding our chickens, our cows, and so forth, on affairs which are gladly 
done for us not only by our own porters and cooks but by thousands of people who 
appreciate the value of our time. But why do we dress ourselves, wash ourselves, scratch 
ourselves (excuse the details), hold the po for ourselves, why do we walk, hand chairs to 
ladies and to guests, open and shut doors, help people into carriages, and do hundreds of 
similar things that used to be done for us by slaves? 



Leo Tolstoy 


160 


What Then Must We Do? 


Because we consider that so it ought to be, that it accords with human dignity, that it is a 
man's duty and obligation. 

Sq it is with physical labour. It is man's dignity, his sacred duty and obligation, to use the 
hands and feet given him for the purpose for which they were given, and to expend the 
food he consumes on labour to produce food, and not to let them atrophy, nor to wash 
them and clean them and use them only to put food, drink, and cigarettes into his own 
mouth. 

That is a significance physical labour has for every man in any society, but in our society 
where the evasion of this law of nature has become the misfortune of a w hole circle of 
people, occupation with physical labour acquires yet another significance-that of a 
sermon and an activity preventing terrible calamities that threaten humanity. To say that 
for an educated man physical labour is an insignificant occupation is the same as to ask, 
when a temple is being built: what importance is there in setting one stone evenly in its 
place? 

All the most important things are done unnoticed, modestly, simply; neither ploughing, 
nor building, nor grazing cattle, nor even thinking, can be done in uniforms amid 
illuminations and the roar of cannon. The illuminations, the roar of cannon, music, 
uniforms, cleanliness, and glitter, with which we are accustomed to connect the idea of 
the importance of an occupation, always serve on the contrary as signs that the matter 
lacks importance. 

Great and real affairs are always simple and modest. 

And so it is with the most important affair before us: the solution of the terrible 
contradictions amid which we live. 

And the things that solve those contradictions are these modest, imperceptible, apparently 
ridiculous acts: serving oneself, doing physical labour for ourselves and if possible for 
others - which we rich people have to do if we understand the misfortune, wrongfulness, 
and danger of the position into which we have fallen. 

What will result if I, and a dozen or two others, do not despise physical work but consider 
it essential for our happiness, tranquillity of conscience, and security? The result will be, 
that one or two or three dozen people, without conflict with anyone and without 
governmental or revolutionary violence, will solve for themselves the apparently 
insoluble question that presents itself to the whole world, and will solve it in such a way 
that they will live better, their consciences will be more at ease, and the evil of oppression 
will no longer terrify them: the result will be that other people will see that the good they 
seek everywhere is close at hand, that the apparently insoluble contradictions between 
their conscience and the arrangements of the world solve themselves in the easiest and 
most joyous manner, and that instead of being afraid of the people around us we should 
draw near to them and love them. 



What Then Must We Do? 


161 


Leo Tolstoy 


The apparently insoluble economic and social question is the question of Krylov's box . 1 
It opens simply. But it will not open until people do the first and simplest thing, and just 
open it. 

The apparently insoluble question is the old one of the. exploitation by some men of the 
labour of others, and in our time that question is expressed by property. 

Formerly men took the labour of others simply by violence - slavery. To-day we do it by 
property. 

Property to-day is the root of all evils: of the sufferings of those who possess it or are 
deprived of it, the reproaches of conscience of those who misuse it, and the danger of 
collision between those who have a superfluity and those who are in need. Property is the 
root of the evil, and at the same time is the very thing to gain which all the activity of our 
society to-day is directed. It guides the activity of our whole world. 

States and Governments intrigue and go to war for property: for the banks of the Rhine 
and territories in Africa, China, or the Balkan Peninsula. Bankers, traders, manufacturers, 
and landowners work, scheme, and torment themselves and others for property; officials 
and artisans struggle, cheat, oppress and suffer for the sake of property; our Law Courts 
and police defend property; our penal settlements and prisons and all the horrors of our 
so-called repression of crime, exist on account of property. 

Property is the root of all evil, and the division and safeguarding of property occupies the 
whole world. 

What then is property? 

People are accustomed to think that property is something really belonging to a man. 
That is why they call it 'property'. We say of a house and of one's hand alike, that it is 'my 
own' hand, 'my own' house. 

But evidently this is an error and a superstition. 

We know, or if we do not know it is easy to perceive, that property is merely a means of 
appropriating other men's work. And the work of others can certainly not be my own. It 
has even nothing in common with the conception of property (that which is one's own)-a 
conception which is very exact and definite. Man always has called, and always will call, 
'his own' that which is subject to his will and attached to his consciousness, namely, his 
own body. As soon as a man calls something his 'property' that is not his own body but 
something that he wishes to make subject to his will as his body is - he makes a mistake, 
acquires for himself disillusionment and suffering, and finds himself obliged to cause 
others to suffer. 

A man speaks of his wife, his children, his slaves, and his things, as being his own; but 
reality always shows him his mistake, and he has to renounce that superstition or to suffer 
and make others suffer. 


1 Krylov's fable tells of a box which several people failed to unlock. It turned out that it was not locked at 
all; one had only to raise the lid. -A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


162 


What Then Must We Do? 


In our days, nominally renouncing ownership of men, thanks to money and its collection 
by Government, we proclaim our right to the ownership of money, that is to say, to the 
ownership of other people's labour. 

But as the right of ownership in a wife, a son, a slave, or a horse, is a fiction which is 
upset by reality and only causes him who believes in it to suffer - since my wife or son 
will never submit to my will as my body does, and only my own body will still be my 
real property-in the same way monetary property will never be my own, but only a 
deceiving of myself and a source of suffering, while my real property will still be only 
my own body-that which always submits to me and is bound up with my consciousness. 

Only to us who are so accustomed to call other things than our own body our 'property', 
can it seem that such a wild superstition may be useful, and can remain without 
consequences harmful to us; but it is only necessary to reflect on the reality of the matter 
to see that this superstition, like every other, entails terrible consequences. 

Let us take the most simple example. 

I consider myself to be my own property and another man to be my property also. 

I want to be able to prepare a dinner. If I did not suffer from a superstitious belief in my 
ownership of the other man, I should teach that art, like any other that I needed, to my 
own property, that is to my own body; but as it is, I teach it to my imaginary property, 
and the result is that when my cook does not obey me or wish to please me, or even runs 
away from me or dies, I am left with the unsatisfied necessity of providing for myself, but 
unaccustomed to learning, and with a consciousness that I have spent as much time 
worrying over that cook as would have sufficed me to learn cooking myself. So it is with 
property in buildings, clothes, utensils, landed property, and property in money. All 
imaginary property evokes in me unsuitable requirements that cannot always be satisfied, 
and deprives me of the possibility of acquiring for my true and unquestionable property - 
my own body - that knowledge, that skill, those habits, and that perfection, which I might 
acquire. 

The result always is that with no benefit to myself - to my true property - 1 have expended 
strength, sometimes my whole life, on what was not and could not be my property. 

I arrange what I imagine to be my own library, my own picture-gallery, my own 
apartments and clothes, and acquire my 'own' money in order to buy what I want, and it 
ends with this, that busy with this imaginary property, as though it were really mine, I 
quite lose consciousness of the difference between what is my property, on which I really 
can labour, which can serve me and will always remain under my control, and that which 
is not and cannot be my own, whatever I may call it, and cannot be the object of my 
activity. 

Words always have a clear meaning until we intentionally give them a false one. 

What then does property mean? Property is that which belongs to me alone and 
exclusively, that with which I can always do just what I like, that which no one can take 
from me, which remains mine to the end of my life and which I must use, increase, and 
improve. 

Each man can own only himself as such property. 



What Then Must We Do? 


163 


Leo Tolstoy 


And yet it is just in this very sense that people's imaginary property is understood-the 
very property for the sake of which (in a vain effort to do the impossible: to try to possess 
things external to oneself, which cannot be one's own) all the terrible evil of the world 
takes place: wars, executions, courts of law, prisons, luxury, vice, murder, and people's 
ruin. 

So what will come of it if a dozen people plough, split logs, and make boots, not from 
necessity but because they recognize that man must work and that the more he works the 
better it will be for him? The result will be that a dozen men, or were it but one man, both 
by his consciousness and by actions will show men that the terrible evil from which they 
suffer is not a law off ate, the will of God, or some historic necessity, but is a superstition, 
neither strong nor terrible but weak and insignificant, which need only be no longer 
believed in (as people believe in idols) for us to be free from it and destroy it like a flimsy 
cobweb. 

Men who work to fulfil the joyous law of their life, that is, who work to fulfil the law of 
labour, will free themselves from the superstition of personal property so pregnant with 
calamities, and all the world's institutions which exist to maintain that supposed property 
outside one's own body will become for them not merely unnecessary but irksome; and it 
will become clear to all that these institutions are not indispensable, but are harmful, 
artificial, and false conditions of life. 

For a man who regards work not as a curse but as a joy, property outside his own body, 
that is, the right or power to use another man's labour, will be not merely useless but 
irksome. 

If I like to prepare my dinner and am accustomed to doing so, the fact of another man 
doing it for me deprives me of an accustomed occupation and does not give me the 
satisfaction I gave myself: besides which the acquisition of imaginary property will be 
useless to a man who regards labour as life itself, fills his life with it, and so is less and 
less in need of the labour of others, that is, less and less in need of property to fill his idle 
time - for pleasure and for the adornment of his life. 

If a man's life is filled with labour he does not need apartments, furniture, and a variety of 
handsome clothes: he needs less expensive food and does not need conveyances and 
distractions. 

Above all, a man who regards labour as the business and joy of his life will not seek to 
lessen his labour at the cost of other people's work. 

A man who regards his life as work, will make it his aim, in proportion as he acquires 
skill and endurance, to accomplish more and more work and so fill his life ever more and 
more completely. 

For such a man, placing the meaning of his life in labour and not in its results, not in 
acquiring property, that is, the labour of others, there can never be any question about 
implements of labour. 

Though such a man will always choose the most productive implement, he will get the 
same satisfaction from work even if he has to use the least productive. 



Leo Tolstoy 


164 


What Then Must We Do? 


If there is a steam-plough he will plough with it, if there is none he will plough with a 
horse plough, and if that also is lacking he will use a wooden peasant-plough, or for lack 
of that will dig with a spade, and under all conditions equally he will attain his aim of 
spending his life in work useful for others, and so will obtain full satisfaction. 

And the condition of such a man, both in external and internal respects, will be happier 
than that of one who makes the acquisition of property the aim of his life. 

Externally such a man will never be in want, for people seeing his desire to work will 
always try to make his work as productive as possible - as they do with the water power 
that turns a mill-wheel - and that it should be as productive as possible they will make his 
material existence secure, which they do not do for one who strives after property. And 
security of material conditions is all that a man needs. 

Inwardly such a man will always be happier than one who seeks property, because the 
latter will never obtain what he strives for, while the former will always do so to the 
measure of his strength: feeble, old, dying as the proverb has it 'with a tool in his hand', 
he will obtain full satisfaction, and the love and sympathy of other people. 

So that is what will come of it if a few mad cranks plough, make boots, and so forth, 
instead of smoking cigarettes, playing bridge, and driving about everywhere carrying 
their ennui with them during the ten hours a day that all mental workers have to spare. 

The result will be that these crazy people will show in practice that the imaginary 
property on account of which people suffer and. make others suffer, is not necessary for 
happiness, but is hampering and nothing more than a superstition; that property, real 
property, exists only m one's own head, hands, and feet, and that actually to exploit that 
real property usefully and joyfully, it is necessary to reject the false conception of 
property outside one's own body, in the service of which we expend the best forces of our 
life. It will result that these people will show that a man will only cease to believe in 
imaginary property when he has developed his real property - his capacities, his body - so 
that it yields him fruit a hundredfold, and happiness of which we have no conception, and 
becomes such a useful, strong, kindly man that wherever he may be thrown he will 
always fall on his feet, will everywhere be brother to everyone, and will be understood 
and needed and prized by all. And people, seeing this one or that dozen lunatics, will 
understand what they all should do to untie the terrible knot in which the superstition of 
property has involved them, and to free themselves from the unfortunate position about 
which they now all groan, not knowing how to escape from it. 

But what can one man do amid a crowd who do not agree with him? 

No reflection shows the insincerity of those who employ it more obviously than this. 

Bargees tow a barge up-stream. Can one find a single bargee stupid enough to refuse to 
haul at his tow-rope because by himself he is not strong enough to pull the barge up- 
stream? 

He who recognizes that beside his rights to an animal life, to food and sleep, he has some 
human duties, knows very well wherein his duty lies, just as the bargee does who 
shoulders the tow-rope. The bargee knows very well that he has only to haul and pull up- 
stream. He will only look for something to do and ask how to do it when he has dropped 
the tow-rope. And as with the bargees and with all men engaged on a common task, so 



What Then Must We Do? 


165 


Leo Tolstoy 


with all humanity: each man has not to unhitch the tow-rope but to haul at it in the 
direction up-stream shown by the master. And that the direction may always be the same 
we have been endowed with reason. 

And that direction has been given so clearly and indubitably in the life of all men about 
us and in the conscience of each man, and in all the expressions of human wisdom, that 
only he who does not wish to work can say that he does not see it. 

So what will come of this? 

This, that one or two men will haul, and seeing them a third, and so the best people will 
join up until the matter moves and goes along as of itself, pushing and inviting even those 
to join up who do not understand what is done or why. 

At first those who consciously work to fulfil the law of God will be joined by others who 
accept it semi-consciously and half on trust; afterwards a large number will join them 
merely from faith in those advanced men who acknowledge it, and finally the majority 
will acknowledge it, and then men will cease to destroy themselves and will find 
happiness. That would happen very soon if the people of our circle, and following them 
the whole great majority of the workers, no longer considered it shameful to clean out 
privies and cart away the contents, but not shameful to fill them for others, their brothers 
to cleanse' no longer considered it shameful to call on their neighbours in boots they have 
made themselves, while not considering it shameful to walk in boots and goloshes past 
people who have nothing to put on their feet; no longer felt it shameful not to know 
French or the latest news, but not shameful to eat bread without knowing how to make it- 
or shameful not to wear a starched shirt and clean clothes, but not shameful to go about in 
clean clothes which show one's idleness, and shameful to have dirty hands, but not 
shameful to have hands unhardened by toil. 

All this will happen when public opinion demands it. And public opinion will demand it 
when those delusions in people's minds have been destroyed which hide the truth from 
them. Within my own recollection great changes have been accomplished in this sense. 
And those changes were only accomplished because public opinion changed. I can 
remember the time when rich people were ashamed to drive out with less than four horses 
and two lackeys; were ashamed not to have a lackey or a chambermaid to dress them, put 
their boots on for them, wash them, hold the po for them, and so on; and now people have 
suddenly become ashamed not to dress themselves, not to put on their own boots, and to 
drive out with lackeys. All these changes were caused by public opinion. 

Are not the changes obvious that are now being prepared in public consciousness? It was 
only necessary twenty-five years ago to destroy the sophistry which justified serfdom, 
and public opinion as to what was praiseworthy and what was shameful changed, and life 
changed. It is now only necessary to destroy the sophistry which justifies the power 
money has over men, and public opinion as to what is praiseworthy and what is shameful 
will change and life will change with it. 

And the destruction of the sophistry justifying the monetary power, and the change of 
public opinion in that respect, is already rapidly taking place. That sophistry is already 
becoming transparent and barely hides the truth. It is only necessary to look closely in 
order to see clearly that change in public opinion which not only ought to take place but 



Leo Tolstoy 


166 


What Then Must We Do? 


has already taken place, and is merely unacknowledged and not yet put into words. It is 
only necessary for a man of our time of some little education to reflect on what flows 
from the views of the world he professes, to convince himself that the valuation of what 
is good and what is bad, what is praiseworthy and what is shameful, which by inertia still 
guides him in life, is in direct contradiction to his whole world-conception. 

It is only necessary for a man of our time to detach himself for a moment from life as he 
lives it by inertia, and to regard it from aside and weigh it in accordance with his whole 
world conception, and he will be horrified at the definition of his life dictated by his 
world-conception. 

Let us take as an example a young man (among the young the energy of life is stronger 
and self-consciousness more hazy) of the wealthy classes of whatever tendency. Every 
decent young man considers it a shame not to help an old man, a child, or a woman; he 
considers that in a common undertaking it is a shame to expose another man's health or 
life to danger while avoiding it himself. Everyone considers it a shame and barbarous to 
do what Schuyler 1 2 tells us the Kirghiz do during a storm: they send out their wives and 
old women to hold down the corners of the tent, while they themselves remain sitting in 
the tent drinking their kumys. Everybody considers it a shame to compel a feeble man to 
work for him, and an even greater shame at a moment of danger, on a burning ship for in- 
stance, for the stronger to shove aside the weaker and to climb first into the life -boat 
while leaving them in danger, and so forth. All this they consider shameful, and in certain 
exceptional conditions would on no account do it; but in ordinary life just such deeds, and 
much worse ones, are hidden from them by temptations and they constantly commit 
them. 

They need only reflect, to see and be horrified. A young man puts on a clean shirt every 
day. 

Who washes them at the river?" A woman, whatever condition she may be in, very often 
an old woman who might be the young man's grandmother or mother, and who 
sometimes is ill. What would that young man himself call anyone who for a whim 
changed his shirt which was still clean, and sent a woman old enough to be his mother to 
wash it for him? 

A young man keeps horses to show off, and they are broken in at danger to life by a man 
old enough to be his father or grandfather, while the young man himself mounts the horse 
only when the danger is passed. What does that young man call one who, avoiding it 
himself, puts another in danger and avails himself of the danger for his own pleasure? 

And the whole life of the wealthy classes is made up of a series of such actions. The 
excessive work of old men, of children, and of women, and things done by others at risk 
to their lives not that we may be able to work, but for our whims, fill our whole life. A 
fisherman is drowned catching fish for us; washerwomen catch cold and die' blacksmiths 
go blind; factory hands fall ill, and are mutilated by machines; wood-fellers are crushed 


1 Eugene Schuyler (1840-90) was U.S.A. Secretary of Legation at Petersburg, 1873-6, and travelled in 
Central Asia in 1873. -A. M. 

2 It is usual in Russia for a washerwoman when washing linen to take it to a river, stream, or pond, to rinse 
it. -A.M. 



What Then Must We Do? 


167 


Leo Tolstoy 


by falling trees; workmen fall from a roof, and seamstresses become consumptive. All 
real work is done with loss and peril of life. To hide this and not to see it is impossible. 
The one salvation in this situation, the one exit from it that a man of our time, shifting on 
to others the labour and peril of life, may not have, in accord with his own outlook on 
life, to call himself a scoundrel and a coward - is to take from others only what is 
essential for life, and himself to do real work at expense and risk to his own life. 

A time will soon come, is already coming, when it will be a shame and a disgrace not 
only to eat a dinner of five courses served by footmen but to eat a dinner that has not 
been cooked by the hosts themselves; it will be a shame not only to drive out with fast 
trotters but even in a common cab when one can use one's own legs; on work-days to 
wear clothes, boots, or gloves in which one cannot work, or to play on a piano costing 
£120 or even £5, while others, strangers, are having to work for one; or to feed a dog on 
milk and white bread while there are people who have no milk and bread; and to burn 
lights except to work by, or to heat a stove in which food is not cooked, while there are 
people who lack fire or light. To such a view we are inevitably and rapidly advancing. 
We already stand on the brink of that new life, and to establish that new view of life is the 
task of public opinion, and public opinion of that kind is rapidly forming itself it is 
women who form public opinion, and in our day women are particularly powerful. 


CHAPTER XL 

As is said in the Bible, to man is given the law of labour, to woman the law of child- 
bearing. Although with our science nous avons change tout ca, the law of the man as of 
the woman remains unaltered, as the liver remains in its place, - and the breach of it is 
still inevitably punished by death. 

The only difference is that the general evasion of their duty by all men would be punished 
by death in such a near future as may be called the present, but the evasion of the law by 
all women would be punished in a more distant future. The general infringement of the 
law by all men destroys men at once, its infringement by all women destroys the next 
generation; but the evasion of the law by some men and some women does not destroy 
the human race, but deprives the offenders of their reasonable nature as human beings. 

The neglect of the law by men began long ago in those classes which could coerce others 
and, ever widening, it has continued to the present time and has now reached to insanity- 
to an ideal of neglect of the law, to the ideal expressed by Prince Blokhin and shared by 
Renan and the whole educated world: machines are to do the work, while people will 
become bundles of nerves enjoying themselves. Evasion of her duty by woman used to be 
almost unknown. It manifested itself only in prostitution and isolated crimes of abortion. 
Women of the wealthy classes continued to fulfil their law when the men had ceased to 
perform theirs, and consequently women's influence became stronger and they continue 
to govern, and ought to govern, men who have infringed the law and consequently lost 
their reason. 

It is often said that women (Parisian women, especially those who are childless) have 
become so bewitching, utilizing all the arts of civilization, that they have mastered man 
by their fascinations. This is not only wrong, but is just the reverse of the case. It is not 



Leo Tolstoy 


168 


What Then Must We Do? 


the childless woman who has mastered man, but the mother, the one who has fulfilled the 
law of her nature while man has neglected his. 

The woman who artificially makes herself barren and bewitches man by her shoulders 
and curls, is not a woman mastering man but a woman who, depraved by man, has 
descended to his level, like him has abandoned her duty, and like him has lost every 
reasonable perception of life. 

From this mistake has arisen that wonderful nonsense called 'women's rights'. 

The formula of those rights is this: 'Ah! You, man,' says the woman, 'have violated your 
law of real work, and want us to bear the burden of ours. No! If that is so, then we, as 
well as you, can make a pretence of labour as you do, in banks, ministries, universities, 
academies, and studios; and like you we also wish to avail ourselves of other people's 
work and to live only to satisfy our lusts under pretext of a division of labour.' 

They say this and show in practice that they can make a pretence of work not at all worse, 
but even better, than men. 

The so-called feminist question arose, and could only arise, among men who had 
infringed the law of real labour. 

One has only to return to that law and the feminist question cannot exist. 

A woman having her special, unquestionable, and unavoidable labour, will never demand 
the right to share also in man's work in mines or in the ploughing field. She could 
demand only to share the sham labour of the wealthy classes. 

The woman of our class was stronger than the man and still is stronger, not on account of 
her charms, not by her adroitness in making the same pharisaic pretence of work as man, 
but because she did not evade the law; because she bore that true labour at risk of life and 
with utmost effort - true labour from which the man of the wealthy classes had freed 
himself. 

But within my own memory woman's fall her infringement of her duty-has begun, and 
within my memory it has spread more and more widely. 

Woman, having forgotten her law, has believed that her strength lies in the fascination of 
her allurements, or in her dexterity in the imitation of the sham work done by men. 

But children are a hindrance to both of these. 

And so with the help of science (science is always ready to do anything nasty) within my 
memory it has come about that among the wealthy classes dozens of methods of 
preventing pregnancy have appeared, and appliances for preventing childbirth have 
become common accessories of the toilet; and so the women - mothers of the wealthy 
classes who held power in their hands are letting it slip in order to compete with street- 
women and not be outdone by them. 

That evil has spread far and spreads farther every day, and soon it will have reached all 
the women of the wealthy classes; and then they will be on a level with the men and like 
them will lose every reasonable sense of life. And then for that class there will be no 
recovery: but there is yet time. 



What Then Must We Do? 


169 


Leo Tolstoy 


For all that, more women than men still fulfil their law, and so there are reasonable 
beings among them, and therefore some women of our class still hold in their hands the 
possibility of saving it. 

Ah! - if those women understood their worth, their power, and used these in the work of 
saving their husbands, brothers, and children - saving mankind! 

Women - mothers of the wealthy classes, in your hands alone is the salvation of the men 
of our world from the evils from which they suffer! Not those women who are occupied 
with their figures, bustles, coiffures, and their attractiveness for men, and who against 
their will, by inadvertence and in despair, bear children, and hand them over to wet- 
nurses ; 1 nor yet those who attend various university lectures and talk about the 
psychomotor centres and differentials, and who also try to avoid child-bearing in order 
not to hinder the stupefaction they call their 'development', - but those women and 
mothers who, having the power to avoid child-birth, simply and consciously submit to 
that eternal, immutable law, knowing that the hardship and labour of that submission is 
their vocation. Those are the women and mothers of our wealthy classes in whose hands, 
more than in any others, lies the salvation of the men of our world from the evils that 
oppress them. You, women and mothers, who consciously submit to the law of God, you 
alone in our unhappy perverted circle which has lost the semblance of being human, you 
alone know the whole true meaning of life according to the law of God. And you alone 
can by your example show men that happiness of life in submission to God's will, of 
which they deprive themselves. You alone know those raptures and joys, seizing your 
whole being, and that bliss which is ordained for man when he does not evade God's law. 
You know the joy of love of your husband, a joy not ending, not broken-off like all 
others, but forming the beginning of a new joy of love for your child. You alone, when 
you: are simple and submissive to God's will, know, not that farcical pretence of labour in 
uniforms and in illuminated halls which the men of our circle call labour, but the labour 
imposed on us by God, and you know the true rewards for it, the bliss it brings. 

You know this when after the joys of love you await with agitation, terror, and hope, that 
torture of pregnancy which makes you ill for nine months, brings you to the verge of 
death and to unbearable sufferings and pains; you know the conditions of true labour 
when with joy you await the approach and increase of most dreadful sufferings, after 
which comes the bliss known to you alone. 

You know it when, directly after these sufferings, without rest, without interruption, you 
undertake another series of labours and sufferings - those of nursing, in which you at 
once forgo, and subject to your duty and your feeling the strongest human demand - that 
of sleep (which the proverb says is 'dearer than father or mother'), and for months and 
years do not have an undisturbed night's sleep, but sometimes, and often, do not sleep for 
whole nights together, but walk up and down with numbed arms rocking the sick child 
who is tearing your heart. 

And when you do all this, not be lauded by anyone, not noticed by anyone, not expecting 
praise or reward from anyone, when you do this not as an achievement but as the labourer 
in the Gospel parable who came from the field, considering that you are only doing your 


1 


The employment of wet-nurses was very much more usual in Russia than in England. -A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


170 


What Then Must We Do? 


duty - then you know what is sham fictitious labour for the praise of men, and what is 
real labour to fulfil God's will - the indication of which you feel in your heart. 

You know that if you are a real mother it is not enough that no one sees your labour or 
praises you for it - people merely consider that so it ought to be - but that even those for 
whom you have toiled will not only not thank you but will often torment and reproach 
you-and with the next child you will do the same: you will again suffer, again endure the 
unseen terrible labour, and again not expect reward from anyone, and will again feel the 
same satisfaction. In your hands, if you are such women, should be the influence over 
men, and in your hands lies their salvation. Every day your number diminishes: some 
occupy themselves with their fascination for men and become street-women, others are 
engaged in competing with men in their artificial, trifling occupations, others again who 
have not yet been false to their vocation, already repudiate it in their minds: they perform 
all the achievements of women and mothers, but accidentally, repiningly, with envy of 
the free, sterile women, and deprive themselves of their sole reward - the inner 
consciousness of the fulfilment of God's will - and instead of satisfaction, suffer from 
what should be their happiness. 

We are so confused by our false way of life, we men of our circle have all so utterly lost 
the sense of life that there is no longer any distinction between us. Having shifted the 
whole burden and danger of life on to the backs of others, we are unable to give ourselves 
the true name deserved by those who compel others to perish in providing life for them,- 
scoundrels and cowards. 

But among women there is still a difference. 

There are women - human beings - women presenting the highest manifestation of a 
human being; and there are women - whores. And this distinction will be made by future 
generations, and we too cannot help making it. 

Every woman, however she may dress herself and however she may call herself and 
however refined she may be, who refrains from child-birth without refraining from sexual 
relations, is a whore. And however fallen a woman may be, if she intentionally devotes 
herself to bearing children, she performs the best and highest service in life-fulfils the 
will of God-and no one ranks above her. 

If you are such a woman, you will not, either after two or after twenty children, say that 
you have borne enough, any more than a fifty-year old workman will say he has worked 
enough, while he still eats and sleeps and has muscles demanding work. If you are such a 
woman you will not shift the nursing and tending of your children on to another mother 
any more than a workman will let another man finish the work he has begun and nearly 
completed, because you put your life in that work and therefore your life is fuller and 
happier the more of that work you have. 

And if you are such a one - and happily for men there still are such women - then that law 
of the fulfilment of God's will by which you guide your own life, you will apply also to 
your husband's life and to that of your children and of those near to you. 

If you are such a one and know by your own experience that only self-sacrificing, unseen, 
unrewarded labour done with danger of life and uttermost effort for the life of others, is 
the mission of man which gives satisfaction and strength, then you will apply those same 



What Then Must We Do? 


171 


Leo Tolstoy 


demands to others, will incite your husband to such labour, and by such labour will value 
and estimate people's worth, and for such labour will prepare your children. 

Only a mother who considers child-bearing an unpleasant accident and thinks that the 
meaning of life lies in the pleasures of love, the comforts of life, education, and 
sociability, will bring up her children so that they shall have as many pleasures and enjoy 
them as much as possible, will feed them daintily, dress them up, give them artificial 
amusements, and teach them not what will make them capable of self-sacrificing labour 
(male or female) done with risk to life and to the last extremity of effort, but what will 
secure them diplomas 1 and the opportunity not to labour. Only such a woman, having lost 
the significance of her life, will sympathize with that deceptive, false, male work by 
which her husband, freeing himself from man's duty, finds it possible, together with her, 
to avail himself of other people's labour. Only a woman of that kind will choose such a 
husband for her daughter, and will esteem people not by what they themselves are, but 
for what is attached to them - position, money, and the power to take other people's 
labour. A real mother, who knows the will of God by experience, will prepare her 
children also to fulfil it. Such a mother will suffer if she sees her child overfed, 
effeminate, and dressed-up, for she knows that these things will make it difficult for it to 
fulfil the will of God which she recognizes. 

Such a mother will teach not what will expose her son or daughter to the temptations 
presented by being able to escape labour, but whatever will enable them to bear the 
labour of life. She will not need to ask what she should teach her children or for what she 
should prepare them: she knows what man's vocation is, and what to teach and what to 
prepare them for. Such a woman will not only not incite her husband to sham, false work 
which aims only at making use of other people's labour, but will regard with aversion and 
horror an activity which serves as a double temptation to her children. Such a woman will 
not choose a husband for her daughter by the whiteness of his hands and the refinement 
of his manners, but knowing well what real labour is and what is deceit, she will always 
and everywhere, beginning with her own husband, respect and value in men and demand 
of them, real labour with expenditure and danger of life, and will despise that false, 
showy labour which aims at emancipating oneself from real work. 

And let not those women who while renouncing woman's vocation wish to profit by its 
rights, say that such a view of life is impossible for a mother, she being too intimately 
bound by love to her children to refuse them dainties, amusements, and fine clothes, and 
not to fear to leave them unprovided for if her. husband has no fortune or assured 
position, and not to fear for the future of her marrying daughters, and for her sons who 
have not received an 'education'. 

All that is a lie, a most glaring lie! 

A true mother will never say it. You cannot refrain from the desire to give them sweets 
and toys and to take them to the circus? 


1 The diplomas of the higher educational establishments in Russia were essential for entry to various 
branches of Government service and to various professions. -A. M. 



Leo Tolstoy 


172 


What Then Must We Do? 


But you do not give them poisonous berries to eat, do not let them out alone in a boat, 
and do not take them to a cafe chantant! How is it you can refrain in the one case, but not 
in the other? 

Because you are saying what is untrue. 

You say you love your children so that you fear for their lives, fear hunger and cold, and 
therefore value the security given you by your husband's position which you admit to be 
unjustifiable. 

You so fear those future possible misfortunes for your children- very distant and doubtful 
ones-that you encourage your husband in things you yourself regard as unjustifiable; but 
what are you doing now in the present conditions of your life to secure your children 
from the unfortunate occurrences of present-day life? 

Do you spend much of the day with your children? It is much if you spend one-tenth of 
it! 

The rest of the time they are in the hands of strangers, hired people often taken from the 
street, or they are in institutions, exposed to physical and moral infection. 

Your children eat, are nourished. Who prepares their dinner, and of what? For the most 
part you do not know. Who instils moral perceptions into them? You do not know that 
either. So do not say that you put up with evil for your children's good - it is not true. You 
do evil because you like it. 

A true mother, one who sees in the bearing and bringing up of children her self- 
sacrificing vocation and the fulfilment of God's will, will not speak so. 

She will not speak so, because she knows that her business lies not in making of her 
children what suits her or suits the prevailing tendency of the times. She knows that 
children - the coming generation - are the greatest and most sacred thing it is given to 
man actually to see, and that to serve this holy thing with her whole being is her life. 

She herself knows, being constantly between life and death and safeguarding a barely 
dawning life, that life and death are not her business, her business is to serve life, and 
therefore she will not seek distant paths for that service but will only not neglect those 
near at hand. 

Such a mother will bear children and will nurse them herself, will first of all feed another 
before herself, will prepare food for the children, will sew and wash for them, will teach 
them and will sleep and talk with them, because she sees therein her life-work. She 
knows that the security of every life lies in labour and the capacity to labour, and 
therefore she will not seek external security in her husband's money or in her children's 
diplomas, but will develop in them the same capacity for a self-sacrificing fulfilment of 
God's will which she has felt in herself, a capacity to endure toil with expenditure and 
danger of life. Such a mother will not ask others what she is to do, she will know it all 
and will fear nothing, and will always be at peace, for she will know that she has done 
what she had to do. 

If there may be doubts for men and for a childless woman as to the way to, fulfil the will 
of God, for a mother that path is firmly and clearly defined, and if she fulfils it humbly 
with a simple heart she stands on the highest point of perfection a human being can 



What Then Must We Do? 


173 


Leo Tolstoy 


attain, and becomes for all a model of that complete performance of God's will which all 
desire. 

Only a mother can before her death tranquilly say to Him who sent her into this world, 
and Whom she has served by bearing and bringing up children whom she has loved more 
than herself - only she having served Him in the way appointed to her can say with 
tranquillity, 'Now lettest Thou Thy servant depart in peace.' And that is the highest 
perfection to which, as to the highest good, men aspire. 

Such women who fulfil their mission reign over men, and serve as a guiding star to man- 
kind; such women form public opinion and prepare the coming generation; and therefore 
in their hands lies the highest power, the power to save men from the existing and 
threatening evils of our time. 

Yes, women, mothers, in your hands more than in those of anyone else lies the salvation 
of the world. 

February 14, 1886 



